<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89728-0017 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-28-89.f2.A1016</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 144 / Friday, July 28, 1989 /Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1910 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-700 A] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 1218-AA33 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Powered Platforms for Building Maintenance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)is amending its Standard for Powered Platforms for Building Maintenance,29 CFR 1910.66, Subpart F, to allow the use of alternative stabilizationsystems. The standard had allowed only stabilization systems which providedcontinuous positive means of engagement between the platform and the buildingfacade. Such systems had proven to be infeasible for application to manynew buildings with discontinuous vertical facades. In addition, the amendmentupdates existing requirements using performance-oriented language, expandsthe scope to include coverage of interior installations (atriums) and includesrequirements for emergency planning, employee training and personal fallprotection for employees using powered platforms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE:</T2> January 24, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS:</T2> In compliance with 28 U.S.C. 2112(a), the Agency designatesfor receipt of petitions for review of the standard, The Associate Solicitorfor Occupational Safety and Health, Office of the Solicitor, Room S-4004,U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Mr. James F. Foster, U.S. Departmentof Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Room N3649, 200Constitution Ave., NW., Washington, DC 20210, (202) 523-8148.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>A powered platform is a suspended, manned platform that is installed ona building and is used to maintain the building facade. It is part of aninstallation which consists of the working platform, suspension means,fall arrest systems and the requisite operating and control devices. The previous OSHA powered platform standard (29 CFR 1910.66), adopted in1971, required that all platforms be stabilized by direct attachment tocontinuous guide rails in the building facade, whenever the building heightis greater than 130 feet (39.6 m) in height. For structures less than 130feet (39.6 m) in height, continuous guide rails were not required, butthe platform had to be equipped with building face rollers and angulatedsuspension wire ropes, which would cause the platform to exert pressureagainst the building facade. The purpose of these requirements was to stabilizethe platform while it is in use by absorbing wind forces and horizontalforces caused by personnel movement on the platform. During the years immediately following the promulgation of the OSHA standard,most high rise buildings were designed with straight building facades.This design adapted readily to the continuous guiderail requirement. Inrecent years, however, architects have also been designing buildings withmultiple vertical planes, setbacks and complicated corner arrangements.These design changes may be the result of aesthetic considerations or aneffort to conserve energy. Energy costs, for example, have led to buildingdesigns with fewer and smaller windows, projecting awnings to reduce coolingneeds and recessed windows to provide insulation from outside temperatures.These changes in building design have often made it difficult, infeasible,or costly to use continuous guide rails on many building facades. As aresult, the new designs for high rise buildings have been responsible forthe development of new types of stabilization systems for powered platforms.These new systems have provided employers the opportunity to select appropriatestabilization equipment that is capable of providing equivalent safetyfor workers and significant cost savings.The previous OSHA powered platform standard did not address or allow thisdeveloping technology, and OSHA had received a significant number of requestsfor variances from the standard. These requests addressed the use of alternatestabilization systems on newly designed single and multiple faced buildings,and allowed for employee fall protection and platform related training.However, while these requests were often successful, the OSHA varianceprocess is a regulatory procedure that can result in delays, and whichmust be pursued for each project. A compliance directive, OSHA InstructionSTD 1-3.3, was issued by OSHA in November 1982 to allow intermittent stabilizationin some circumstances, but it is limited in scope and cannot address therapid changes in building design and related platform stabilization methods.A need existed, therefore, to update the OSHA standard to address alternatestabilization systems for the purpose of providing industry with alternatemethods of adapting to the new building designs. At the same time, an updatedstandard would have to continue to provide employers with an equivalentlevel of safety and to improve safety where possible in other areas ofpowered platform work. For these reasons, OSHA began the rulemaking processfor amending the OSHA standard covering powered platforms. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. History of Regulation </ITAG>The previous OSHA standard for powered platforms (29 CFR 1910.66) was promulgatedin 1971 from a national consensus standard (American National StandardsInstitute (ANSI) A120.1-1970) under section 6(a) of the Occupational Safetyand Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C. 655(a). In the response to the need for employers to select alternate stabilizationsystems to the system required in the OSHA standard, OSHA published anAdvance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPR) in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on February 11, 1983 (48 FR 6368). The ANPR soliciteddata and views regarding the appropriate content and scope of an amendmentto 29 CFR 1910.66. Information was sought on alternate stabilization systemsand the need to revise or add other provisions in this section. Also, theANPR addressed a number of issues pertinent to the standard. First, isthere a need for the development of performance criteria in addressinghazards associated with stabilization systems? Second, what should OSHArequire in the identification, design, maintenance and use of alternatestabilization systems? Third, what are the best methods for the trainingof employees in the inspection and operation of powered platforms? Fourth,should more comprehensive criteria be developed for fall protection systems?Fifth, should appropriate changes be made in the standard to reflect changesin industry practice and changes in related provisions of OSHA's GeneralIndustry Standard? Sixth, what limitations should be placed on operatingpowered platforms under severe weather conditions? The ANPR invited interested persons to submit written comments on the issuesraised in the ANPR by March 14, 1983. The comment period was extended toMay 16, 1983 (48 FR 14005) in response to commenters who requested additionaltime to make their submissions. Thirty written comments were received inaddition to seven requests for extending the comment period. Commentersrecommended that OSHA use performance criteria in addressing alternatestabilization systems; require training of employees in the operation ofpowered platforms; notify building owners of installation deficienciesand amend the current standard to reflect changes in related OSHA's GeneralIndustry Standards and ANSI standards. Also, information and data werereceived in response to the specific issues raised in the ANPR. On January 22, 1985, OSHA published (50 FR 2890) a proposed amendment ofits powered platform standard. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM)invited interested persons to submit written comments on the proposed standardand to file objections and requests for a public hearing. The originaldate for the close of the comment period was set for March 25, 1985, butwas subsequently extended, at the request of commenters, to June 3, 1985(50 FR 15756). OSHA reopened the comment period on June 26, 1985 to permit the filingof written comments on the Preliminary Regulatory Impact Assessment (PRIA),which had not been available for public review during the earlier commentperiod. Written comments on the PRIA were to be received by August 1, 1985(50 FR 27307). Forty-nine written comments were received, including ninerequests for a hearing. These comments identified seven primary issues:1. Should the equipment that is used to maintain the elevated interiorof buildings (atriums) be addressed in a separate standard, or should theproposal be revised to address atriums? 2. Is there a need for a limit on the horizontal movement of an intermittentlystabilized platform? 3. Should OSHA modify the proposed requirement that a secondary suspensionsystem be used in conjunction with horizontal lifelines, if vertical lifelinesare not selected for employee fall protection? 4. Should the proposed formula for calculating the safety factor of thesuspension wire rope be amended, if the efficiency of the rope terminationis taken into account? 5. Should OSHA retain the proposed electrical requirements, such as a voltagedrop limit and a circuit disconnect switch, now addressed in the NationalElectric Code, but which is not addressed in OSHA's electrical standardsunder 29 CFR Part 1910, Subpart S?6. Should OSHA expand its requirements for the protection of platform membersif heat producing processes or corrosive substances are used on the platform?7. Should OSHA require that written work procedures be provided for employeetraining? In addition to these primary issues, OSHA requested information and suggestionson a number of other issues. These issues addressed intermittent and buttonguide stabilization systems, supported equipment, davit sockets and weightlimits, wire rope terminations and inspections, cable stabilization, platformpassage and roll, roof carriage stability and personal fall arrest systems.All of these issues are reviewed in the Summary and Explanation of theFinal Rule (Section IV). In response to the hearing requests, OSHA published a notice of informalhearing, listing these issues, on November 22, 1985 (50 FR 48222). Theinformal hearing was convened by Judge Leonard N. Lawrence on February19, 1986, pursuant to section 6(b)(3) of the Act (29 U.S.C. 655(b)(3))and 29 CFR Part 1911. The hearing included testimony from 25 witnesses.Judge Lawrence established a post-hearing period for the submission ofadditional comments and briefs extending through April 13, 1986. In responseto requests from several hearing participants to extend the time to fileadditional data and evidence, Judge Lawrence extended the time to receivepost-hearing data, evidence and briefs through May 23, 1986. The entire record, including 112 exhibits and 928 transcript pages, wascertified by Judge Lawrence on April 5, 1988, in accordance with 29 CFR1911.17. Copies of materials in the record, as well as an index of therecord, may be obtained from the OSHA Docket Office, Room N-2634, FrancesPerkins Building, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210. The final standard is based on a full consideration of the entire recordof this proceeding including materials discussed or relied on in the proposal,the record of the informal hearing, and all written comments and exhibitsreceived. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. New Issues </ITAG>A. Portable Suction Cups During the post-hearing comment period, OSHA received a suggestion (EX.50) that OSHA should investigate the use of portable suction cups (glaziertype) as an alternate means of stabilizing a powered platform. Althoughthe suggested alternative was received by OSHA very late in the rulemakingprocess, OSHA considered it to be an interesting concept and sought byletter comments (EX. 112) from all hearing participants on its possibleuse, so that OSHA would have a basis to reopen the rulemaking and offerguidelines on the method, if appropriate. A significant number of commenters (EX. 48, 52, 54, 59, 68, 69, 78, 80,85) opposed the use of glazier type portable suction cups for platformstabilization. These commenters were concerned that the suction cups wouldrequire extreme surface cleanliness; could be applied only to smooth hardsurfaces such as glass and granite; and might not safely support the loadsimposed on them. In addition, they expressed concern that the building curtain wall or glassarea would not be designed to sustain the imposed loading; the vacuum couldnot be maintained over a long period of time; and the location of the suctioncups on the building would be determined by the operator rather than onthe basis of an engineering stabilization system. One commenter (EX. 54) stated that he could not support the use of suctioncups without extensive testing. Even if such tests proved that the cupswould support the loads, he believed it was essential that the operatorbe trained in their care and use to insure that the cups were kept cleanenough to maintain a holding effect at the building face. Also, if thecups should lose their vacuum, they could fall and injure operators onthe platform. In support of the use of suction cups, one commenter (EX. 60) believedthat these cups could be applied to existing buildings, provided the glassor building curtain wall could support the imposed loads. Another supporting commenter (EX. 50, 86) stated that although the stabilizationdevice had not been extensively studied, he believed that an engineeredsystem for platform stabilization, using suction cups, was feasible withexisting technology. He believed that a properly engineered system wouldprovide equivalent platform stabilization and result in substantial installationand operating cost savings. This commenter noted that suction cups areonly one of many other devices or systems which could be utilized for platformstabilization. The others include permanent magnets, electromagnets inthe building, a vacuum system and regenerative adhesives. OSHA has not directly addressed the use of suction cups as stabilizationdevices in the final rule, since there is insufficient evidence and datafor a standard on these devices at this time and since notice and commenton this specific issue was not provided. OSHA notes however that the finalrule, requires that all equipment installations, including stabilizingcomponents such as suction cups, would be designed by a professional engineer,paragraph (f)(1)(i). Therefore, a stabilization method, such as suctioncups, would be acceptable if designed by a professional engineer and equivalentto existing stabilization methods listed in the standard (f)(5)(i)(F).OSHA intends, as noted in Appendix A, item 11, that one acceptable methodof demonstrating the equivalency of a stabilization method is to providean engineering analysis by a registered professional engineer. Such anengineering analysis would address the equivalency of a proposed stabilizationmethod in its function, ease and method of use, durability and adaptabilityto the work environment. In addition, the analysis would determine thecapability of the building and the stabilizer devices to meet the requiredloading and other relevant safety criteria. B. Level-Sensing Devices During the informal hearing period, a commenter (TR 2/20, p. 26) recommendedthat OSHA require a level sensing device on the platform. This device wouldsense an out-of-level condition (more than five degrees) on a two-pointsuspended platform, and discontinue power to the hoist causing this conditionuntil the platform is brought to a level condition by the use of the oppositehoist unit. This commenter claimed there have been a number of incidents in New YorkCity where a platform has gotten out of level, causing it to become jammedin the mullion track. This condition necessitated a rescue of the operatorsfrom the stranded platform. No injury or accident data was provided toOSHA to support the need for this device. A New York State official (EX. 87), in a post hearing comment, stated thatthere was only one notable incident (with no injury) which led to the inclusionof the level-sensing device requirement in the New York safety standards.New York is currently considering whether it should change its requirementfor out-of-level criteria on platforms from five degrees to ten degrees.Several individuals (TR 2/20, pp. 70, 109, 369) who gave testimony at thehearing disagreed with the need for requiring a level-sensing device ona two-point suspended powered platform. They contended that since employeeoperation is the primary reason for out-of-level platforms, if employeesare properly trained in platform operation and in the handling of emergenciesthis would prevent the occurrence of an out-of-level condition. Since amercury switch is used in the device, they noted that the device wouldbe extremely sensitive to any platform vibration or swaying, and that thisvibration or swaying would cause the switch to go on and off continuously.This on and off operation could cause the hoist motors to operate on startingcurrents which can eventually contribute to a motor burnout. A motor burnoutcould place the operators in jeopardy, since they would be stranded onthe platform until rescued. A platform manufacturer (TR 2/20, p. 369) testified that his company'sexperience with these devices in New York has convinced him that thesedevices are unreliable, costly and a major source of maintenance servicecalls.From the hearing testimony presented, OSHA did not receive sufficient evidenceof an employee hazard due to out-of-level platforms to warrant the needfor a standard requirement on this issue. In fact, the commenters pointedout that the device itself can present unique hazards for employees whenit is used. OSHA believes that employee training in the operation of apowered platform, as required in paragraph (i)(1)(i), and the perceptionby employees of an out-of-level platform would prompt them to take thenecessary action to prevent a hazardous condition from occurring. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Summary and Explanation of Final Rule </ITAG>The final standard revising 29 CFR 1910.66 follows the language and formatof the proposal, except for a number of changes based on OSHA's reviewof the entire rulemaking record. The rulemaking record includes the writtencomments, hearing testimony, data and comments submitted during the hearingand post-hearing period. Following is a discussion of the requirements in the amended powered platformstandard. This preamble discusses only those provisions which were addressedby public comment or testimony. For those proposed provisions for whichno post-proposal submissions were received, and which are unchanged fromthe proposed rule, the preamble references the specific page in the Noticeof Proposed Rulemaking of January 22, 1985 (50 FR 2890) where a discussionof the provision can be found. The numbers in brackets refer to specificreferences in the comments to the January 22, 1985 proposal, the February19, 1986 hearing Exhibits (EX.), and hearing transcript page numbers, e.g.(TR 2/19, p. 100). OSHA defines the scope of this standard in paragraph (a). In most majorrespects, OSHA has retained the scope of the previous powered platformstandard and of the proposal. Thus, andSection; 1910.66 continues to coverpowered platform installations for building maintenance which are permanentlydedicated to maintaining a specific structure or group of structures. OSHAhas expanded the previous scope to include powered platforms used to performmaintenance on elevated interiors of buildings (atriums), as well as onbuilding exteriors. OSHA proposed to continue to limit this standard to permanent installations.Temporary suspended scaffolds are presently covered by 29 CFR 1910.28(g)and a proposed revision of that standard is scheduled for the coming year.For this reason OSHA did not raise the issue of whether to incorporatecoverage of temporary scaffold installations into andSection; 1910.66. During this rulemaking, however, some participants questioned continuationof separate standards. One major concern recited was that permanent andtemporary installations use similar equipment and employees face similarhazards and, therefore, these installations should be regulated by thesame standard (see EX. 9-30, 9-37), and testimony of Lee B. Herzog (TR2/20, p. 195). Additional comments noted specific deficiencies in 29 CFR1910.28(g), such as not providing scaffold stabilization when a scaffoldis moving between work stations. (See Lawrence R. Stafford, EX. 9-28, TR2/20, p. 87; Kurt W. Daigel, EX. 9-22; TR 2/20, p. 342.) On the other hand, other participants noted potential problems in combiningtemporary scaffolds and permanent platform installations in one standard.Safety concerns were raised by both union and industry groups. Window CleanersLocal andplusmin;16 (EX. 84) and the Scaffold Industry Association (EX. 9-40)contended that inclusion of the temporary units in the proposal would imposerequirements on these units that would, in effect, reduce the number inuse. The union claimed that such a reduction would reduce the number ofjobs for employees operating these temporary units. Economic concerns werecited by Joseph Puccinelli of Safeway Steel Products (TR 2/20, p. 276)and the Window Cleaning Contractors Association (TR 2/20, p. 474), whospeculated that if the more expensive requirements of andSection; 1910.66were imposed on temporary units, this would result in less frequent buildingmaintenance and losses for companies performing maintenance.OSHA appreciates the concerns and suggestions presented by commenters andhearing participants during this rulemaking proceeding on the subject oftemporary suspended scaffolds. OSHA has summarized the comments receivedon this subject, and has presented them here to provide a public recordof the concerns expressed by the interested parties. However, as notedpreviously, temporary suspended scaffolds are presently covered in andSection;1910.28(g) and a proposed revision of this standard is scheduled for thecoming year. Comments on temporary units received in the present rulemakingwill be more properly addressed at the time of that proposed revision.Addressing those comments in this rulemaking would delay both rulemakingsbecause of the need to evaluate differing technical and economic issues.Paragraph (a) has been reworded to clarify the exclusion of temporary suspendedscaffolds from coverage by this standard. In the Notice of Hearing of November 22, 1985 (50 FR 48222), OSHA requestedcomment on whether the coverage of platform installations used to maintainthe elevated interior of buildings (atriums) should be addressed in a separatestandard or whether the proposed paragraph (b)(1) which applied only to``exterior maintenance'' should be revised to address atriums. This questionwas addressed by a number of commenters (EX. 9-10, 9-25, 9-31 9-35, 9-45;14-1, 14-3; 15-4, 15-8, 15-13, 15-18; 50) and hearing participants (TR2/19, pp. 50, 170, 171, 178, 203, 229, 239; TR 2/20, pp. 31, 85, 86, 98,315, 334, 459, 474). The Tennessee Valley Administration (TVA) (EX. 14-3) supported the needfor a separate standard to address atriums, since these installations generallyhad unique structural configurations which presented problems in platformrigging, suspension, stability and operational procedures. This commenteralso noted that the securing of vertical life lines and emergency rescueprocedures in this interior environment had to be separately addressed.The Window Cleaning Contractors Association (TR 2/20, p. 459) concurredwith TVA in that atriums generally have designs which pose special problemsfor building maintenance that should be addressed in a separate standard.Lerch, Bates and Associates (TR 2/19, p. 178) also favored a separate standardfor atriums. This commenter observed that interior installations are generallynot self-powered or subjected to wind forces. OSHA Consultant David E. Hoberg (TR 2/29 pp. 50, 170) recommended thatthe proposed paragraph (b)(1) be revised to include the coverage of atriumsunder this standard. He pointed out that the equipment and operating methodsfor interior and exterior installations are similar and are used by thesame employees in maintaining a building. He further stated that with theabsence of wind forces, work station tie-in devices would be sufficientfor platform stability and would eliminate the need for continuous or intermittentrestraints in atrium installations. The California Department of Industrial Relations (EX. 9-45) agreed withMr. Hoberg that exterior and interior platform installations were closelyrelated, and that atrium installations should be addressed in the proposal.Kurt W. Daigel (TR 2/20, p. 334) of the New York State Department of Laborand Lawrence R. Stafford (TR 2/20, p. 85, 86) also favored the revisionof the proposed paragraph to include atrium coverage, provided that theplatform installation is designed by a professional engineer. In addition,they recommended that adequate operating instructions and emergency rescueprocedures for an atrium installation be addressed in the proposal. OSHA agrees with the commenters and those testifying at the hearing thatthe standard should address permanent platform installations used in atriums.First, there are more significant similarities in the equipment and operationsused at the interiors and exteriors of buildings. Second, the proposedstandard's provisions easily address atrium installations, with minor exceptions.Third, including protection of employees working in atriums against similarpowered platform hazards is appropriate and avoids the unnecessary delayin providing specific coverage for these workers. Employee training requirementsin the standard would address the difference in work procedures for exteriorand interior work. Paragraph (a), therefore, now extends this standardto permanent exterior and interior installations. In response to the need expressed for emergency rescue requirements, paragraph(e)(9) adequately provides requirements for both interior and exteriorbuilding maintenance, including atriums. Further, since the building andequipment installations are required to be designed by a professional engineerunder paragraphs (e)(1)(i) and (f)(1)(i), OSHA believes that concerns expressedabout unique atrium structural problems affecting employee safety are adequatelyaddressed. Proposed paragraph (a) stated that this section did not apply where buildingmaintenance is performed at heights 35 foot (10.1 m) or below. The 35 foot(10.1 m) exclusion was based on Section 101 of the ANSI A120 draft standard_November1981. OSHA now recognizes, however, that this exclusion by ANSI was meantto avoid requiring that buildings which are less than 35 foot (10.1 m)in height have a permanent powered platform installation. OSHA does notrequire that a building owner install a permanent powered platform installationfor building maintenance. However, if such a platform is installed, thenthis standard would apply to the total height of the building, includingthe initial 35 foot (10.1 m). OSHA believes that employees should be protectedfrom hazards at all levels where the platform is used. OSHA, therefore,is deleting the 35 foot (10.1 m) exclusion in the standard. One participant (TR 2/20, p. 458, 459) believed that temporary suspendedscaffolds can be used safely on buildings up to 300 feet (91.5 m), andsuggested that OSHA not require permanent powered platform installationsbelow 300 feet (91.5 m). In addition, this commenter believed that poweredplatforms installations are costly and cannot be justified at the lowerlevels. The issue of when permanent powered platforms installations should be requiredwas not raised by OSHA in the proposal, and OSHA finds that there is insufficientevidence to suggest how such a requirement for permanent installationswould be triggered. In addition, OSHA believes that the building owneris in the best position to determine the type of building maintenance equipmenthe or she should use based on considerations of feasibility, aesthetics,costs, safety and other relevant factors. OSHA notes that both the scope and application language remain essentiallyunchanged from the proposal. However, OSHA has partly transposed the contentsof these paragraphs as proposed. Thus, OSHA proposed that the ``application''of this standard be limited to permanently dedicated exterior installations.OSHA has determined that this criterion more properly defines the ``scope''of the standard, with the inclusion of interior installations. Also, OSHA had proposed the ``scope'' of this standard be limited to maintenanceperformed in excess of 35 feet (10.1 m). The ``scope'' also described thebuilding maintenance tasks. Upon review, OSHA determined, as noted above,that the 35 foot (101.1 m) limitation be deleted. The description of buildingmaintenance tasks remains in the ``scope'' in paragraph (a) of the standard.Paragraph (b)(1) states that the standard applies to all permanent installationscompleted 180 days after the effective date of this standard. This paragraphclarifies proposed paragraph (b)(3) which addressed new installations.OSHA notes that paragraph (b)(1) does not prevent an employer from adheringto the requirements of the standard for an installation completed duringthe 180 day period. An equipment manufacturer (EX. 9-43) noted that 180 days may not be adequate,since it may take a year or more to complete a building. James W. Fortune(TR 2/20, p. 317), who testified for OSHA stated, however, that the proposalproperly addresses new construction.This provision is consistent with the six months exclusion in the ANSIA120 draft standard January 1986 (EX. 15-8). In addition, OSHA observesthat there has been adequate notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of the proposed changes to the present regulation,and ample time for review has been given to all parties so they can adjustto the proposed changes. Paragraph (b)(1) also states that the standard applies to all major modificationsto existing installations completed after the 180 day period. This provision was supported by Brian L. Gartner (TR 2/20, p. 169) andThomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20, p. 317) who agreed that major replacements ormodifications to existing platform installations which affect the buildingand/or platform equipment should comply with the standard. They believeit was incumbent on building owners to apply the latest safety standardsto these major modifications. OSHA also notes that the ANSI A120 draft standard January_1986 (EX 15-8)requires that major changes to those portions of the building that provideprimary support for the platform equipment should be accomplished in sucha manner as to meet requirements of current safety standards. OSHA is in agreement with the need for applying the requirements of thisstandard to major modifications of existing installations and is includingthis application in the Final Rule under paragraph (b)(1). Major modificationswould include work similar to that involved when a new building or facilityis built or when a new wing or floors are added to an existing building.Major modifications would not include work involving window replacementsor other building facade and roof changes which do not affect the suspensionor stabilization of the platform equipment. Several commenters (EX. 9-34, 9-37, 9-43) supported the need to exemptexisting platform installations from the revised standard, as in proposedparagraph (b)(2). OSHA agrees that the design of many existing buildingsand platform equipment may prohibit complete compliance with the revisedstandard. Also many of these existing installations may already be designedto meet the stabilization requirements listed in OSHA Instruction Standard1-3.3 of November 1, 1982. OSHA, however, has determined it is necessary that existing installationsat least comply with paragraphs (g), (h), (i) and (j) as well as AppendicesC and D. Paragraph (g) addresses the inspections and tests to be conductedon powered platforms. Paragraph (h) addresses powered platform maintenance.Paragraph (i) addresses platform operations (employee training and platformuse) which is not covered in the unrevised standard. Paragraph (j) addressespersonal fall protection for employees on all types of working platforms,while the existing standard only addresses personal fall protection foremployees on two-point working platforms. Appendix C, referenced in paragraph(j), addresses personal fall protection. Appendix D addresses buildingand equipment requirements for installations purchased and used after August27, 1981, but before July 23, 1990, and carries forward the requirementsof paragraphs a, b, c, and d of the standard. These paragraphs cover buildingand equipment design, construction and inspection. The discussion of thetestimony and comments received on paragraphs (g), (h), (i), (j), AppendixC and Appendix D is found in the preamble sections addressing these paragraphs.OSHA had proposed in paragraph (c) that the employer be required to obtaina certification from the building owner that the powered platform installationmeets paragraphs (e), (f), (g) and (h), of the standard. The reason forthis proposed requirement was OSHA's recognition that in many cases theemployer is a contractor who provides employees to perform building maintananceusing powered platfroms installed by the building owner. The structuralintegrity and operational safety of those platforms, their anchorages,and related equipment such as hoists depends on their design, installationand maintenance. The building owner will have the knowledge to evaluatewhether the platform installations were designed, installed and maintainedin compliance with this standard. If the building owner is also the employerof the employees who perform the building maintenance no burden would becreated by the proposed requirement that the employer obtain a certificationfrom the building owner. If however, as in the majority of cases, the buildingowner does not employ the maintenance workers, concern was expressed thatthe building owner's reluctance to issue a certification would be unfairand ineffective (TR 2/20, pp. 461, 426). Under the proposal only the employerof the maintenance workers could be cited for the failure to obtain a certification.Little incentive would be provided in the standard to encourage the buildingowner to certify: his options would be to contract with employers who werewilling to take their chances and work on uncertified platforms, or wherefeasible to use temporary platforms. OSHA recognizes that it is the building owner who has the information todesign his building to conform to these standards. The Agency thereforehas determined that in order to advance the remedial purposes of the Actthat the standard will require that the building owner be responsible forassuring the employer that his building and equipment conform to specifiedrequirements of the standard. OSHA also has reduced the scope of the required certification rather than,as in the proposal, requiring the certification to broadly attest to totalcompliance with provisions of paragraphs (e), (f), (g) and (h). The provisionnow requires certification that the platform installation meets the criticaldesign criteria set out and that it be designed and installed under thesupervision of a registered professional engineer. These design criteriaare not amenable to evaluation by the employer who is not the buildingowner, since compliance or non compliance is concealed from view or evenclose inspection. Since most of the design requirements are expressed inthe standard as performance criteria, and the performance can be evaluatedonly by sophisticated tests and calculations, OSHA is also concerned aboutAgency capability to inspect for hidden defects. As stated above, the requirement in paragraph (c)(1) does not referenceeach provision which it covers. Rather, the relevant subject areas, suchas load capabilities, stability factors, horizontal forces and the designof carriages, hoisting machines, wire ropes, stabilization systems andelectrical equipment, are stated. OSHA believes that the provisions tobe covered by the assurance requirement are easily identifiable in thestandard. To assist the public in identifying major design criteria, however,OSHA is describing the provisions which it intends to cover by subjectmatter immediately below. Load requirements apply to both building and equipment design. The majorprovisions deal with building anchors, stabilizer ties and guide buttonsin (e)(2)(iii); (A)(5), (A)(6) and (B)(6). Building load factors coveroccupant loads, (f)(1)(ii), as does the counterpart equipment provision,(e)(1)(iv). Paragraph (f)(3) contains load requirements for hoist motors,(i)(M), and transportable outriggers, (ii) (F) and (H); paragraph (f)(4)specifies load capabilities for hoisting machines, (v), and the windingdrum attachment, (viii). Load factors for suspended unit components arecontained in paragraph (f)(5); for platforms and wire ropes, (f)(5)(v)(I),and platforms and attachments in (f)(5)(vi)(F), and wire rope connectionsin (f)(7)(i). Stability factors for designated equipment are set apart in paragraph (f)of the standard. They cover carriage stability, (f)(3)(i) (G) and (G)(i),anchorages for outriggers, (f)(3)(ii)(C), lateral stability of outriggers,(f)(3)(ii)(E), and stability of davits, (f)(3)(iii)(A) and of units notsuspended at the ends, (f)(5)(i)(D). Platform roll, which affects stability,is covered in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(C). Design requirements linked to specified forces apply to buildings and equipment.Thus, an angulation force of at least 10 pounds (44.4 N) must be maintainedwhen angulated roping permitted for the top 75 feet of the building isused (e)(2)(ii). The force required to push a manually propelled carriageor to rotate a davit shall not exceed 40 pounds per person (444.8 N), (f)(3)(i)(C)and (f)(3)(iii)(D).Design requirements related to carriages are set apart in paragraph (f)(3)(i)of the standard. They cover traversing speed, (i)(B), protective devicesand interlocks, (i)(F), resistance to overturning, (G)(2), interlocks forthe tie-down device, (G)(3), and breaking systems, (H), and (H)(1).Primary and secondary brake requirements for hoisting machines are listedin paragraphs (f)(4)(ix), (ix)(A), (ix)(B)(<T3>1</T3>) and (ix)(B)(<T3>2</T3>). In addition, requirements for hoisting machines are listedfor arresting overspeed descent, (f)(4) and limiting platforms speed, (f)(5)(ii)(G).Design factors and material requirements for suspension wire rope are setapart in paragraphs (f)(7) (ii) and (iii).The maintenance of continuous contact of the platform with the buildingfacade is required with intermittent stabilization systems, (e)(2)(iii)(A),and angulated roping systems, (e)(2)(iii)(C).In addition to the basic requirement that powered platform electrical wiringand equipment design must comply with Subpart S (andSection;andSection; 1910.302-1910.308),design criteria in paragraphs (e) and (f) include the following provisions:limiting service voltage droppage to five percent at any power circuitoutlet, (e)(11)(ii), and an independent equipment power circuit, (e)(11)(iii).Electrical components must be designed for exterior use, (f)(8)(ii); cablesprotected against overtensioning damage; (f)(8)(iii); controls includedto protect against overloads, three phase reversal and phase failure, (f)(8)(iv);controls operative only under limited circumstances, (f)(8)(vi) (A) and(B); power to be interrupting automatically when wire rope slackens, (f)(8)(vi)(C);prevent unsafe upward and downward travel with directional switches, (f)(8)(vii);supply emergency stop switches for remote controlled roof-powered platforms,(f)(8)(viii); and supply overload devices for cables in constant tension,(f)(8)(ix).The Agency believes that this requirement is squarely within the permittedrange of regulation. In various regulatory contexts, the Agency has requiredemployers who are not the direct employers of the employees exposed toa particular hazard to warn of defects, take remedial action or provideinformation to the directly employing employer. For instance, the HazardCommunication standard requires that upstream manufacturers provide informationto downstream employers to protect their employees (29 CFR 1910.1200).A similar requirement in the earlier benzene standard was upheld by theCourt of Appeals. The Court stated; ``(p)lacing the responsibility to warndownstream employees of concealed hazards on those upstream employers whocreate the hazards and know of the hazards is consistent with the remedialpurpose of the Act and is within OSHA's broad authority to prescribe warninglabels.'' <T3>American Petroleum Institute </T3>v.<T3> OSHA</T3> (581 F. 2d 493, 51 (1978)). cf.<T3> Mourning</T3> v.<T3> Family Publications Services,</T3> 411 U.S. 356 (1973).Paragraph (d) establishes terms for definitions used in the standard andcommonly recognized in the industry. No comments were received on the followingterms: Anemometer, angulated roping, cable, carriage, certification, control,guide shoe, interlock, operating device, primary brake, prime mover, registeredprofessional engineer, building face roller, rope, speed reducer, stabilityfactor, stabilizer tie, tie-in-guides, transportable outriggers, verify,weatherproof, winding drum hoist. No change is made in these definitionsin the Final Rule. The discussion of each of these proposed definitionsis found in the preamble of the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking of January22, 1985 (50 FR 2890) on pages 2909 and 2910. Major clarifying changeshave been made to the definitions for; ``combination cable'' and ``installation.''Kurt W. Daigel (EX. 9-31, 9-41) recommended that the proposed definitionfor ``babbitted fastenings'' be eliminated, since babbitted fasteningsare no longer accepted practice. Hoberg (EX. 19B, 19-c; TR 2/19, p. 53)noted the term ``babbitted fastenings'' should be replaced by the term``speltered sockets'' or a more generic term such as ``poured sockets,''since babbitted fastenings should be prohibited for wire rope used forpowered platforms. This commenter observed that babbitted fastenings areused in elevator rope terminations, but such fastenings would be unacceptableif used in a traction hoist because of the wire rope turning in the socket.In addition, Mr. Hoberg noted that babbitted fastenings are rated at 25percent efficiency while fastenings for wire rope should have at leastan 80 percent efficiency.OSHA notes that the recommendations made by these commenters for the prohibitionof babbitted fastenings for hoisting rope is supported in the text ``Handbookof Rigging for Construction and Industrial Operations,'' 3rd edition, byW. Rossnagel, P.E., on page 55, which addresses wire rope fastenings.OSHA is deleting the proposed definition for ``babbitted fastenings'' andis adding a definition for the generic term ``poured socket'' in the FinalRule. This definition is based on a definition of this term on page 28of the <T3>Wire Rope Manual,</T3> second edition, published by the American Ironand Steel Institute.Spider Staging Sales Company and Daigel (EX. 9-22, 9-31, 9-41) recommendeddeletion of the word ``exterior'' in the proposed definition of buildingmaintenance, claiming the standard should also cover interior maintenanceactivities as well. The California Department of Industrial Relations (EX.9-45) suggested that the definition include the terms ``scheduled maintenance,''which would cover window cleaning activities, and ``unscheduled maintenance,''which would cover caulking, sandblasting, etc.Since, as explained above, OSHA is expanding the scope of the standardto include interior maintenance, it therefore agrees that the definitionof ``building maintenance'' should reflect this change and is deletingthe proposed modifying phrase, ``exterior.''OSHA is not adding the terms ``scheduled maintenance'' and ``unscheduledmaintenance'' in the Final Rule since it believes it is unnecessary toshow this differentiation in the definition. Windows are washed, stonescleaned, glass replaced_sometimes regularly, and sometimes on an as-neededbasis, as determined by inspection.Daigel (EX. 9-22) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) concurred in suggesting that thedefinition for ``traveling cable'' as proposed in paragraph (d)(9) be deleted.They believed that this definition is unnecessary, since the term ``cable''is adequately defined in the Final Rule and there is no specific need todefine cable types in the standard. OSHA agrees, and the definition fortraveling cable is deleted in the Final Rule.It was suggested that the term ``catalog strength'' be changed to the term``rated strength'' since it is more generic and permits the engineer toadjust for arbitrary catalog listings and installation limits (TR 2/19,p. 53, EX. 19B). OSHA accepts the suggestion of a commenter and is changingthe term in the Final Rule.OSHA is including a definition for ``competent person'' to substitute fora proposed definition for ``qualified person.'' OSHA notes that the termis meant to identify persons who will conduct equipment and wire rope inspectionsand persons who will train other employees in the use and inspection ofpowered platforms. The building owner has the responsibility for the designationof the person he or she deems qualified to conduct equipment and wire ropeinspections, while the employer would designate the person that would trainother employees in the use and inspection of powered platforms. Becausethe term ``qualified person'' is used in Appendix C, and in Part 1926 torefer to formally trained persons, OSHA believes that it is inappropriateand confusing to use ``qualified person'' as proposed. OSHA had made specificthe areas of competence for the ``competent person'' as suggested by acommenter (EX. 9-20). It was claimed (EX. 19B) that the proposed definition of ``continuous pressure''was awkward and difficult to interpret, because of the use of the terms``device'' and ``control.'' OSHA agrees and has changed the definitionin the Final Rule. Daigel (EX. 9-22) suggested deleting the phrase ``and for transferringthe platform between these locations'' in the proposed definition of ``davit.''The phrase might imply it is permissible to use a davit for moving a platformhorizontally across a building face. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 54, EX. 19B, 19C) noted that the davit definition couldalso describe a carriage, and that it was important to differentiate betweendavits, carriages and outriggers to obtain effective compliance with thestandard. Mr. Hoberg recommended specific changes in the definition whichwould conform to the equipment described in the proposal and illustratethe characteristics unique to davits. In addition, this commenter recommendedadding two additional definitions: ``ground-rig davit'' and ``roof-rigdavit'' in the final rule since requirements for these two types were includedin the proposal. OSHA agrees with the suggestions made by both commentersand is changing the ``davit'' definition and adding definitions for ground-rigdavit and roof-rig davit in the Final Rule. The proposed standard had provided a generic definition for equipment tie-ins.OSHA is deleting this definition in the final rule since the specific tie-inused in the proposal is defined under ``stabilization tie.'' Daigel (EX. 9-31) stated that the proposed definition for ``equivalent''was far too broad and should include the phrase ``protect against a hazard''to make it more specific. OSHA believes that there may be alternative designs,materials or methods which can contribute to a safe workplace but whichmay not directly ``protect against a hazard.'' OSHA, therefore, has determinedthat the definition for ``equivalent'' remain unchanged in the Final Rule.Daigel (EX. 9-22) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested that the proposed definitionfor ``ground rigging'' be clarified. The proposed definition, as stated,might wrongfully imply that roof-powered platforms may not be used whenground rigging. OSHA concurs with the commenters and is changing the definitionin the Final Rule to eliminate this implication. A commenter (EX. 9-41) suggested that the proposed definition for ``guideroller'' be changed and made similar to the proposed definition for ``guideshoe.'' OSHA notes, however, that a ``guide shoe'' is different from a``guide roller'' in that it provides a sliding contact between the buildingguides and the shoe. In addition, comments by Hoberg (EX. 19-B) and theproposed definition in the ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986 (EX. 15-8)concur in support of the definition as stated in the proposal. OSHA believesa guide roller is adequately described in the proposed definition and theparagraph, therefore, is unchanged in the Final Rule. The proposed definitions for ``multiple wrap drum hoist'' and ``singlewrap drum hoist'' are deleted since these terms are not used in the FinalRule. The proposed definition for a ``hoist machine'' has been modified for clarification.The word ``powered'' is added before the word ``device.'' The proposed definition for ``installation'' has been changed to improveclarity. In addition, OSHA is deleting the word ``exterior'' in the definitionsince the rule is to apply to exterior and interior building maintenance.The proposed definition for ``intermittent stabilization'' specifies thevertical placement of the building anchors on a building face. Hoberg (EX.19-B) claims there is nothing unique about the verticality, since the anchorsare spaced horizontally and vertically, and suggested that the phrase ``vertical''be deleted. OSHA accepts the suggestion and the definition is changed inthe Final Rule. The California Department of Industrial Relations (EX. 9-45) recommendedthat the proposed definition for ``lifeline'' be broadened to include bothhorizontal and vertical lifelines. OSHA agrees and is changing the definitionin the Final Rule. It was noted (TR 2/19, p. 54, EX. 19-B) that the term ``live load'' means``moving and dynamic'' in other related regulations and standards. Forconsistency with other standards, the commenter suggested deleting theword ``static'' in the title of the proposed definition for ``live load.''OSHA agrees and is changing the title of the definition in the Final Rule.A comment from Hoberg (EX. 19-B) was intended to clarify the proposed definitionfor ``obstruction detector.'' He suggested the substitution of the term``control,'' which is defined in the proposal, for the term ``device.''OSHA agrees with this suggestion and is changing the definition in theFinal Rule. The term ``operating control'' was used in the proposal at (f)(3)(i)(F)and was not defined. OSHA agrees with Hoberg (EX. 19-B) and developed adefinition that is added in the Final Rule. Comments received from the New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41),Kurt W. Daigel (EX. 9-31) and Hoberg (EX. 19-B) concurred in the need forclarification of the proposed definition for ``outrigger.'' Because anoutrigger is differentiated from a davit in the regulations, Mr. Hobergsuggested the definitions should be similar so that differences are clearwhen definition comparisons are made. OSHA agrees with the commenters andthe definition for ``outrigger'' is changed in the Final Rule. In addition,OSHA is substituting the term ``working platform,'' which is defined, forthe term ``powered platform.''Comments received from Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43), Daigel(EX. 9-31), and Hoberg (EX. 19-B) regarding the proposed definition for``rated load'' reveal a variety of opinions on how this definition shouldbe written. Mr. Daigel would prefer that the definition address only ahoist load, while the Spider Staging Sales Company suggested the definitionshould address the loading for the powered platform system. Mr. Hobergnoted that there could be serious consequences in the misinterpretationof this term and recommended a series of load term definitions to avoidthis problem. OSHA accepts Mr. Hoberg's recommendations, which also addresssuggestions by Mr. Daigel and Spider Staging Sales Company, and the proposeddefinition of rated load is replaced in the Final Rule with four separateload definitions. These definitions are used in the Final Rule text. K.W. Daigel (EX. 9-22) suggested that the proposed definitions for a roof-poweredplatform and a self-powered platform be simplified through the appropriateuse of the word ``hoist.'' OSHA agrees and both definitions are modifiedin the Final Rule. Daigel (EX. 9-22) and the New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41)suggested that the phrase ``protected against injury'' be replaced in theproposed definition for ``safe surface'' with the phrase ``protected againstfalling.'' OSHA agrees that protection against falling is the major concernfor employees who use a building surface to prepare rigging or to gainaccess to powered platforms. Accordingly, OSHA is changing the definitionin the Final Rule. OSHA is making minor changes to the proposed definition for ``secondarybrake.'' The term now focuses on the function, i.e., to arrest the descentof a powered platform in the event of an overspeed condition or in an emergency.In addition, OSHA has dropped proposed language which described other possiblereasons for activating secondary brakes in reply to comments (EX. 9-22,9-31, 9-41). Although no comment was received on the proposed definition of ``stabilityfactor,'' OSHA believes it is appropriate to explain the criteria usedin the stability factor. The stabilizing moment is the algebraic sum ofthe moments of force acting on the inboard side of the fulcrum in a platforminstallation support. The overturning moment is the algebraic sum of themoments of force acting on the outboard side of the fulcrum in a platforminstallation support. The physical significance of the moment of a forceabout an axis lies in the fact that it is a measure of the tendency ofthe force to turn the body on which the force acts about that axis. Thedefinition remains unchanged in the Final Rule. The New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41) and Daigel (EX. 9-31)recommended that the proposed definition for ``supported equipment'' berevised to show the characteristics distinguishing that term from ``suspendedequipment.'' These commenters also recommended that OSHA consider deletingthis definition entirely since this type of equipment may not be in use.OSHA is aware of at least one instance where supported equipment has beenbuilt, tested and installed on a building. Such equipment uses buildingmembers rather than wire rope for support, and is best applied on slopedsurfaces and in atriums. In addition, the draft standard ANSI A120_January1986 (EX. 15-8) continues to include provisions addressing supported equipment.OSHA has decided to retain the provisions addressing supported equipmentin the Final Rule and, as a consequence, is leaving unchanged the proposeddefinition for supported equipment in the Final Rule. OSHA believes thedefinition adequately describes the unique characteristics of supportedequipemnt and provides an easy comparison with the definition for suspendedequipment. Daigel (EX. 9-22) claimed that the proposed definition for ``suspendedequipment'' would negate all the effort that has been expended in the industryto preclude horizontal movement of platforms across the building face exceptwhen in the uppermost storage position. He also suggested that the definitionshould be compatible with the definition for a two-point (two suspensionwire ropes) suspended scaffold in the OSHA standard 29 CFR 1910.21(f)(34).OSHA agrees that the definition should be modified to avoid the implicationthat platforms can be moved horizontally across a building face, but doesnot agree that the definition should follow the format of 29 CFR 1910.21(f)(34).The proposed definition was intended to be a generic definition for suspendedequipment and would cover one point (one suspension wire rope), two-point(two suspension wire ropes), and four-point (four suspension wire ropes)types of powered platforms. OSHA addresses the issue of platform horizontal movement in its changeof the definition for ``suspended equipment'' in the Final Rule. The New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41) and Daigel (EX. 9-22)recommended that the proposed definition for ``suspended scaffolds'' bedeleted, since it is covered under the definition for suspended equipment.However, each term is used in a different context at paragraphs (b)(1)and (f)(5)(i), and therefore requires a separate definition. The definitionis unchanged from the proposal in the Final Rule. The New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41) stated that the proposeddefinition for ``tail line'' could also mean a line between a safety beltand a hanging lifeline. However, in the context of this standard, the tailline is only used in reference to a suspension wire rope and a clarifyingchange is made in the Final Rule. The proposed definition for ``tie-in device,'' paragraph (d)(54), is deletedsince this term is not used in the Final Rule. The proposed definition for a ``traction drum hoist'' did not refer toa traction sheave hoist, which is another basic type of traction hoist.It was suggested (EX. 19-B) that the definition be given the generic titleof ``traction hoist'' and include both traction drum hoist and tractionsheave hoist references in the definition text. OSHA agrees with the suggestionand the definition is changed in the Final Rule. The proposed definition for ``transportable equipment'' is deleted, sincethe term is not used in the Final Rule. It was suggested (TR 2/19, p. 56, EX. 19-B) that the definition for ``trolleysystem'' be changed to a definition for a ``trolley carriage'' for thepurpose of providing clarity and consistency in the Final Rule. The commenternoted that carriages and trolley systems are defined as having identicalfunctions, and reasoned there should be safety controls on overhead supportedtrolleys equal to those provided on underfoot supported carriages. OSHAbelieves the commenter's suggestion has merit and is changing the definitionin the Final Rule. Appropriate changes are also made in the text of theFinal Rule to reflect the definition change.Kurt W. Daigel (EX. 9-22) and the New York State Department of Labor (EX.9-41) suggested eliminating the term ``exterior'' in the definition for``working platform.'' OSHA agrees, since the application of the proposalis being expanded to include interior maintenance. OSHA also is addingthe term ``Manned'' to be consistent with regulatory text. Paragraph (e) proposed general requirements for buildings which utilizepowered platform installations. No comments were received on paragraphs(e)(1)(ii), (e)(1)(iii), (e)(1)(iv), (e)(2)(iii)(A)(4), (e)(6), (e)(10),(e)(11)(i), (e)(11)(iii), (e)(11)(v), and no change is made in these paragraphsin the Final Rule. The discussion of each of these provisions is foundin the preamble of the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking of January 22, 1985(50 FR 28990) on pages 2896, 2897 and 2898. Proposed provision (e)(2)(iii)(A)(4)is included in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A) of the Final Rule. Paragraph (e)(1) proposed the general requirements which apply to buildingsthat utilize working platforms.The California Department of Industrial Relations (EX. 9-45) suggestedthat the proposed paragraph (e)(1) include a requirement for locating detailedengineering plans at the work site to ensure that proper replacement partswill be provided when needed. The Final Rule addresses the commenter'sconcern regarding installation repairs in paragraph (e)(10). This paragraphrequires that repairs to the building affecting suspended equipment installationsnot affect the capability of the building to meet the requirements of thestandard. The Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) suggested changing the applicationof proposed paragraph (e)(1) to ``building maintenance which utilize suspendedsystems.'' In response, OSHA points out that the paragraph addresses specificbuilding requirements in an installation which must be met for compliance.The paragraph does not address building maintenance. Proposed paragraph (e)(1)(i) required that building attachments and equipmentbe designed by a registered professional engineer experienced in such design.Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 49) stated that this was a sound approach, but notedthat the design criteria to be used were not included. The commenter observedthat in many states an engineer attests to technical compliance with areference design standard or standards. This was confirmed in at leastone state by a submission received from Carl J. Thurnau (EX. 87) of theNew York State Department of Labor. In the New York State Advisory Standardandplusmin;101 for the construction, operation and maintenance of swingingscaffolds, recognized design standards are listed which the state considersacceptable in applications for approval of suspended scaffolds. In the ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986 (EX. 15-8), design criteriaare addressed in section 202. In this section, the criteria are based onthe limitations (stresses, deflections, etc.) established by nationallyrecognized standards promulgated by a number of organizations. OSHA agrees that some guidelines are needed for the design criteria usedby the engineer. Following the approach used by the ANSI A120 draft standard_January1986 (EX. 15-8), OSHA is adding to Appendix A a list of organizations whichhave established nationally recognized design standards applicable to poweredplatform installations. The New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41) and Kurt W. Daigel (EX.9-31) suggested deleting the proposed requirement for building installationsin (e)(1)(v) because it was too broad. This requirement stated that thebuilding installation shall allow for the safe use and operation of theequipment. OSHA agrees and has changed the provision of the Final Ruleto require that only those affected parts of the building be designed toallow the equipment to be used without exposing employees to hazards. Proposed paragraph (e)(2)(i) would have required building exteriors tohave tie-in guides which are building face components that provide a continuousmeans of positive engagement between the the building and suspended unit.The definition of the term ``tie-in guides'' states that the guides providecontinuous positive engagement between the suspended equipment and thebuilding. For reasons of consistency, OSHA is changing the revision atparagraph (e)(2)(i) in the Final Rule by requiring that building exteriorsbe provided with tie-in guides and deleting those phrases which are inthe definition of the term ``tie-in guides.'' The proposal, in paragraph (e)(2)(ii), would have allowed tie-in guidesto be eliminated if not feasible due to exterior building design, for uppermostelevations. Tie-in guides would have been eliminated from the upper 75feet (22.9 m) provided angulated roping is employed and continuous contactis maintained by the platform with building face. For the upper 50 feet(15.3 m), no angulated roping or continuous contact would have been required.Two commenters (EX. 9-23, 9-43) recommended that the tie-in guide exclusionfor upper elevations be increased to 130 foot (39.6 m), the same distanceas was permitted in proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(c) for elevations aboveground level. OSHA believes the two environmental conditions are not comparable.First, the wind pressure effect on tall buildings is usually greatest atthe top corners of a building. Second, the column effect of air on theexterior of a building increases with building heights. This upliftingwind tends to ``dam up'' under a platform and get between the platformand the building, moving the platform away from the building. For thesereasons, OSHA cannot accept the recommendation that the tie-in guide exclusionfor upper elevations be increased to 130 foot (39.6 m). Kurt W. Daigel (EX. 9-22) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) concurred in suggestingthat OSHA should reword this exclusion to require that there should becontinuous contact between the platform and the building face at the 50foot (15.3 m) upper-most elevations. This suggestion addresses the objectionto the upper 50 foot (15.3 m) exclusion by Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, p. 23)who stated that employees can be subjected to hazards at elevated buildingheights due to the windy conditions if tie-in guides are not used. Other commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-41, 15-8) and hearing participants (TR 2/19p. 182; 2/20-311, 334) supported the upper 75 foot (22.9 m) exclusion.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 182) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8)also believed that the upper 75 foot (22.9 m) exclusion should be rewordedto require a minimum angulation force of 10 pounds (44.4 N) on the buildingface.In response to these comments, OSHA agrees that an exception to continuouspositive engagement of the working platform the building should be madein such a manner so as not to increase the risk to employees when theyare working near roof top elevations. Accordingly, if tie-in guides areexcluded at the uppermost elevations, there is a real need to provide analternate method of platform stabilization because of the wind forces whichcan occur at these elevations. The platform stabilization required forthe upper 50 foot (15.3 m) should be no less than is required at the upper75 foot (22.9 m) level. Therefore OSHA is deleting the reference to 50foot (15.3 m), retaining the 75 foot (22.9 m) exclusion as proposed andadding the requirement for a minimum angulation force of 10 pounds (44.4N)in the Final Rule. This revision from the proposal is requiring a continuouscontact between the platform and the building face, if the platform isnot stabilized with tie-in guides for the upper 75 foot (22.9 m) level.In addition, OSHA is deleting the word ``continuous'' in the Final Rule,since the word is contained in the definition of tie-in guides and thereforeis redundant.Proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii) is being modified in the final rule forclarity and for consistency with other related provisions. First, as inthe previous paragraph the word ``continuous'' is deleted since this wordis already contained in the definition of tie-in guides. Second, the phrase``required in (e)(2)(i)'' is added to show the relationship of this exclusionprovision to the original requirement. Third, a reference to paragraphs(e)(2)(iii) (A), (B) and (C) is added to complete the reference to threeguide systems_anyone of which is required if tie-in guides are not used.Requirements for powered platform installations using intermittent stabilizationsystems were proposed in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A). A considerable numberof commenters (EX. 9-22, 9-23, 9-25, 9-28, 9-29, 9-31, 9-34, 9-35, 9-37,9-41; EX. 15-4, 15-8, 15-13; 19B; 38; 50; 88) and hearing witnesses (TR2/19, pp. 58, 153, 174, 230; TR 2/20, pp. 23, 115, 311, 333) addressedthis provision. The three primary issues raised were the proposed 14-inch(355.6 mm) limit on platform displacement, the wind velocity of 40 milesper hour (64.3 km/hr) as a design criteria, and the related lateral displacementtables in Appendix C.Daigel (TR 2/20, p. 333), Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20, p. 311), and JamesW. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 230) claimed that the 14-inch (355.6 mm) limiton platform displacement was based on the faulty premise that normal platformmovement in excess of 14 inches (355.6 mm) would cause a worker to fall.They contended that normal wind forces will move a 2,000-pound (89.6 kg)platform very slowly along the face of a building because of the platformweight and the frictional forces which are in opposition to these windforces. In addition, they claimed the platform would remain level and tendto right itself during this movement. Only high winds, they continued,have a significant effect on platform stabilization, and this is the mainreason for using stabilizer ties.Daigel (TR 2/20, p. 333) also pointed out that under normal operating conditions,in the absence of winds, the platform may displace in excess of 14 inches(355.6 mm) laterally, due to variables such as worker movement on the platform,building face roller condition and contact, and differences in actuationof the platform hoist controls.Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 15-4), Thomas J. O'Shea (EX. 15-13), and Hoberg(TR 2/19, p. 58) noted that the rate of platform displacement and a worker'sreaction time would determine a worker's stability on a platform. Sincethese criteria are so variable, they contended that assigning numericallimits for platform displacement for the purpose of assuring worker stabilityis not feasible and should be omitted. These same commenters observed thatthe designer of the building installation can limit the horizontal displacementof a platform for a specific building through proper vertical spacing ofthe building anchors, platform weight and stabilizer tie length.Hoberg (EX. 19-B) recommended that OSHA should delete the 14-inch (355.6mm) limit on platform displacement, and require instead that the intermittentstabilization system be designed to prevent sudden horizontal movementof the platform. It is the sudden movement of the platform, Hoberg contended,that is more likely to cause a worker to lose his or her stability on theplatform. OSHA is appreciative of this new data submitted by the commenters and witnessesrelative to the 14-inch (355.6 mm) proposed limit on platform displacement.This new data, which indicated that the proposed limit would not achieveOSHA's intended purpose, had not been considered in the study (EXH. 2)prepared for OSHA on intermittent stabilization. After considering thenew data, OSHA is deleting this proposed requirement and substituting performancelanguage which requires the system to be capable of preventing sudden platformhorizontal movement. The Agency believes that this provision addressesthe hazard more effectively. Several commenters (EX. 9-23, 9-25, 9-28, 9-37, 9-41) and persons who testifiedat the hearing (TR 2/20, pp. 23, 311) objected to the 40 miles per hour(64.3 km/hr.) velocity criterion in the proposed requirement (e)(2)(iii)(A).These commenters believed that workers should not be required to work ona platform when exposed to winds even approaching this velocity. However,it was not OSHA's intention that this criterion be used as a limit on workerexposure. The 40 miles per hour (64.3km/hr) velocity criterion was intendedto serve as the design basis for the proposed 14-inch limit (355.6 mm)on platform displacement. Since OSHA is not promulgating the proposed displacementlimit, the 40 miles per hour (64.3 km/hr) criterion also is eliminatedin the Final Rule. OSHA also is eliminating the tables proposed for inclusion in AppendixC in the Final Rule. They were intended to provide guideline data to buildinginstallation designers on lateral displacement in an intermittent stabilizationsystem. James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 174), Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20,p. 311), and Daigel (TR 2/20, P. 311) noted during the public hearing thatthese tables should be deleted for several reasons. First, the introductionof wind velocity variables in the tables in excess of 25 miles per hour(40.2 km/hr) implied that workers would be permitted to work on a platformin these wind exposures. Second, building installation designers woulddevelop their own designs for intermittent stabilization systems specificallysuited to each building and would not utilize the guidelines presentedin Appendix C. Third, if OSHA should decide to delete the 14-inch (355.6mm) displacement limit in the proposal, the tables would be nnecessary.Since OSHA has agreed that the limit on platform displacement is to beeliminated in the Final Rule, the tables in Appendix C are also deleted.OSHA had proposed that the maximum vertical interval between building anchorsin an intermittent stabilization system be 50 foot (15.3 m). A large numberof comments (EX. 14-1; 15-4; 9-13, 9-25, 9-31, 9-41, 9-43; TR 2/19, pp.60, 185; TR 2/20, pp. 23, 92, 267, 313) were received in response to OSHA'Srequest for comments on this provision in the November 22, 1985 Noticeof Hearing (50 FR 48222). Some commenters, James W. Fortune (TR 2/19 p. 185), Daigel (EX. 9-31) andthe New York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-41) suggested that the maximuminterval between building anchors should be less than 50 foot (15.3 m)for buildings in excess of 500 foot (153 m) in height because of the generallyhigher wind velocities at those elevations. Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20, p. 313) and Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 15-4)believed there was no engineering justification to reduce the anchor intervalto a specific distance at the higher elevations in the regulation. Theycontended that this spacing should be decided by a competent professionalengineer based on an evaluation of the entire system, platform size, winddesign values for the site, and the profile of the facade. The Travelers Insurance Company (EX. 14-1), Daigel (EX. 9-31), and LawrenceR. Stafford (TR 2/20, p. 92) recommended that the proposed 50 foot (15.3m) interval be reduced to 40 foot (12.2 m) regardless of the building height.Lawrence R. Stafford noted that New York State has had excellent experiencewith the 40 foot (12.2 m) limit. Another group of commenters, Hoberg (EX. 19-B, TR 2/19, p. 60), Acme Fabricators(EX. 9-13), Spider Staging Sales (EX. 9-43), and Richard W. Hoffman (TR2/20, p. 207) recommended that the building anchor interval be limitedto three floors or 50 foot (15.3 m), whichever is less. These commentersargued that the three floor limit has worked out quite well in their experienceand is acceptable to most architects. In addition, if a floor limit isnot introduced it is possible that in some buildings with eight feet sixinch floors (2.6 m), the proposed provision permitting a maximum of 50foot (15.3 m) would allow building anchors every four floors. Therefore,it is conceivable for some buildings to have building anchors every fourfloors and on other buildings every three floors. These commenters concludedthat for uniformity and safety, ease of installation, operation and design,the three floor limit of not greater than 50 foot (15.3 m) was recommended.OSHA agrees with the latter group of commenters and is changing the proposedrequirement in the Final Rule accordingly. OSHA believes that because ofthe variability of conditions which exist at each building site, it isappropriate that this provision establish a set of minimum criteria forspacing of anchors allowing the necessary flexibility to deal with theparticular conditions encountered. Due to the various site conditions thathave been identified such as the wind environment at various elevations,the platform length and weight, and the facade profile, the responsiblearchitect or engineer should have the latitude to consider these variablesin locating the appropriate building anchors. If a tall building requiresadditional building anchors, or if certain conditions along a buildingedge require a building anchor at every floor, the provision should allowthe architect or engineer to address each situation. Furthermore, OSHAbelieves that in a time of crisis, a worker will look for a building anchorat a given floor level rather than at a distance that is irregularly spacedwith respect to the building facade panels. Finally, the change in the Final Rule for the building anchor intervalto a three floor limit is consistent with current OSHA Instruction STD1-3.3 of November 12, 1985 (EX. 102), which addresses intermittent stabilizationsystems. Other requirements for building anchors are also changed from the proposal.Hoberg (EX. 19-B, 19-C) suggested that the proposed provision requiringthe anchors to be in vertical rows be modified, since some buildings havedifferent spacings at different elevations as part of the architecturaldesign. This commenter also believed that it is an unsafe practice to usethe building anchors to move the platform horizontally across the faceof the building, and suggested OSHA address this practice in the provision.Lee B. Herzog (EX. 9-29) noted that the proposal would imply that fourstabilizer attachments are required for a platform using a four wire ropesuspension system. This commenter suggested changing the provision to requirethat only two stabilizer attachments need be used for this type of system.OSHA agrees with the commenters and has changed provisions (e)(2)(iii)(A)(2)and (e)(2)(iii)(A)(3) in the Final Rule to reflect their suggestions. Hoberg (EX. 19-B, 19-C) suggested that OSHA also address the hazard whichcould occur if building anchors were to cut or entangle lifelines, wireropes or cables. This commenter noted that the catching of suspension wireropes and life-lines on external anchors was an almost universal complaintamong workers using these systems he contacted. OSHA agrees and is addressingthis hazard in a new paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A)(4) in the Final Rule. The required capability of intermittent stabilization system componentswas also at issue. The proposal required intermittent stabilization systemcomponents to be capable of supporting, without failure, at least fourtimes the maximum intended load applied or transmitted to the components.Daigel (EX 9-31) and Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20, p. 213) recommended thatOSHA also address the loading requirement on each building anchor. Thesecommenters believed that the minimum load for each anchor should be 600pounds (2668 N) based on their field observations of these systems. Hoberg (EX. 19B, 19c) supported the need for addressing anchor loadingrequirements. This commenter recommended, however, that the minimum anticipatedload on a single building anchor should be 300 pounds (1334 N). This recommendationwas based on criteria that included a platform end area of 10 square feet(0.9 m2) enclosed with steel mesh, a wind force from a 100 miles/hour (160.8km/hr.) wind, a four to one safety factor and the sharing of the wind loadby two building anchors. Mr. Hoberg believed that only those building anchorarrangements in which one anchor must withstand all of the load shouldhave a greater capability factor than where two anchors can share the load.OSHA agrees that the 300 pound (1334 N) minimum anticipated loading peranchor is adequate if both anchors share the load, and this requirementis included in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A)(5) in the Final Rule. For installations,where both anchors do not share the load, paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A)(6) addressesthose instances.Hoberg (EX. 19c) suggested that OSHA require the building anchors and stabilizerties to have the capability of withstanding anticipated wind loads if aplatform should be stranded on a building face due to some mechanical orelectrical failure. In addition, he suggested that a single anchor shouldhave the capability to sustain these wind loads if the anchors have differentspacing than the suspension wire ropes. OSHA believes these suggestions have merit and is including them in theFinal Rule in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A)(6).Several commenters, Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 15-4), Thomas J. O'Shea (EX.15-13), and Daigel (EX. 15-14) supported the proposed paragraph which wouldhave prohibited the use of ground rigged platforms on intermittent stabilizationsystems. They claimed a feasible system has not been developed which willprovide the necessary stabilization of the platform. OSHA's proposed prohibitionalso was based on the Agency's belief that ``on a ground rigged platform,the stabilizer ties cannot be attached to the building anchors during thefirst ascent to the roof'' (50 FR 2897, January 22, 1985). Many other commenters (EX. 9-13, 9-23, 9-34, 9-37; 19B) and hearing witnesses(TR 2/19, p. 184; TR 2/20 pp. 306, 309), however, recommended that suchplatforms not be prohibited based on their experience and observations.Powered Platforms Company (EX. 9-23), Acme Fabricators Company (EX. 9-13),and Joseph Puccinelli (TR 2/20, p. 306) claimed that special provisionscan be made to provide stabilizers at each floor level as a ground riggedplatform ascended. James W. Fortune (TR 2/19 p. 184) provided OSHA witha drawing of a building in California in which stabilization was providedfor a ground rigged platform and contended that employee work procedures,similar to those used for roof rigged platforms, could be used in deployingthe intermittent ties. Robert W. Hursh (EX. 101) also provided OSHA withsketches and analysis of a similar ground rigged platform arrangement.Hoberg (EX. 19B) claimed that the proposed prohibition is based on theassumption that the ropes or platforms cannot be restrained except by aworker on the platform, and that this assumption is incorrect. This commenternoted that access panels in the building face would allow the suspensionwire rope to be restrained to the building anchors prior to the ascentof a ground rigged platform. Based on the new data provided by the commenters which show that groundrigged platforms can be stabilized intermittently, OSHA agrees to eliminatethe prohibition in the Final Rule. Stabilization of the ground rigged platformduring its ascent, however, is required under paragraph (f)(5)(v)(H). In addition, the Final Rule contains other provisions which will also ensurethat the use of ground rigged platforms on intermittent stabilization systemswill not present a hazard to employees. First, under paragraph (e)(1)(i)and (f)(1)(i), the building and equipment components are to be designedby a registered professional engineer. Second, under paragraph (c), theemployer is required to obtain a certification from the building ownerthat the installation meets the requirements of this standard. Third, underparagraph (i)(1)(iii), employees must be trained in the operating procedurespeculiar to ground rigged platforms with intermittent stabilization systems.Requirements for powered platform installations using button guide stabilizationsystems are set out in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B). These systems includea guide track mounted on the platform and guide buttons mounted on thebuilding face which engage the track during ascent and descent. LawrenceR. Stafford (EX. 9-35; TR 2/20, p. 153), Daigel (EX. 9-22, 9-31; TR 2/20,p. 334), and the Window Cleaning Contractors Association (EX. 9-20) objectedto the inclusion of this alternate stabilization system in the standard.These commenters claimed that there were certain problems with these systems,such as lifelines catching on the buttons and button misalignment due tothe variance in building construction. Other problems that were claimedincluded possible button breakage due to guide track hang-up and hand injuriesfrom handling the guide tracks mounted on the platform. James W. Fortune (EX. 43; TR 2/19, pp. 176, 186) and Hoberg (EX. 19B, 19C;TR 2/19, pp. 57, 163) supported the use of a button guide stabilizationsystem as an alternate stabilization system. In response to the objectionsraised against these systems, these two commenters noted that the problemsnoted were a function of improper design, improper suspension of safetylines and inadequate training of employees. These commenters claimed tohave observed a number of button guide stabilization systems which haveoperated satisfactorily. Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that several provisionsbe added to this section which address the problems of lifelines, buttonbreakage and alignment, and guide track operation. OSHA agrees with these commenters, for the reasons stated, that this alternatestabilization system should be retained in the standard. OSHA also is includingthe relevant provisions recommended by Hoberg in the Final Rule and theseare identified as paragraphs (e)(2)(iii)(B)(1), (e)(2)(iii)(B)(2), (e)(2)(iii)(B)(3),(e)(2)(iii)(B)(5) and (e)(2)(iii)(B)(6). In summary, OSHA is changing theproposed requirements for button guide stabilization systems under paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(B) in the following manner.First, the word ``continuous'' and the last sentence of proposed paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(B) are deleted. The word ``continuous'' is already containedin the definition of tie-in-guides. The last sentence of this paragraphwhich addressed guide bar requirements is transferred in the Final Ruleto paragraph (f)(5)(vi)(A), which addresses equipment requirements. Second,for purposes of clarity, proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B)(1) is rewrittenas paragraphs (e)(2)(iii)(B) (2) and (3). Their content remains the same.Third, proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B)(2) is being rewritten as paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(B)(4). The word ``bar'' is changed to the more descriptiveword ``track,'' and OSHA is clarifying the fact that when the guide trackinitially engages the first building anchor a gap in the continuous engagementwill occur. Fourth, the proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B)(3) is being rewrittenas paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B)(6), since OSHA agrees with Hoberg's (EX. 19B)comment that the proposed provision does not properly address the loadingof button guide stabilization system components. This commenter suggestedthat the paragraph be changed to insure that the anchor and building componentsbe capable of sustaining without damage at least the weight of the platform.If this capability is not provided, then provisions must be made in theguide tracks or guide track connectors to prevent the platform and itsattachments from transmitting the weight of the platform to the anchorand building components. In addition to these specific requirements, OSHA notes that a number ofother provisions in the final rule generally address the issues raisedwith regard to button guide stabilization systems. These provisions includeparagraph (e)(1)(i), which addresses design of any building installationby a registered professional engineer, and paragraphs (i)(1)(i) and (i)(1)(ii),which address the training of employees operating powered platforms. Requirements for powered platform installations, where the suspended portionof the equipment does not exceed 130 feet (39.6 m) above a safe surface,were set out in proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(c). A number of commenters(EX. 9-22, -23, -28, -34, -35; 15-8, -14; 88) and persons who gave hearingtestimony (TR 2/19, pp. 96, 103; TR 2/20, pp. 23, 333) addressed this provision.The primary issues raised were the 14-inch (355.6 mm) limit on platformdisplacement and the wind velocity criteria of 40 miles per hour (64.3km/hr). Daigel (EX. 9-22, 15-14, TR 2/20, p. 333) raised the same objections tothe 14-inch (355.6 mm) limit on platform displacement in proposed paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(C) as he had on this same limit in proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A).Hoberg (EX. 19B) also recommended that OSHA delete the proposed 14-inch(355.6 mm) limit on platform displacement, since it is the rate of displacementand not the displacement distance that would affect a worker's stabilizationin a suspended platform. Since the rate of displacement is so variableand the assignment of a numerical limit is not feasible, this commentersuggested that OSHA require that the installation be designed to preventsudden movement of the platform. After considering this new data presentedby the commenters on the proposed 14-inch (355.6 mm) limit, OSHA findsthat platform displacement is due to many factors and thus OSHA is deletingthis requirement in the Final Rule and substituting performance languagefor controlling the platform displacement. Several commenters (EX. 9-23, 9-34, 9-35; 15-14) and a hearing participant(TR 2/20, p. 23) objected to the 40 miles per hour (64.3 km/hr) wind velocitycriterion in the proposed requirement (e)(2)(iii)(c). These commentersbelieved it is an unsafe practice to require employees to work on a platformwhen exposed to winds of this velocity. OSHA is deleting the velocity criterionin the Final Rule for the same reasons that were given in the deletionof this same criterion in proposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A). Hoberg (EX. 19B, 88; TR 2/19, p. 96) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8)recommended that OSHA retain the requirement in the present standard fora minimum angulation force of 10 pounds (44.4 N) as required in the proposedparagraph (e)(2)(iii)(C). Hoberg stated that such a requirement would ensurethere is a force available of given magnitude that can resist the lateralmovement of the platform caused by employees walking on the platform. Thiscommenter stated that, from his own experience, such a requirement is feasibleeven at the bottom of a 130-foot (39.6 m) drop. The 10-pound force (44.4N), he continued, may be obtained by tie-backs or any other feasible methodapplicable to the installation. OSHA agrees with these commenters that the platform should remain in contactwith the building facade with a force of not less than 10 pounds (44.4N), and this provision is retained in the Final Rule. Such a provisionwill ensure platform stabilization for employees working on platform installationswith suspensions of less than 130 feet (39.6 m) without tie-ins to thebuilding facade. Such a provision will also address Leonard Nork's (TR2/20, p. 23) concern for employee safety on such installations becauseof the lack of tie-ins. Since OSHA has decided that the scope of the Final Rule will cover platforminstallations used in the interiors of buildings (atriums) which have areasrequiring maintenance, platform stabilization in this environment is addressedby this standard. Comments received on proposed stabilization provisionsfor platforms used on building exteriors concluded that employee movementon the platform contributed to platform displacement and an unsafe worksurface. Tie-in guides and other equivalent methods are required in thefinal rule for the purpose of addressing this employee movement on exteriorplatforms. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 17), Daigel (EX. 9-31), and the TennesseeValley Administration (EX. 14-3) concur in the need for a similar stabilityrequirement for platforms used in atriums. Although a continuous or intermittenttie-in may not be necessary in an atrium because wind conditions are nota factor, they recommended that the platform be tied off at each work stationto ensure platform stability. Hoberg noted that a restraint is necessarybecause of the extensive platform movement that results from employeespushing off from a work surface or from walking on the platform duringwork activities. OSHA agrees that a tie-off of the platform at each work station is onemethod of providing stability in an atrium environment, but it is not theonly method. OSHA believes that the building owner should have the optionof utilizing stabilization methods generally used for exterior environmentsif one of these methods serve his purpose. OSHA, therefore, is providingthis flexibility in selecting a stabilization method in paragraph (e)(2)(iv).Guarding requirements for employees working on roofs while performing exteriorbuilding maintenance were proposed in paragraph (e)(3).Proposed paragraph (e)(3)(i) provided that guarding be provided on theroof perimeter to protect employees from falling while they were performingexterior building maintenance. This guarding was to have met the provisionsof Subpart D of 29 CFR 1910. In the Final Rule, paragraph (e)(3)(i) referencesa specific standard, rather than all of Subpart D, to provide a more specificreference in the current General Industry Standards.Several commenters (EX. 15-23, 57, 87) and persons who gave testimony atthe hearing (TR 2/21, pp. 19, 26, 28) addressed paragraph (e)(3)(ii). RaymondHorvath (TR 2/21, p. 19) noted that the referenced Subpart D of Part 1910in the proposed provision does not address the required horizontal distanceof the perimeter roof guard from the face of the building being serviced.This commenter also noted that the ANSI draft standard A120.1_January 1986(EX. 15-8) requires 12 inches (309 mm) for this horizontal distance, buthe believed that this distance is insufficient because many parapet wallsare in excess of 12 inches thick. If a builder were strictly to complywith a 12-inch (309 mm) distance in these cases, a guard rail (perimeterroof guard) would require bends or angles, at additional cost, or the guardrail would have to penetrate the top of the parapet.For feasibility and with due regard to employee safety, Mr. Horvath recommendedthat the perimeter roof guard be located no less than six inches (152 mm)inboard of the inside face of the parapet wall or roof edge curb of thebuilding being serviced. Further, he recommended that the location of thisguard not exceed 18 inches (457 mm) from the exterior building face.Lawrence R. Stafford (TR 2/21, p. 28) agreed with Mr. Horvath on the 18-inch(457 mm) limit, since any larger dimension could conceivably inhibit theuse of davit installations. Mr. Stafford also agreed that bending of aguardrail above a parapet is undesirable, since it would provide a ledgeon the inboard side of the guardrail and thus reduce the effective heightof the guardrail if a person were to stand on the ledge.OSHA agrees with these commenters and is modifying the perimeter roof guardprovision in the final rule under (e)(3)(ii) to conform with Mr. Horvath'srecommendation, for the purpose of affording feasibility in complying withthe perimeter roof guarding requirements.Powered Platforms Manufacturing Company (EX. 9-23) suggested that proposedparagraph (e)(4), which addresses stops for trackless equipment, requirestops only if an event could occur that would cause hazardous conditionsfor employees. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8), in his submission of theANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986, recommended that equipment stopsbe required by OSHA for trackless type equipment. Hoberg (EX. 19B, 19C)recommended that OSHA require equipment stops for the purpose of protectingemployees from a crushing or shearing hazard if equipment should leaveits intended travel areas.OSHA agrees that a requirement for equipment stops should be included forthree reasons. First, if trackless equipment should leave its designatedareas, a hazard could result for employees due to a structural failureof the roof when the equipment is moved away from its structural support.Second, since most trackless surfaces are concrete slabs mounted on a roof,equipment dropping from this surface could create a pinch, crush or fallhazard for employees. Third, an employee could be trapped between a walland the equipment if the equipment moved away from its designated path.In addition to retaining the requirement for equipment stops (e)(4), inthe final rule, OSHA is addressing the crushing and shearing hazard foremployees, and removing the redundant proposed phrase ``or being positioned.''Acme Fabricators Inc. (EX. 9-13) supported the need to provide safe areasfor maintenance and storage of carriages as proposed in paragraph (e)(5).Hoberg (EX. 19B) concurred and also suggested replacing the words ``supportedequipment'' with ``suspended equipment'' for clarity and for consistencywith the definition of trolley carriage, in the Final Rule.OSHA agrees and the appropriate revisions are made in the Final Rule inparagraph (e)(5).Several commenters (EX. 15-8, 19B, 57) supported the need for tie-downanchors to be of noncorrosive metal as proposed in paragraph (e)(7). DouglasA. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) would also require inspection of these anchorsfor compliance with design requirements by a registered professional engineer,followed by an inspection report. Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested clarifyinglanguage to improve the meaning of the provision.OSHA agrees to clarify the provision in the Final Rule as suggested byHoberg. However, OSHA believes that a requirement for an inspection ofthe anchors would be unnecessary, since the building installation requirementsare to be designed by a registered professional engineer under paragraph(e)(1)(i), the employer would have to be assured by the building ownerthat the installation has met those requirements under paragraph (c) inthe Final Rule, and there is no evidence indicating failure of anchors.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 196) suggested deleting the requirement forcable stabilization in proposed paragraphs (e)(8)(i) and (e)(8)(ii), sincehe believed this was a design function. However, a number of commenters(EX. 9-13, 9-31, 9-41; 15-4, 15-8; 19B, 19-C; 57) supported the need forthe stabilization of cables and hanging lifelines. Lawrence R. Stafford(EX. 15-4) noted that such stabilization will prevent these cables andlifelines from creating an employee hazard as a result of striking buildingglass areas. Richard W. Hoffman (EX. 57) commented that strong winds actingon a lifeline can move employees to the leeward side of a platform andseverely limit their movements. Daigel (EX. 9-31) recommended deletingthe phrase ``any other force'' in the provision, while Hoberg (EX. 19B)suggested that paragraphs (e)(8)(i) and (e)(8)(ii) be combined becauseof their similarity.OSHA agrees that the proposed requirement for cable and lifeline stabilizationshould be retained in the Final Rule. In addition to the reasons expressedby commenters in support of this requirement, OSHA believes that stabilizationwill help to further reduce employee hazards by reducing the abrasion ofcables and lifelines. The stabilization of cables and lifelines can beprovided by any method which limits their displacement by wind or otherforces. OSHA also agrees to combine proposed paragraphs (e)(9)(i) and (e)(8)(ii)in the Final Rule into a new paragraph (e)(8)(i) for the purpose of reducingverbiage.Several commenters (EX. 15-8, 19B, TR 2/20, p. 334) supported the proposedstabilization requirement for tensioned hanging cable in paragraph (e)(8)(iii).Acme Fabricators Inc. (EX. 9-13) also supported the need for this requirementbut suggested that stabilization be provided at the more frequent intervalsof 200 foot (61 m) rather than the proposed 600 foot (183 m). Swing StageInc. (EX. 9-29) questioned the need for this requirement since it believedthat unstabilized tensioned cables might mark a building face but not affectthe safety of employees on the platform.OSHA believes it is necessary for these cables to be stabilized for a numberof reasons. First, many of these cables are brought directly over a parapetand can become chafed through movement since they are adjacent to the buildingface. Second, if these cables become damaged, employees may be exposedto shock hazards from failed power conductors. Third, on high buildingswind forces can be greater on these cables than on the platform itself.Finally, the tensioned cables need to be stabilized so as to prevent thetension from interfering with the overload limiting devices on the hoistingcables.OSHA cannot support the need for cable stabilization at the more frequentintervals of 200 foot (61 m) rather than the proposed 600 foot (183 m),since there is no evidence that a hazard exists when tensioned cables arestabilized at 600 foot (183 m). The requirement remains unchanged in theFinal Rule and is renumbered as paragraph (e)(8)(ii).A significant number of commenters (EX. 9-25, 9-37, 9-45; 14-3; 15-8; 19B;65-20) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/19, pp. 55, 63; TR 2/20, pp. 24, 35,54, 65, 84, 109, 496) recommended that OSHA require a written emergencyaction plan for employees in lieu of communicating such a plan orally asin proposed paragraph (e)(9). Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37) believed theplan should be written to assure that it has been thought out in advanceand that the plan has been accurately communicated to employees. Hoberg(2/19, p. 63) noted that few employees remember an oral plan during anemergency and suggested that the written plans be kept at the manned communicationfacility in the building along with the emergency phone numbers and equipmentlogs. Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, p. 24) stated that employees should be givena written copy of the emergency action plan for their training to insureproper implementation of the plan. Mr. Nork also suggested that a recordbe kept of the employee who had been trained in these emergency proceduresand the name of the instructor who performed the training. Other commenters(EX. 14-3, 9-45) and a hearing participant (TR 2/20, p. 84) observed thatit was especially important to utilize written emergency action plans forbuilding work sites having complicated atriums and exterior facades. OSHA did not receive any comments which supported the use of oral methodsrather than written methods in the training of employees in an emergencyaction plan. OSHA has considered the comments received on this issue and agrees thatwritten emergency action plans are necessary for employees who use poweredplatforms. The work site of a powered platform may require unusual methodsto correct a hazardous situation and employees must be knowledgeable inthese methods to prevent further risk or injury. Such knowledge would bedifficult for employees to retain over a period of time without referenceto a written plan, since many buildings are maintained on three- and six-monthcycles. OSHA believes that if employees are made aware of and have readyaccess to the emergency procedures that would be necessary if they havean accident on a suspended powered platform, they will have a heightenedawareness of the need to follow safe procedures and use fall arrest equipmentat all times. Accordingly, OSHA is revising proposed paragraph (e)(9) in the Final Rule.The revision requires employers to develop and implement emergency proceduresthrough the use of written emergency action plans. The plan must explainthe procedures to be followed by employees when emergencies occur duringplatform operations. In addition, the plan is required to explain to employeesthat they inform themselves about the building emergency escape routes,procedures and alarm systems before they operate a platform to servicethe building. OSHA is removing the word ``exterior'' in the Final Rule as it was proposedin paragraph (e)(11), since the scope of this standard is changed to includeinterior building maintenance. The National Conference of States on Building Codes and Standards (NCSBCS)(EX. 9-15) questioned the need for OSHA to address voltage drop for buildingelectrical wiring in paragraph (e)(11)(ii), since it is currently addressedin the National Electrical Code. Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 15-4) and theTennessee Valley Administration (EX. 14-3) argued that OSHA should addressvoltage drop in the standard since the National Electrical Code may changeand the desired requirements would be lost. In response to these comments,OSHA notes that the National Electrical Code is no longer referenced inSubpart S (Electrical) of OSHA's General Industry Standards and therefore,the subject of voltage drop was addressed in the proposal. It was the intentof the provision to ensure that proper voltage is available at the electricaloutlets to ensure reliable platform operation. Low voltage may reduce liftingcapacity of the hoist and/or may cause overheating. High voltage may increasetorque and the lifting capacity beyond the overload limit settings. Hoberg (EX. 19B, TR 2/19, p. 63) agreed that the proposed provision requiringthe voltage drop to be limited to five percent is reasonable. However,he contended that the control of equipment voltage is often beyond thecapability of the employer or building owner to correct. This commentersuggested that the voltage drop addressed in the standard should be measuredfrom the building service vault and not from the power circuit outlet.It was his belief that it is only possible to ensure that the buildingelectrical wiring be of such capacity that when full load is applied tothe equipment power circuit, not more than a five percent drop from buildingservice vault voltage shall occur at any power circuit outlet. OSHA agrees and proposed paragraph (e)(11)(ii) is revised in the FinalRule to reflect this change in measurement of the voltage drop. Paragraph (e)(11)(iii) requires that the equipment power circuit be anindependent electrical circuit separate from other equipment used withinor on the building. Powered platforms often require nearly all the poweravailable on a roof circuit. Inadvertent use of a power tool or other equipmenton a circuit while the platform hoists are using that circuit can tripthe overcurrent protection of the circuit, stranding the platform personnel.The National Conference of States on Building Codes and Standards (EX.9-15) suggested that this requirement be incorporated in the National ElectricalCode (NEC) in lieu of the standard. However, OSHA does not control therequirements listed in the NEC and no longer references the NEC in itsstandard. Therefore, the provision is retained as proposed in the FinalRule. As proposed, paragraph (e)(11)(iv) would have required that the disconnectswitch for the power circuit have the capability of being locked in the``off'' position. This provides the employees with the capability of preventingunauthorized operation of the platform. Hoberg (EX. 19B, TR 2/19, p. 64)recommended that the provision should also require that the disconnectswitch have the capability of being secured in the ``ON'' position. Henoted that this capability is important during equipment operation whenworkers are suspended over the side of the building and are not near thedisconnect switch. The disconnect switch should then be secured in the``ON'' position so that power cannot be inadvertently interrupted. The New York State Department of Labor (EX. 87) concurred with Mr. Hoberg.The New York Advisory Standard andplusmin;101 requires that means be providedso that all switches are locked in the ``ON'' position while a platformis in use. OSHA agrees with the commenters and proposed paragraph (e)(11)(iv) is revisedin the Final Rule to require a disconnect switch to have the capabilityto be locked both in the ``ON'' and ``OFF'' positions and also requiresthat the disconnect switch be locked in the ``ON'' position when the platformis in use. OSHA requested specific comment on the feasibility of the requirement inproposed paragraph (e)(11)(vi) that electrical service receptacles notbe located on the parapet side of the carriage. Several commenters (EX.9-30, 9-31, 9-41; 19B) and a hearing witness (TR 2/19, p. 54) recommendedthat this prohibition be deleted for a number of reasons. First, receptacleslocated on the parapet side are on the side of the roof carriage wherethe operator is looking while aligning the carriage with the edge of thebuilding. While this aligning is being done, the power cable is in sightand serves as a continuous reminder to the operator not to run over it.Second, receptacles located on the parapet are above the flashing so workersnever have to stand in water or shovel out snow to make an electrical connection.This potentially dangerous condition could occur, however, if non-parapetreceptacles were used. Third, curbs are required in the standard to preventroof carriages from traveling outside intended travel areas. OSHA agrees with these commenters and is deleting this paragraph in theFinal Rule. Deletion of this paragraph will also permit the employer and/orowner of the building to locate the receptacles in the optimum locationfor feasibility and employee safety.Paragraph (f)(1) introduces the general requirements for equipment usedfor building maintenance. Since this standard is to apply to exterior andinterior building maintenance, the word ``exterior'' in the proposal isremoved in the final rule. No comments were received on proposed paragraphs(f)(3)(i)(B), (f)(3)(i)(D), (f)(3)(i)(F), (f)(3)(i)(G), (f)(3(i)(K), (f)(3)(i)(L),(f)(3)(i)(N). The discussion of each of these provisions is found in thepreamble of the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking of January 22, 1985 (50 FR2890) on page 2912. A commenter (EX. 31) and hearing witness (TR 2/23, p. 314) supported therequirement in paragraph (f)(1)(i) that equipment shall be designed byor under the direction of a registered professional engineer. However,another commenter (EX. 9-28) and hearing participant (TR 2/20, p. 331)claimed that this requirement as proposed was not complete, since the proposeddefinition of equipment only referred to the platform. These commentersbelieved that the entire equipment installation should be engineered toassure compatibility with the building on which it is installed. An equipmentinstallation, in their opinion, would include carriages, davits and outriggers.OSHA agrees with these commenters, and is changing the requirement in theFinal Rule for paragraphs (f)(1) and (f)(1)(i) to address all equipmentin powered platform installations. In addition, OSHA notes that for equipmentinstallations, guidelines for the design criteria are needed by the engineer.OSHA is adding to Appendix A a list of organizations which have establishednationally recognized design standards applicable to powered platforms.The basis for this list was discussed above under paragraph (e)(1)(i) inthis preamble. Several commenters (EX. 9-17, 9-31, 9-34) recommended that the minimumlive load of 250 pounds (11.2 kg) for each occupant of a platform proposedin paragraph (f)(1)(ii) be revised to include the weight of the occupantsand any tools and materials used on the platform. Douglas A. Greenaway(EX. 15-8), recommended that OSHA retain the requirement for occupant loadingas proposed. In response to the commenters, OSHA notes that the common load capacitiesof equipment made in the United States are in increments of 250 pounds(11.2 kg), starting at 500 pounds (22.4 kg). In addition, the average adultmale does not weigh more than 180 pounds (8.1 kg) and adding tools, equipmentand materials per occupant would probably only raise the load to approximately210 pounds (9.4 kg). The live load factor raises this to 250 pounds (11.2kg), which is a conservative total. The provision, therefore, is unchangedin the Final Rule. A number of commenters (EX. 9-35, 9-43, 15-8, 19B) and a hearing testifier(TR 2/19, p. 65) recommended that the minimum storage wind design loadproposed in paragraph (f)(1)(iii) be changed from forces generated by a75 mile per hour (33.5 m/s) wind to forces generated by a 100 mile perhour (44.7 m/s) wind. Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 9-35), Hoberg (EX. 19B),and Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) noted that 100 mile per hourwinds are not uncommon on some building roofs and many local building codesrequire higher loads. In addition, many modern buildings do not have thewind protection for exposed equipment that the older flat-topped buildingshave. OSHA agrees with these commenters and further observes that winddamage to equipment may put employees at risk from equipment failure duringlater operations. This provision is revised in the Final Rule to addressforces generated by a 100 mile per hour (44.7 m/s) wind. Paragraph (f)(1)(iv) as proposed had required equipment installations exposedto wind during operation to have the capability of withstanding forcesgenerated by winds of 60 miles per hour (26.9 m/s). This provision wasbased on a proposed limitation on employee exposure to 40 miles per hour(17.9 m/s) winds while operating a continuous positively engaged platform.Since OSHA has agreed with previous commenters that employees should notbe exposed to winds in excess of 25 miles per hour (11.2 m/s) while operatinga platform, the 60 miles per hour (26.9 m/s) proposed requirement can bereduced appropriately. Therefore, OSHA is in agreement with several commenters(EX. 9-31, 9-35, 9-41, 15-8) who have recommended that the proposed 60miles per hour (26.9 m/s) requirement be changed to 50 miles per hour (22.4m/s) in paragraph (f)(1)(iv). Bolted connections were required to be self-locking or secured to preventloosening by vibration in proposed paragraph (f)(2). Hoberg (EX. 19B) notedthat the only reliable methods to prevent loosening of connections by vibrationare design and torque. By contrast, he noted that lock nuts and other devicescan prevent loss of the connections by vibration. This commenter suggestedthat the provision be revised to address loss rather than loosening byvibration. OSHA agrees and this provision is so changed in the Final Rule.The California Department of Industrial Relations (EX. 9-45) suggestedthat OSHA require that fasteners and platform components be made of materialssuitable for exterior maintenance and galvanically compatible with oneanother, under paragraph (f)(2). It was also suggested (EX. 19B) that OSHAalso require that the equipment comply with recognized standards for designand construction under paragraph (f)(2). In response to these commenters,OSHA notes that provision (f)(1)(i) requires that the equipment be designedby a registered professional engineer experienced in such design. It canbe expected that such a qualified person would be familiar with the materialsand standards for such equipment installations. In addition, a list ofrecognized standards applicable to this equipment has been provided inAppendix A. The paragraph (f)(2), therefore, has not been changed in theFinal Rule. Proposed paragraph (f)(3) listed a number of methods for suspending equipment,and also permitted equivalent methods of suspension. Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommendedthe deletion of the trolley system method since it is redundant. OSHA agrees,since the listed carriage method would also include trolley carriages,and the deletion is made in the Final Rule. Two commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-41) suggested deleting the term ``equivalentmethods'' and would have OSHA use the variance process to address nonlistedmethods of suspension. OSHA believes that the proposed provision adequatelyplaces the responsibility on the employer for proving to OSHA that anynew suspension method is equivalent to the listed methods, without usingthe variance process. Also, this provision, as proposed, will not inhibitan employer from developing new suspension methods. It remains unchangedin the Final Rule. A number of commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-35, 9-37, 9-43; 19B) objected to thewording in the proposed introductory paragraph (f)(3)(i) for carriage requirementswhich included a description of how a carriage may be used. They statedthere is an implication that it is the only way it can be used. In addition,there was the implication that if all elements noted in the descriptionwere not included on an installation, a violation of the regulation wouldexist. It was recommended (EX. 19B) that the provision be replaced witha more suitable introduction for carriage requirements. OSHA agrees thatthe proposed wording in the introductory paragraph may unnecessarily implya limit on the use of a carriage, and therefore has changed the wordingin the Final Rule. Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(A) required that the horizontal movement ofa carriage be controlled to ensure safe operation. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p.66) stated that this provision does not address the shear or crush hazardfor employees due to a moving carriage when one operator has his or herattention directed to alignment, and the other operator is watching thecable or aiding in the alignment. The commenter recommended that the carriagehave a control to interrupt power should an operator be caught betweena wall or parapet and the machine. OSHA agrees that such a hazard can occurand is adding this requirement in paragraph (f)(3)(i)(E) in the Final Ruleto address this hazard.The maximum allowable horizontal force necessary for an employee to movea manually propelled carriage is addressed in paragraph (f)(3)(i)(C). OSHAagrees with comments which noted there are a number of hazards for employeespushing carriages at applicable elevated areas. These hazards include pinching,falling, tripping, and strain on the worker during the pushing operation.These hazards are further compounded by a work surface which may be slipperydue to rain, ice and snow, or sloped due to drainage requirements. OSHAhad proposed a limitation of 100 pounds (444.8 N) for the maximum allowableforce needed for horizontal movement. Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, pp. 24, 56)objected to the use of any manually propelled carriage because of the surfacehazards faced by employees. This commenter also believed that if manuallypropelled carriages were used, the 100 pounds (444.8 N) force should bereduced since it discriminated against female and older employees who generallydo not possess the necessary strength to move such carriages. Hoberg (TR2/19, pp. 66, 106, EX. 19B) also questioned the 100 pound (444.8 N) limit.In his review of Human Factors data (data utilized in the designing ofequipment for human use) and their application to pushing a manually propelledcarriage, he calculated that the limit should be changed from a 100 pound(444.8 N) force to a 40 pound (177.9 N) force. Hoberg's calculations werebased on data developed by Stover H. Snook (1978) for industrial workers,which is illustrated in <T3>Human Factors Engineering and Design, </T3>fifth edition, publishedin 1982 by McCormick and Sanders, figure 7-24, page 210, and verified byHoberg's own experience in designing roof carriages. The proposed limit of a 100 pounds (444.8 N) horizontal force was basedon the ANSI A120 draft standard_November 1981. In a review of current relevantHuman Factors data, OSHA did not locate any information which supportedthe 100 pound (444.8 N) limit. OSHA agrees that the Human Factors data,as referenced by Hoberg (TR 2/19, pp. 66, 106) in his comments supportinga 40 pounds (177.9 N) limit, are applicable to the work done by employeespushing a manually propelled carriage on a smooth level surface. Importantly, the published data supporting this limit in the text referencedabove are readily obtainable by the registered professional engineer indeveloping his criteria for a platform installation. In the Final Rule,therefore, OSHA is changing the 100 pounds (444.8 N) limit on the horizontalforce required of employees in pushing a carriage to a 40 pounds (177.9N) limit. Paragraph (f)(3)(i)(E) addresses requirements for traversing controls ofa powered roof carriage. Lee B. Herzog (EX. 9-29) and Hoberg (EXH. 19B)each recommended that this provision should require an emergency stop devicefor interrupting power to the carriage drive motors. These commenters gaveseveral reasons for this recommendation. First, during alignment with roofindicators to ensure proper placement of the carriage with respect to thebuilding tie-in guides, it is not uncommon for a second employee to beon the other side of the carriage, unseen by the operator, helping to directthe carriage movement. Second, roofs often are noisy, due to the noisefrom chiller fans, pumps and other running equipment; and warnings oftencannot be heard. Third, large carriages may weigh as much as 40 tons (36,363kg), have several drive motors, and have the capability of moving in eitherdirection. Fourth, these carriages generally operate in very tight areas,especially when moving into a garage. In this type of working environment,these commenters believed it is essential that the employee who is notoperating the carriage have access to an overriding stop button oppositethe control end of the carriage, which will stop the carriage if a shearor crush hazard exists. OSHA agrees with these commenters and the emergencystop devices are required in the Final Rule. Paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(1) addresses the stability factor of a carriageagainst overturning during horizontal traversing. Lee B. Herzog (EX. 9-29)and Hoberg (EX. 19B, 19c) recommended that the stability factor includethe effects of wind forces as well as the effects of impact which werealready included in the proposal. The commenters observed that if a platformis carried outside the wheelbase of a carriage, it could overturn. Sincethe load of a platform is carried by the carriage at the suspension pointsoverhead, whenever the carriage strikes a curb the resulting impact canseverely affect the stability of the carriage. The crush and pinch hazardsfor employees which could result from this impact were addressed in theproposed paragraph. These commenters noted, however, that the wind forceson such a suspended platform can also greatly reduce the stability of thecarriage and introduce crush and pinch hazards for employees, and theybelieved that these wind forces should also be addressed in this provision.OSHA agrees and the effect of wind on carriage stability is addressed inthe Final Rule in paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(1). Several comments were received on the stability factor of a carriage duringthe operation of a system as addressed in proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(2),which would have required a stability factor of four against overturning.Acme Fabricators Company (EX. 9-13) supported the proposed stability factor.Richard W. Hoffman (EX. 9-30) believed the stability factor should be threerather than four. Hoberg (EX. 19B) noted, however, that under certain conditionsthe stability factor of four in the proposal can be seriously exceededat hoist motor stall, and the carriage can overturn. His concern was thatthe proposed provision addressed operating loads, but did not address thegreatest source of overturning force, motor torque, which is addressedin the present regulation. He suggested that OSHA retain the present requirementsfor roof carriage stability, andSection; 1910.66(c)(3) (ii) and (iii), andalso prohibit the use of flowing counter weights. These weights have beenused to achieve proper stability, but have resulted in fatalities. OSHA agrees that the regulation should ensure that the suspended equipmentand the hoists do not pull the carriage over the side. The installationshould be so designed that no source of force, such as motor torque, canupset the carriage, and flowing counter weights should not be necessaryto achieve stability. In the Final Rule, new paragraphs (f)(3)(i)(M) and (f)(3)(i)(G)(2) replaceproposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(2). The new paragraphs are a clarificationof the present requirements under andSection; 1910.66(c)(3) (ii) and (iii)relating to stability factors for carriages. Paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(2)addresses the overturning criteria and the design stresses which may notbe exceeded in the installation. Paragraph (f)(3)(i)(M) addresses the forcesimposed on the hoist motors by the installation.In a number of platform installations, the carriage system's stabilityis provided by a tie-down device secured to the building structure. Thisstability option was not addressed in the proposal and OSHA requested commentson the feasibility and utility of this option in the Notice of Hearing(50 FR 48222). A number of commenters (EX. 9-29, 9-31, 9-41; 15-4) anda hearing witness recommended that OSHA address this option in the standard.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 198) noted that the carriage tie-downs arenormally utilized in conjunction with rubber tired roof carriages runningon concrete runways. Mr. Fortune noted that the purpose of the tie-downis to give the carriage system the required safety factor against overturning,without having to add excessive amounts of counterweights. Mr. Fortuneand the other commenters also recommended that the tie-down be equippedwith an interlock that will not permit vertical platform movement unlessthe interlock is engaged. OSHA agrees with these commenters and a provisionon tie-downs is included in the Final Rule as paragraph (f)(3)(i)(G)(3).In the proposal, at paragraph (f)(3)(i)(I), an automatic brake or lockingsystem was required for preventing unintentional traversing of power traversedcarriages. Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43), Douglas A. Greenaway(EX. 15-8), and Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested that the intent of the provisionwould be better served if OSHA issued a more general requirement. In addition,Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested that power assisted carriages should also beincluded in this provision. OSHA agrees that an automatic brake or lock would not be the only acceptablemeans of preventing the carriage from traversing unintentionally. However,from a performance point of view, OSHA can accept only equivalent meansthat are used to prevent the carriage from inadvertent movement which couldinjure an employee. The provision is changed in the Final Rule by eliminatingthe specific requirement, and it is also renumbered as paragraph (f)(3)(i)(H).For the same reasons, proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(j) which addressed themeans to prevent unintentional traversing of manually propelled carriagesis also changed in the Final Rule. Any equivalent means which will preventinadvertent movement of the carriage is acceptable, and this revised paragraphis renumbered as paragraph (f)(3)(i)(I). Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(K) is unchanged in the Final Rule and renumberedas paragraph (f)(3)(i)(j). Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(L) is unchanged in the Final Rule and renumberedas paragraph (f)(3)(i)(K). Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(i)(M) is unchanged in the Final Rule and renumberedas paragraph (f)(3)(i)(L). OSHA is deleting from the Final Rule the provisions addressing trolleysystems which had been proposed as (f)(3)(ii), (f)(3)(ii)(A) and (f)(3)(ii)(B)because they are redundant with other provisions. A number of commenters (Ex. 9-13, 9-23, 9-37; 15-8, 15-22 and a hearingwitness (TR 2/19, p. 193) supported the proposed height limits for transportableoutriggers when used with a ground rigged platform, paragraph (f)(3)(ii).The Acme Fabricators Company (EX. 9-13) and Douglas A. Greenway (Ex. 15-8)agree that an outrigger installation with points of suspension in excessof 130 foot (39.6 m) and below 300 foot (91.5 m) should provide continuouspositive means of engagement for the platform. Some commenters (EX. 9-31,9-41) suggested that the 300 foot (91.5 m) limit should be 150-200 foot(45.8 m) because of the possible exposure by employees during the riggingoperations to wind gusts in excess of 25 miles per hour (40.2 km/hr.).OSHA has not received any accident data or other evidence which supportsthe need for reducing the 300 foot (91.5 m) limit. In addition, OSHA doesnot expect employers to put employees at risk by rigging in high windsand in violation of operating wind limits (paragraph (i)(2)(v)). The suspensionheight limits, therefore, are unchanged in the Final Rule. In the Notice of Informal Hearing (50 FR 48222) published on November 22,1985, OSHA requested comments on whether it should permit the 300 foot(91.5 m) limit on the outrigger installations, provided some mechanicalmeans is provided to raise and lower cables, life lines and wire rope.OSHA received a diversity of comments on this issue. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p.241) suggested that no more than 40 pounds (177.9 N) of manual effort shouldbe required of employees to raise or lower lines whether or not they aremechanically assisted. James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 189) noted that Californiaregulations require mechanical assistance for employees in rigging installationsover 130 foot (39.6 m) in height. This commenter believed these  regulationshad some merit since working conditions can be hazardous for employeesin handling lines over a parapet. Other commenters (EX. 9-20, 9-23, 15-22), however, have experienced noproblems for employees in handling lines in these installations for suspensionheights up to 300 foot (91.5 m). Designed Equipment Corporation (EXH. 15-22),for example, stated that lengths of electrical cable used at 300 feet (91.5m) heights weigh less than 100 pounds (45.3 kg), and employees have notexperienced any difficulty in handling these cables. OSHA believes employers should be concerned with the effort required oftheir employees to lift electrical cables and lines when rigging for anoutrigger installation. The need for mechanical assistance in this operationfor employees would vary considerably depending on the weight of the lineor cable, the height of the parapet, the condition of the work surface,and the age and physical condition of the specific employee involved inthe operation. Sufficient Human Factors data is not available for OSHAto specify a limit on the weight of cable and lines an employee may raisefrom ground level without mechanical assistance, and therefore, such alimit is not included in the Final Rule. Paragraph (f)(3)(ii)(A) sets the suspension height limits for transportableoutriggers at 300 foot (91.5 m), and references the tie-in guides in paragraph(e)(2) of the standard. The reference to the tie-in guide systems providesoptions for the employer in selecting the means for stabilizing the platform.Several commenters (EX. 9-25, 9-31, 9-35, 9-41; 15-8; 19B) recommendedthat OSHA eliminate the proposed requirement which addressed the storageof ground rigged platforms on the face of a building after each day's use.Leonard Nork (EX. 9-25) stated that such platforms are difficult to tiein safely overnight and are subject to unpredicted overnight storms. Anothercommenter (EX. 19B) agreed and noted that this practice would require anchoragesto be designed for storm loads; prevent inspections of suspension ropes,cables and lifelines before use; and promote exiting of platforms by employeesat elevated levels without fall arrest equipment. OSHA agrees with thecommenters that platform storage on a building face can impose additionalhazards on employees.The requirements for disengagement of ground rigged working platforms whichprohibit the practice of storing ground rigged platforms on the face ofa building after each day's use are listed below under paragraph (f)(5)(iv)(B).Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(B) which would have permitted this practiceis revised and renumbered to be (f)(3)(ii)(B) in the Final Rule. Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) have statedthat if an anchorage for an outrigger is to be verified as to its suitabilityfor use as an outrigger anchorage, then it should be so designed. However,they noted that the proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(C) did not include adesign reference. OSHA agrees with the commenters that a clarificationis warranted, and is including the design reference in the Final Rule.In addition, this paragraph is renumbered as (f)(3)(ii)(C). No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(D), and thisparagraph is renumbered as (f)(3)(ii)(D) in the Final Rule. The discussionof this provision is found on page 2899 in the preamble of the Notice ofProposed Rulemaking of January 22, 1985 (50 FR 2890). OSHA proposed in (f)(3)(iii)(E) that a transportable outrigger be designedto prevent roll-over. Several commenters (EX. 19C, 9-37, 9-43) and a hearingwitness (TR 2/19, p. 68) stated that the accidental lateral load addressedin the provision is difficult to determine in advance, but suggested areasonable load be stated in the provision. One commenter (TR 2/19, p.68) observed that the greatest potential source of roll-over is the hoist.He noted that the worst condition to be considered is when the outriggersare incorrectly spaced. Under this condition, the suspension ropes angletowards the center of the platform and this angle increases as the platformascends. As a result, the hoist generates a roll-over force as the outriggersare drawn together. This commenter recommended that the outriggers be designedto prevent roll-over from a force of at least 70 percent of the rated loadof the hoist. OSHA agrees with the commenter's recommendation for lateral load in thislateral stability requirement, and this is included in the Final Rule.In addition, the paragraph is renumbered (f)(3)(ii)(E). No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(G). However,OSHA is replacing the word ``capacity'' in the paragraph with the word``load'' to ensure consistency with the definition of the ``hoist ratedload.'' In addition, the paragraph is renumbered as (f)(3)(ii)(F). No commentswere received on proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(G), and the paragraph isrenumbered as (f)(3)(ii)(G). A number of commenters (EX. 9-35, 9-45; 15-8) strongly suggested that OSHAadd requirements for outrigger tiebacks. The California Department of IndustrialRelations (EX. 9-45) noted that such tieback requirements have been inSection 3292(f) of California's General Industry Safety Orders since 1965(EX. 104). This commenter stated that the cost of providing tieback anchorageis incidental during the construction of the building, especially whenone considers the safety benefits gained from having such anchorages. LawrenceR. Stafford (EX. 9-35) suggested that OSHA follow the ANSI A120 draft standard_January1986 (EX. 15-8) which requires that the tieback be a wire rope with a minimumdiameter of \5/16\-inch (8.0 mm). OSHA agrees with these commenters that tiebacks for transportable outriggersare necessary, since they would provide a back-up system in case the counterweightsbecome displaced. Although the tiebacks alone may not keep a scaffold fromtipping, they will keep the system from falling to the ground. Standpipes,vents, other piping systems, and electrical conduits are not acceptablepoints of anchorage because they are often made of materials that cannotsupport the loads that would be imposed on them if a counterweight systemwere to fail. To address the use of transportable tiebacks in the Final Rule, OSHA isadding two provisions_paragraphs (f)(3)(ii) (H) and (I). Paragraph (f)(3)(ii)(H)requires that the tieback rope be strong enough to sustain the same loadsustained by the suspension rope. Performance language is used rather thanspecifying the tieback rope diameter. In addition, this paragraph requiresthat the tieback rope be secured to a verified building anchorage. A verifiedanchorage, as defined in paragraph (d), is one that is accepted by a registeredprofessional engineer. Paragraph (f)(3)(ii)(I) describes how the tiebackrope is to be installed on the installation. Paragraph (f)(3)(iii) covers requirements for davits used to support workingplatforms. Paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(A) requires that all davit systems havea stability factor of four against overturning. OSHA agrees with the comments of a commenter (EX. 19B) that the requirementsfor davits used on ``roof rigged systems'' and ``ground rigged systems''should be clarified. The Final Rule sets out the specific requirementsfor davits used on ``roof rigged systems'' in paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(B)and for ``ground rigged systems'' in paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(C). To furtherclarify the application of the various requirements, OSHA has also defined``roof rigged davits'' and ``ground rigged davits.'' Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 9-35) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) suggestedthat proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(C)(<T3>1</T3>) be revised by replacing the term ``guarded area'' with theterm ``safe surface'' which is defined in the proposal. In addition, theysuggested that the access or egress to and from a platform not requirea worker to climb over a building's parapet or guard railing. OSHA believes that both of these suggestions have merit, and is includingthem in the Final Rule under renumbered paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(B)(1). No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(C)(2), and thisparagraph is renumbered as (f)(3)(iii)(B)(2) in the Final Rule. A number of commenters (EX. 15-8; 9-35, 9-37, 9-45) and a hearing witness(TR 2/19, p. 189) supported the proposed height limits for davits whenused with ground rigged platforms in proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(D)(1).Powered Platforms Manufacturing Company (EX. 9-23) and Becor Western (EX.9-37) agreed with OSHA that a davit installation with points of suspensionin excess of 130 foot (39.6 m) and below 300 foot (91.5 m) should providecontinuous means of engagement for the platform. At the other end of the comment spectrum, several commenters (EX. 9-7,9-13; 15-22) have suggested that OSHA place no limit on the height at whichdavits can be used with ground rigged platforms. These commenters claimedthat a davit system usage should be limited solely by the capability ofthe davit based on its design. California's Department of Industrial Relations(EX. 9-45), however, argued that a 300 foot (91.5 m) limit is necessarybecause davit installations are labor intensive and require special knowledgeand training for proper rigging and safe use. In addition, California notedthat these concerns increase with higher installations, as do electricalproblems associated with long flexible cords. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX.15-8) also promoted a 300 foot (91.5 m) limit for davits used with ground-riggedplatforms. After considering all the comments received on height limits for proposedparagraph (f)(3)(iv)(D)(<T3>1</T3>), OSHA has determined that the proposed limits should not bedeleted and is retaining the proposed limits in the Final Rule in paragraph(f)(3)(iii)(C)(). In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48224) published on November 22, 1985,OSHA requested comments on whether it should require mechanical means toraise and lower cables, life lines and wire rope when the point of suspensionexceeds 130 foot (39.6 m). Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that no more than40 pounds (177.9 N) of manual effort should be required of employees toraise or lower lines, whether or not they are mechanically assisted. DesignedEquipment Corporation (TR 2/21 p. 9), however, noted that in their experienceemployees have not had any problems in raising or lowering 300 foot (91.5m) of electric cable.This discussion on the manual effort required of employees to raise orlower lines and cables over a building parapet for a davit installationis similar to the previous discussion on outrigger installation under paragraph(f)(3)(ii)(A)). OSHA's conclusion following that previous discussion alsoapplies to paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(C)(<T3>1</T3>). Sufficient Human Factor data is not available for OSHA tospecify a limit on the weight of cables and lines an employee may raiseor lower from ground level without mechanical assistance, and therefore,such a weight limit is not included in the Final Rule. OSHA is revising proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(D)(<T3>1</T3>) to clarify the suspension height limits for davits and to referencethe tie-in guides on paragraph (e)(2) of the standard. The reference tothe tie-in guide systems provides options for the employer in selectingthe means for stabilizing the platform. In addition, the paragraph is renumberedas paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(C)(<T3>1</T3>). A commenter (EX. 19B) noted that the word ``horizontal'' is redundant andshould be deleted from proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(D)(<T3>2</T3>). OSHA agrees and the word is deleted in the Final Rule in renumberedparagraph (f)(3)(iii)(C)(<T3>2</T3>). Proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(E)(<T3>1</T3>), which addresses a davit rotation locking device, was basedon provision 305.1(d)(1) of the ANSI A120 draft standard_November 1981.The current ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986 no longer includes theprovision. Several commenters (EX. 9-23, 9-29, 9-43) and a hearing witness(TR 2/19, p. 191) recommended that this provision be deleted from the standard.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 191) commented that requiring the davitsto be locked would also require an employee to climb back and forth overa parapet, and on and off a powered platform each time a platform was tobe deployed or retracted_a dangerous practice. Swing Stage Inc. (EX. 9-29)stated that the preferred practice is to strike a balance between easeof rotation and sufficient resistance to turning so that the davit remainsin its working position. This commenter urged that the locking requirementsbe dropped in the absence of any evidence of a safety hazard resultingfrom the lack of a rotation lock. OSHA agrees and the provision is deleted in the Final Rule. In additionto the comments in support of the deletion, OSHA notes that the stabilizationprovisions under paragraph (e)(2) will limit any employee risk due to anymovement of the davit while it is in the working position. The horizontal force necessary for an employee to move a rotatable davitwas to be limited to 100 pounds (444.8 N) by proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(E)(<T3>2</T3>). Several commenters (EX. 15-8; 9-31, 9-41) suggested that OSHAeliminate the force requirement and substitute a requirement that the davitbe provided with bearings to permit easy rotation. Hoberg (TR 2/19, P.159) disagreed and stated that bearings are not as important as keepingthe davit socket base in a vertical position. If the socket base is atan angle from a vertical position, he contended, it becomes much more difficultfor an employee to push a platform uphill to get it over a parapet. Several commenters (EX. 9-25, 9-35; 19B) claimed the 100 pounds (444.8N) was excessive, especially for women and older employees. Leonard Nork(EX. 9-25) supported Hoberg (EX. 19B) who recommended that OSHA use performancelanguage which addresses the ability of employees to rotate the davit withinHuman Factors data limits. For this provision, Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggestedthat OSHA use a 40 pound (177.9 N) limit. Hoberg (EX. 19B) used the samearguments in support of the 40 pound (177.9 N) limit for a force to beemployed in moving a carriage under paragraph (f)(3)(i)(C). In addition to the comments expressed, OSHA recognizes a risk to employeesin allowing them to exert a 100 pound (444.8 N) horizontal force on a davitwhen they are in close proximity to the edge of a parapet. OSHA, therefore,is changing the 100 pound (444.8 N) limit to 40 pounds (177.9 N) in thefinal rule under renumbered paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(D). OSHA's reasons forsupporting the change to 40 pounds (177.9 N) in paragraph (f)(3)(i)(C)for carriages also apply to the change being made in this provision. An employer would have been required by the proposal (paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(F)(<T3>1</T3>)) to provide a means of transport for a transportable davitif it weighed more than 75 pounds (34 kg). This proposed weight limit wasbased on an evaluation of comments received in response to the ANPRM (48FR 30-6371). Two commenters (EX. 9-13; 15-8) and two hearing witnesses(TR 2/19, p. 110; TR 2/20, p. 103) suggested that OSHA require all davits,regardless of weight, be provided with a means of transport, since manydavits weigh between 70 and 100 pounds (31.7 kg and 45.3 kg). LawrenceR. Stafford (2/20-103) stated that the costs for providing the means oftransporting all davits would be small compared to the cost of injuriessustained by employees. No accident data or costs were provided to supportthis claim. Hoberg (EX. 19B, TR 2/19, p. 70, TR 2/19, p. 110) recommended,however, that an employee should not be required to carry a davit or partof a davit weighing more than 40 pounds (18 kg). If the davit weighed morethan 40 pounds (18 kg) per person for a two-man team, he recommended thattransporting means be provided, and that the center of gravity of the davitbe kept below 36 inches (914 mm) during transport. The recommendation by Mr. Hoberg is based on Human Factors data developedby Stover H. Snook (1978) and illustrated in <T3>Human Factors Engineering and Design, </T3>fifth edition, publishedin 1982 by McCormick and Sanders, Fig. 7-23, p. 209, and also verifiedby Hoberg's own experience in designing davits. Mr. Hoberg noted that sincemost maintenance operations have two employees working together, davitsor parts of davits weighing over 80 pounds (36 kg) should have a meansof transport which two employees can use. It was Mr. Hoberg's opinion thatthe regulation should not penalize engineering ingenuity if the owner wishesto use a davit that comes in 25 or 30 pound (11.3 kg or 13.6 kg) sectionsand eliminates the need for providing transporting means. Mr. Hoberg gave several reasons for recommending a 36-inch (914 mm) heightlimit for the center of gravity of a davit while being transported. First,he noted that the real problem in transporting the davit is not the weight,but the weight distribution. Some davits are 14 feet (4.3 m) long, andweigh 150-190 pounds (67.5 kg-85.5 kg) with the center of gravity abovethe head of the employees when the davit is held upright while transported.If the transporting means, such as a cart, were to strike a roof crack,the davit could easily fall if it were held upright, becoming a hazardto employees. OSHA has considered all the comments and Human Factors data presented andconcludes that there is insufficient data to support a requirement thatall davits be provided with a means for transport. Since Human Factorsdata supports an 80 pound (36 kg) weight limit for two persons, OSHA ischanging the proposed 75 pound (34 kg) weight limit to 80 pounds (36 kg).<T3>Human Factors Engineering and Design, </T3>which contains Human Factorsdata, is a recognized text and is readily available to engineers who designdavits. In addition, OSHA is adding in the Final Rule, under renumberedparagraph (f)(3)(iii)(E)(<T3>1</T3>) the requirement that the center of gravity of the davit shallbe at or below 36 inches (914 mm) above a safe surface during transport.Since many building parapets are 42 inches (1066 mm) high, the limit onthe center of gravity height will also reduce the likelihood of loss ofthe davit over the parapet. Several commenters (EX. 9-13, 9-31, 9-41; 15-4) suggested that the proposedparagraph (f)(3)(iv)(F)(<T3>2</T3>) be changed to allow davits to be inserted into sockets horizontallybefore being raised to a vertical position. Other commenters (EX. 19B,TR 2/19, p. 190) supported a requirement which allows davits to be insertedor removed at a position of not more than 35 degrees above the horizontal.Acme Fabricators Inc. (EX. 9-13) stated that positioning of a davit otherthan from the horizontal would require lifting of the davit, with the possibilityof employees sustaining injury or loosing control of the davit. Hoberg(EX. 19B) believed that the elevation of the pivot point in respect tothe worker's position is the critical factor when planning for the safeuse of the heavy davits. Because of a typographical error in the proposal, the proposed requirementwould have permitted the insertion of a davit into its socket at a positionof more than 35 degrees above the horizontal. The provision should haveread, ``not more than 35 degrees above the horizontal.'' OSHA is addingthe word ``not'' in the Final Rule and renumbering the paragraph (f)(3)(iii)(E)(<T3>2</T3>). This change, OSHA believes, properly addresses the comments received onthis provision, and also affords the equipment designer the option of designingthe davit for insertion and removal from a horizontal position up to andincluding a position which is 35 degrees above the horizontal. No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(3)(iv)(F)(<T3>3</T3>) and this paragraph has been renumbered as (f)(3)(iii)(E)(<T3>3</T3>). A number of commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-41; 15-8; 19B) recommended that OSHAchange the requirement that a hoist be capable of preventing any overspeeddescent of the load in proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ii) to a requirement thatthe hoist be capable of arresting such overspeed descent. Daigel (EX. 9-31)noted that the overspeed descent is arrested rather than prevented by thehoist. OSHA agrees and this change is made in the Final Rule.No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ii)(A), which liststhe acceptable power sources for hoists, and it is rephrased but unchangedin the Final Rule under paragraph (f)(4)(iii). A number of commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-41, 9-43; 15-8; 19B) and hearing witnesses(TR 2/19, p. 70; TR 2/20, p. 497) addressed the proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ii)(B)which prohibited the use of gasoline engines as prime movers for any hoistingmachine. Becor Western Inc. (TR 2/20, p. 497) recommended that OSHA changethe word ``gasoline'' to a generic term such as ``internal combustion''since diesel and propane engines have similar fire hazards. Spider StagingSales Company (EX. 9-43) recommended that OSHA should not consider anyflammable energy source as an acceptable power source. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 20) believed that flammable liquids of any kind shouldbe prohibited from the elevated work platform because of the limited egress.Also, he noted there would be a loss of support when the aluminum of mostplatforms became heated if a fire occurred as well as the danger of ignitingthe overhead ropes. OSHA agrees that the provision should address all flammable energy sourcesbecause of the hazards in their use that may be faced by employees. However,since paragraph (f)(4)(iii) has identified the only acceptable power sources,OSHA believes there is no need to identify the unacceptable power sources.In paragraph (f)(4)(iv), OSHA is prohibiting the carrying of flammableliquids on the platform. A commenter (EX. 19b) suggested that proposed paragraph (f)(4)(iii), whichaddressed the capability of a hoist to raise or lower a load be shortenedfor clarity. OSHA agrees and this clarification is made in the Final Rule in paragraph(f)(4)(v). Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommendedthat the prohibition against the use of friction type speed reducers inhoisting machines be deleted in proposed paragraph (f)(4)(iv). They believedthat this prohibition is contradictory, since friction type hoists arepermitted and friction type brakes are used to stop the hoists. OSHA agrees and this provision is deleted in the Final Rule. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supported proposed paragraph (f)(4)(v),which requires that the moving parts of a hoisting machine be guarded.However, paragraph (f)(4)(vi) references andSection; 1910.212(a) (1) and(2) instead of andSection; 1910.219 as proposed. OSHA believes these paragraphsare a more specific reference for the guarding of hoisting machines thanandSection; 1910.219, which primarily addresses the guarding of machineswith power transmission belt systems. Proposed paragraph (f)(4)(vi) required that hoisting drums and sheavesbe compatible for use with the required rope size. Becor Western (EX. 9-37)suggested that OSHA include the ratio of the pitch diameter of the sheaveor drum (D) to the nominal diameter of the rope (d), and recommended aratio of sixteen to one. Another commenter (EX. 19B, 19C) recommended thatOSHA modify the proposed requirement to include performance language ratherthan require a specific ratio be met. OSHA agrees with this commenter that a specific ratio for this purposehas not been established in the industry because of the many variablesinvolved such as sheave and hoist diameter, wire rope diameter, loading,etc. OSHA is, therefore, using performance language in the Final Rule toaddress the issue of compatibility and size in paragraph (f)(4)(vii). Proposed paragraph (f)(4)(vii) required that the wire rope attachment ina winding drum be capable of developing four times the rated capacity ofthe hoist. Daigel (EX. 9-31) suggested that the provision include a requirementthat the wire rope portion of the attachment shall develop at least 90percent of the wire rope breaking strength. He noted that a poor and inefficientconnection could result if the wire rope portion of the attachment is notgiven proper consideration.In response, OSHA notes that in proposed paragraph (f)(7)(i), the suspensionwire rope and connections (terminations) used must meet the specificationsrecommended by the hoisting machine manufacturer. Consequently, the manufacturerwould be expected to specify connections which would be compatible withits equipment. OSHA is, therefore, retaining proposed paragraph (f)(4)(vii)as written in the Final Rule in paragraph (f)(4)(viii), except the word``load'' is substituted for the word ``capacity.'' This change in wordingis to assure consistency with the definition of the rated load of the hoist.Becor Western (EX. 9-37) recommended that OSHA delete the word ``radial''in proposed paragraph (f)(4)(viii), which addressed the frictional contactbetween the wire rope and a traction drum or sheave. Becor Western statedthat equivalent methods have been developed by manufacturers which arecompletely reliable and which do not depend on radial forces for reliablefrictional contact.Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested deleting this whole provision. He noted thatif the word ``radial'' is deleted, the remaining phrase ``continuous force''would apply equally to winding drums, since these drums require ``continuousforce'' for frictional contact.OSHA has considered the comments presented and agrees that the word ``radial''is misleading and incorrect in its proposed context. If the word ``radial''is deleted, the balance of the requirement would have no special relevanceto traction hoists. OSHA is deleting this provision in the Final Rule.A commenter (EX. 19B, TR 2/19, p. 71) observed that proposed paragraph(f)(4)(ix) would mean that the primary and secondary braking systems couldbe used together to stop and hold 25 percent over the rated hoist load.He stated that the real needs are for each brake system to stop and holdwhat the hoist is capable of lifting, and for assured independent brakingaction.Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supported the above commenter's statementon the necessary capability of each system.OSHA notes that the rated load of the hoist is defined as the operatingload allowed by the manufacturer. The hoist can actually lift more thanits rated load. OSHA, therefore, agrees with the commenters that this provisionshould address each braking system's ability to stop and hold 125 per centof the lifting capacity of each hoist rather than the rated load of eachhoist.Daigel (EX. 9-31), William Ayres (EX. 91), Hoberg (EX. 19B) and DouglasA. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) noted that OSHA had not included the function ofthe primary braking system in proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ix)(A). They suggestedthat the primary braking system be required to engage automatically whenpower to the prime mover is removed.OSHA agrees that the primary braking system should not be manually actuatedafter the hoist motor is stopped, but should automatically set when powerto the prime mover is interrupted for any reason. In the Final Rule, OSHAis adding the function of the primary braking system to the provision whichis renumbered as (f)(4)(ix)(A).In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222) OSHA requested comments on suggestionsmade by a pre-hearing commenter (EX. 9-31) to expand the secondary brakeprovisions in proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ix)(B). The commenter (EX. 9-31)claimed that the proposed provisions were inadequate.The first pre-hearing comment would have required that the secondary brakeactuate only under prescribed emergency conditions. Hoberg (TR 2/19, p.71) believed that this suggested requirement is counter to the conceptof a secondary-emergency back-up brake being the stop of last resort, andthat the brake should stop the hoist and its load under any condition,known or unknown. He argued that a ``prescribed emergencies'' exemptionshould not be permitted in the regulation.The second pre-hearing comment would have required that the secondary brakeact on a specific component of a winding drum, traction drum or traction-sheavehoist. James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 195) and Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 71) agreedthat this suggested addition should not be included in the criteria forsecondary brakes. These commenters stated that any brake always acts ona specific component of equipment whether it is intended or not, and withouta definition of the component, the statement is meaningless. In addition,they indicated that as a performance regulation, the regulation shouldsay what is to be done, not how to do it.The third pre-hearing comment would have required that the secondary brakenot fail to operate because of outside contamination. Hoberg (TR 2/19,p. 72) argued that this brake criteria should not be included in the FinalRule for a number of reasons. First, the addition is redundant since theproposed requirement that the brakes stop and hold the hoist and its loadhas no implicit or explicit exemption for contamination, temperature, heightof building or any other criterion. Second, since the term ``contamination''is not defined, it can mean the brake must operate if submerged in waterand frozen; if packed in hot sand; if covered with hot grease_or any otherimaginable contaminant. Third, the suggested addition has the implicationthat reasonable care and maintenance is not necessary to insure properoperation of these brakes.The fourth pre-hearing comment would have required that the brake actuationimpose no more than a specified amount of loading on hoisting system components.Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 73) disagreed that this criteria should be added tothe secondary brake provision. He believed that the specified amount ofloading could be addressed in his recommended change to proposed paragraph(f)(4)(ix) that the hoist stop and hold what it can lift. In addition,he believed that the loading issue is also addressed in the requirementof proposed paragraph (f)(1)(i) that equipment be designed by a registeredprofessional engineer.The fifth pre-hearing comment would have required that the secondary brakenot be bypassed or prevented from operating by any other device.Cliff Theve (TR 2/20, p. 180) objected to this addition because it wouldprohibit the use of a hoisting machine with a controlled descent featureor a speed governor for emergency descent of a platform without power.He argued that hoisting machines of this type have been built and usedsafely for a number of years in the industry. Other reasons given by Mr.Theve not to include this additional criteria were: One, a controlled descentfeature in a hoist is a quicker safer alternative to hand cranking by workerswho are stranded and/or injured on an elevated platform; two, his own companyhas a ten-year history in the manufacture and sale of this type of hoistwithout a worker injury or accident; and three, the controlled descentfeature does not prevent the secondary brake from becoming actuated ifthe primary brake fails and the platform reaches an overspeed condition.Several other commenters (EX. 14-2, 14-4, 14-5) who are users of hoistswith controlled descent features also objected to any prohibition of thistype of hoist. In their experience, the controlled descent feature hadnot been the cause of hoist failures and had been effective in providinga safe descent when necessary.OSHA has considered all the comments presented and is not adding the fiveadditional criteria to proposed paragraph (f)(4)(ix)(B). Based in the recordof this Rulemaking, OSHA has determined that these criteria are eitherredundant, unreasonable or inappropriate for secondary brake regulation.OSHA is renumbering the provision as paragraph (f)(4)(ix)(B)(<T3>1</T3>).In the submission of the ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986 by DouglasA. Greenaway (EX. 15-8), the secondary brake criteria included a provisionwhich required the secondary brake, when activated, to stop and hold theplatform within a vertical distance of 24 inches (609.6 m). OSHA believesthat a specific limit on this stopping distance is necessary to assureadequate fall protection for employees, and is adding this provision inthe Final Rule as paragraph (f)(4)(ix)(B)(<T3>2</T3>).Several commenters (EX. 9-29, 19B, 91) argued that the proposed requirementfor lubrication of a hoisting machine in paragraph (f)(4)(x) was too broad.According to these commenters, a strict interpretation of this provisionwould mean lubrication of all parts, whether needed or not. Swing StageInc. (EX. 9-29) noted that there are many modern materials which provideyears of reliable service without conventional lubrication and many componentsare stationary without any need for lubrication. OSHA agrees with these commenters and is revising the lubrication provisionto address only those components in a hoisting machine which require lubricationin paragraph (f)(4)(x). Werner Company Inc. (EX. 9-34) suggested that the load reference in proposedparagraph (f)(5)(i)(A) be more clearly defined. This commenter believedthat the intended load should include the weight of the users and any materialon the platform. OSHA agrees with this commenter and is changing the phrase``maximum intended load'' to be ``maximum intended live load'' in the FinalRule. The term ``live load'' is defined in the standard. Werner Company Inc. (EX. 9-34) has questioned whether the terms ``suspendedunit,'' ``unit weight'' and ``live load'' in proposed paragraph (f)(5)(i)(B)are referring to the platform itself or the total system. In response,OSHA states that the term ``suspended unit'' is referring to the platformitself. The load rating plate provides information which is used to preventthe loading of a platform in excess of its maximum intended load. The loadrating plate addressed in the proposed paragraph is required to state the``unit weight'' and the ``live load rating'' of the platform. For consistencywith the definitions used in the Final Rule, the term ``live load rating''is changed to ``rated load'' in the Final Rule at (f)(5)(i)(C). Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) and Hoberg (EX. 19C) agreed that proposedparagraph (f)(5)(i)(C) is incomplete. These commenters believed that theparagraph should address both the position of the live load and the stabilityfactor ratio that is to be used in maintaining continuous stability ofthe suspended unit. OSHA agrees with these commenters that the use of a1.5 to 1 stability factor against upset and the need to address the positionof the live load in the suspended unit is necessary in the Final Rule.OSHA addresses these issues in paragraph (f)(5)(i)(D). Several commenters (EX. 9-22, 9-31, 9-35) suggested deleting proposed paragraph(f)(5)(i)(E)(<T3>3</T3>), which addressed button guide systems. The same arguments fordeletion of these systems were presented earlier when commenters addressedproposed paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B). OSHA did not find the arguments presentedfor deletion persuasive then and retained paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B), andis doing likewise for proposed paragraph (f)(5)(i)(E)(<T3>3</T3>) by retaining it in the Final Rule as (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>3</T3>). In paragraph (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>1</T3>), OSHA proposed that a suspended unit shall be provided witha guardrail system and a four inch (102 mm) high toeboard. OSHA is revisingthe toeboard provision to provide equivalent protection and consistencywith OSHA's proposed Construction Standard addressing the use of scaffolds(Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (51 FR 42708) published on November 25,1986. The revised toeboard provisions which will also be considered inOSHA's proposed revision of Subpart D of Part 1910, are added as (f)(5)(i)(G)(<T3>5</T3>), (<T3>6</T3>), (<T3>7</T3>) and (<T3>8</T3>). Several commenters (EX. 9-35, 9-37) suggested that OSHA revise proposedparagraph (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>2</T3>) to include a 42 inch (106.6 cm) high limit for the top guardrailon the ends and outboard side of the platform. Also, Spider Staging SalesCompany (EX. 9-43) suggested that the top guardrail have the capabilityof withstanding a 200 pound (890 N) force rather than a 100 pound (445N) force. OSHA's proposed requirements for a 36-inch (914 cm) top guardrailwith a capability of withstanding a 100 pound (445 N) force are consistentwith proposed related OSHA scaffold standards for construction (51 FR 42708)and reflect the fact that this type of guardrail is intended to be supplementedby personal fall arrest systems.This consistency of approach in OSHA's fall protection standards for poweredplatforms and scaffolds is based on the use of two types of guardrail systems.The first type is capable by itself of providing adequate fall protectionfor employees. The second type of guardrail system is one which is usedprimarily as an edge delineator and to prevent misstepping. Personal fallarrest systems must be worn with the second type of guardrail system becauseof the reduced strength characteristics (100 pounds (445 N) force) andlower top rail heights (36 inches (91.4 cm)) of this type of system. Since this powered platform standard requires employees to be protectedby personal fall arrest systems (paragraph j), as the primary means offall protection, guardrails on the platform need not be strong enough toprevent falls. Accordingly, the standard provides for the second type ofguard rail system to be used on powered platforms. Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>2</T3>), therefore, is unchanged in the Final Rule. Two commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-43) recommended that OSHA increase the capabilityof the midrail in a guardrail system from a 75-pound (333 N) force as proposedin paragraph (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>3</T3>) to the same force as the top rail. Again, since OSHA is proposingthat a personal fall arrest system be used for employees, the midrail inthis guardrail system is primarily part of the edge delineation and neednot have the greater strength. Accordingly, the paragraph is unchangedin the Final Rule. OSHA proposed in paragraph (f)(5)(i)(F)(<T3>4</T3>) that the material used between the toeboard and top guardrailon a platform contain no opening large enough to allow the passage of aball two inches (51 mm) in diameter. The New York State Department of Labor(EX. 9-41) recommended that this provision be changed to agree with theNew York State requirement of three-quarters of an inch (19 mm). Hoberg(EX. 19B) was concerned that a two-inch (51 mm) opening would allow employeesto pass a lifeline through these openings which could be hazardous if theplatform suspension ropes should fail. This commenter suggested a one-inch(21.5 mm) opening. OSHA has considered these comments and the need for the openings in thematerial to be small enough to prevent potential falling objects from passingthrough. OSHA, therefore, has rewritten this provision as a performancerequirement in paragraph (f)(5)(i)(G)(<T3>4</T3>) in the Final Rule, which is also consistent with related proposedOSHA construction standards on scaffolds. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48225), OSHA solicited comment on the proposedrequirement in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(A) that a 12-inch (305 mm) wide passagebe provided at or past any obstruction on the platform. A number of commenters(EX. 9-20, 9-35, 9-37, 9-43, 9-45; 15-4, 15-8; 88-6) and hearing witnesses(TR 2/19, pp. 23, 111, 197; TR 2/20, pp. 64, 78, 154, 187, 369, 497) addressedthis provision. Leonard Nork (2/20-64) suggested that the passage be increased to 18 inches(458 mm), otherwise some workers might climb on the midrail or top guardrailto pass by any obstruction on the platform. A number of commenters (EX.15-4, 15-8; 9-35, 9-45) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/19, p. 197; TR 2/20,pp. 154, 187, 497), however, supported OSHA's 12-inch (305 mm) proposedrequirement. Becor Western (TR 2/20, p. 497), for example, noted that a12-inch space (305 mm) is more than adequate for platform occupants, whilean 18-inch (458 mm) space would have an economic impact since it wouldrequire a 36-inch (916 mm) wide platform or undesirable counterweightsdue to a relocation of the hoist. Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43; TR 2/20, p. 369) observed thatOSHA should be more concerned with a safe passage past an obstruction onthe platform and not physical dimensions. Hoberg (EX. 88-6) supported the12-inch (305 mm) passage, but suggested that OSHA also be concerned withother hazards at the obstruction location such as moving parts and thepotential of inadvertent operation of hoisting machine controls. OSHA notes that proper training of employees, as required by paragraph(i)(1)(ii), will inform employees of obstruction hazards and machine guarding,as required by paragraph (f)(4)(vi), and will help to prevent employeeexposure to hazards when passing obstructions on the platform. Based onthe record of this rulemaking, OSHA has decided to retain the 12-inch (305mm) provision in the Final Rule under paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(A). OSHA proposed in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(B) that any opening in a platformflooring be capable of preventing the passage of a one-inch (25 mm) diameterball. If the opening were larger, a metal screen capable of rejecting aone-inch (25 mm) ball would need to be placed under the opening. OSHA received a variety of opinions from commenters (EX. 9-13, 9-41, 9-43;15-8; 19B; 87; 91) on the proper size of the opening in the flooring. TheNew York State Department of Labor (EX. 9-43) recommended that OSHA matchthe New York regulations on platforms, which call for an opening whichwould prevent the passage of a three-quarter inch (19 mm) ball. SpiderStaging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supportedOSHA's proposed opening dimension. Hoberg (EX. 19-B) expressed concernthat the one-inch (25 mm) opening criteria would allow employees to passlife lines and cables through the openings, and suggested that a nine-sixteenthsof an inch (14 mm) criteria be used.Following a review of the comments on this provision, OSHA has concludedthat a performance requirement should be used in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(B)to address the identified hazards instead of a specific size opening. Inthis requirement, the flooring shall contain no opening that would allowthe passage of lifelines, cables and potential falling objects. This performancerequirement addresses the potential failure of a personal fall arrest systemif life lines should be passed through a platform floor and the suspensionsystem should fail, and the hazard to other employees from objects fallingthrough the platform openings. OSHA had proposed in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(C) that the means of suspensionfor a platform shall limit the roll about its longitudinal axis to a maximumof 15 degrees from a horizontal plane. R. D. Werner (EX. 9-34) suggestedthat OSHA change the maximum limit to five degrees since he believed thatthe 15 degree maximum was too large due to the additional loading thatwould be introduced into the platform as a result of such a platform roll.A number of commenters and hearing witnesses (EX. 15-4, 15-8; TR 2/19,pp. 75, 197) supported the 15 degree maximum limit on platform roll. LawrenceR. Stafford (EX. 15-4) noted that every two-point suspended platform willroll since it is suspended at its center of gravity, and that to reducethe roll limit below 15 degrees one would have to change the center ofgravity or add weight, either of which would be objectionable. In addition,this commenter noted that a reduced roll limit would virtually outlaw theuse of many traction hoists since the mass of the hoist is above the platformdeck and not under the platform deck as is the case with most drum typehoists. James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 197) noted that the proper locationof building face rollers would help to limit any platform roll. In addition,Mr. Fortune noted that the 15 degrees is a maximum roll limit and it isunlikely that platforms would be designed to reach this limit. OSHA has considered all the comments received and has decided to retainthe proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(C) in the Final Rule. Properly designedsuspension means and the use of proper stabilization methods used can limitthe platform roll to a 15 degree maximum limit. Most platforms are builtto the Underwriters Laboratory Standard, UL 1322, ``Fabricated ScaffoldStages and Planks''. This standard states that the platform shall withstand,without failure or visible damage to the structure, a load equal to threetimes the rated load of the platform, when one side rail is raised so thatthe decking is at an angle of 15 degrees to the horizontal. In addition,most employees would find it difficult to work on a platform with a platformsurface at an angle of greater than 15 degrees from the horizontal plane,and would endeavor to return the work surface to a normal position. Finally,OSHA has not received any accident data that would support a change fromthe 15 degree roll limit. Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that OSHA delete the words describing thedifferent types of cable in proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(D) since theywere redundant. OSHA agrees and the words are deleted in the Final Rule.Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that OSHAclarify proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(F) which addressed the interruptionof the power supply on a platform. They noted that the provision shouldmake it clear that the requirement provides for the interruption of thepower supply for all hoist motors at each operating station on the platform.OSHA agrees that a clarification is warranted and the change is made inthe Final Rule. Some commenters (EX. 9-13, 9-35, 9-43) recommended that OSHA lower themaximum platform speeds limited by proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(G). OSHAproposed maximum rated speeds of 50 and 75 feet per minute (0.3 ms and0.4 ms) with single and multi-speed hoists, respectively. Lawrence R. Stafford(EX. 9-35) suggested that OSHA limit the platform speed to 20 feet perminute (0.12 m/s) when intermittent stabilization is used. Spider StagingSales Company (EX. 9-43) suggested that OSHA limit the platform speed to35 feet per minute (0.21 m/s) when continuous stabilization is used becauseof the potential hangup of the platform in the guides. Douglas A. Greenaway(EX. 15-8), supported OSHA's proposed platform speeds. In response to the comments, OSHA notes that the proposed platform speedsare maximum rated speeds and not speeds which must be met for all conditionsof stabilization. Also, the proposed maximum speeds are not required speedsfor either roof-powered or platform-powered platforms. The need for higherplatform speeds often occurs on very tall buildings, employing continuousguides, when it is desirable to reduce the ascent time for efficiency reasons.The registered professional engineer who is responsible for the designof the equipment in the installation (paragraph (f)(1)(i) would determinethe proper platform speed that is suitable for the stabilization systemand building site. OSHA, therefore, is retaining the proposed provisionin the Final Rule. Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(I) required fire extinguishers to be installedon working platforms. Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) believedthat the requirement for fire extinguishers on platforms would be ineffective.This commenter claimed that the extinguishers would be stolen and werepotentially dangerous if they dropped from the platform. Acme FabricatorsIncorporated (EX. 9-13) and California's Department of Industrial Relations(EX. 9-45) supported OSHA's proposed requirements for extinguishers. OSHA agrees with the latter commenters that a fire extinguisher shouldbe installed on a powered platform. Employees need to have the capabilityof protecting themselves from fires involving combustible materials, flammablematerials or electrical equipment which might occur on an elevated platform.If extinguishers are stolen or dropped because of poor installation orusage, these are conditions which employers can correct through trainingand monitoring of the worksite, and these conditions are not valid reasonsfor not installing extinguishers. OSHA is retaining the proposed paragraph(f)(5)(ii)(I) in the Final Rule. Daigel (EX. 9-31) suggested that OSHA replace the term ``self-locking''with the term ``self-latching'' in proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(J) whichaddressed platform access gates. OSHA agrees that the term ``self-latching''is a more appropriate term because the gates are closed with a latch ratherthan a lock. A self-latching provision would ensure that the access gatesdo not open inadvertently and expose employees to a fall hazard.OSHA is making this change in the Final Rule and transferring this provisionto paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(J). Paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(K), as in the proposal, requires a guardrail systemor ladder handrails if the access to or the egress from a platform is 48inches (1.2 m) above a safe surface. This guarding requirement is consistentwith the related OSHA General Industry Standard, andSection;1910.23(a)(1),which addresses employee protection when working on open sided floors,platforms and runways. Support for the requirement was received from LawrenceR. Stafford (EXH. 9-35). OSHA is retaining this proposed provision in theFinal Rule. Several commenters (EX. 15-8; 9-31, 9-35, 9-41) recommended that OSHA reviseproposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(L) which addressed platforms containing overheadstructures which would restrict emergency access from the platform, andwhich would have required such platforms to have a secondary wire ropesuspension system or a suspension by four wire ropes. Daigel (EX. 9-31)noted that the actual intent of the provision was to prevent the use ofvertical lifelines by employees when working on platforms with overheadstructures. Employees using such vertical life lines would be exposed tothe hazard from the overhead structure if the suspension wire rope shouldfail. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8), concurred with Mr. Daigel and alsorecommended that the platform occupant be secured to a fall arrest systememploying a horizontal life line, and that the platform also be equippedwith a secondary wire rope system or be suspended by four wire ropes asstated in the proposal. OSHA believes that the recommendations addressing proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(L)have merit. For employee protection, it is important to clarify and emphasizethe necessary measures to be taken to avoid risks to employees workingon platforms with overhead structures. The use of horizontal life linesfor employees, and the suspension methods listed in the proposal, togetherprovide the means to address these risks. OSHA is revising proposed paragraph(f)(5)(ii)(L) in the Final Rule to reflect the above comments. Becor Western (EX. 9-37) and Hoberg (EX. 19 B) agreed that OSHA shouldremove the prohibition in proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(L) which statedthat the secondary wire rope tail line cannot hang below the platform.This provision was based on Section 307.5.10(c) of the ANSI A120 draftstandard_November 1981. Mr. Hoberg noted that the prohibition would requirethat the secondary rope be gathered in or below the platform with a poweredtensioning device. Powered Platform Manufacturing Company (EX. 9-23) alsoagreed that the prohibition on the tail line should be deleted. OSHA has concluded that the prohibition should be removed since no evidencehas been provided to show that a freely hanging tail line presents a hazardfor employees. This conclusion is also supported by the change in the latestANSI draft standard A120_January, 1986 which no longer includes this prohibition.The removal of this prohibition will also remove the need for employersto install tension devices to avoid piling of the rope above the platform.Paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(M) requires the use of vertical lifelines on two pointsuspended platforms, however, if a secondary suspension system is usedin conjunction with horizontal lifelines anchored to the platform, verticallifelines need not be used for fall arrest protection on such working platforms.This provision is unchanged from the proposal. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48225), OSHA solicited comment on thisrequirement. In response to this notice, some commenters (EX. 9-24, 9-31,9-41, 9-45) claimed that horizontal lifelines are used because of the limitationsthat exist in the use of vertical lifelines on tall buildings. For example,the use of long lifelines can result in abraded lifelines due to excessiverigging and handling; can require special rescue efforts if a suspensionwire rope fails; and can cause employees to be pulled off the platformif a strong wind force bears on the lifeline. In response to the comments on the limitations of vertical lifelines, OSHAmakes the following observations. First, all lifelines are subject to routineinspection by users, paragraph (g)(5)(ii), to detect any condition, suchas abrasion, which might affect their continued capability of protectingemployees from falls and necessitating removal. Second, when lifelinesexceed 200 foot (61 m), paragraph (e)(8) requires that lines be stabilizedto restrict their displacement by wind or any other force. This provisionwould address concerns expressed by commenters regarding broken windowsand employees being pulled off platforms because of wind. In addition,employees would be prohibited from working on platforms when the wind velocityon the platform exceeds 25 miles per hour (40.2 km/hr). Also, OSHA hasnot received any accident data which has shown that employees have beenpulled off platforms because of wind forces on vertical lifelines. Third,proposed paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(C), would require employees to be trainedin emergency action plan procedures. Such training would include employeeinstruction on procedures to follow in the event the employees were suspendedfrom a vertical or horizontal lifeline. Finally, as discussed further below,if the employer does not want to use a vertical lifeline for any reason,the standard provides the option of using a horizontal lifeline systemwith a secondary suspension system. OSHA also received a number of comments from hearing witnesses (TR 2/19,p. 192, TR 2/20, pp. 105, 156) and other commenters (EX. 9-3, 9-24, 9-43)who objected to the required use of a secondary suspension system in conjunctionwith horizontal lifelines on two-point suspended working plat-forms. LawrenceR. Stafford (TR 2/20, p. 105) stated that this provision would eliminatethe use of davits and outriggers because of the additional weight of storingthe secondary rope on the platform, and the lack of a physical locationto hang the secondary rope. This commenter noted that this would resultin the use of more roof carriages and larger and heavier building roofsto accommodate these carriages. The same commenter stated that it wouldalso be inpractical to use secondary suspension systems with selfpoweredplatforms. Hoberg (EX. 88-4) disagreed that the additional weight of a secondary wirerope on a platform would inhibit the use of davits and out-riggers. Henoted that the total weight of two 500 foot (153 m) secondary lines wouldbe approximately 170 pounds (77 kg) and would only have a minor effecton very long platforms. Since the Final Rule would not address existinginstallations in the use of davits and outriggers, he stated that properlydesigned davits and outriggers would have the capability of supportingsecondary lines and power winders.James W. Fortune (EX. 43-2, TR 2/20, p. 162) and Hoberg (EX. 88-4) alsodisagreed with the previous commenter that secondary systems cannot beused on self-powered platforms. These commenters concurred that there werea number of buildings in the United States that were utilizing secondarysuspension systems on such platforms, some with dual-wired traction hoistsand dual-eyed movable davits.A significant number of commenters (EX. 15-20, 19 B, 43-2, 88-4, 99) andhearing witnesses (TR 2/19, pp. 27, 76, 128, 240; TR 2/20, pp. 162, 272,496) supported the use of a secondary suspension system with a horizontallifeline on a two-point suspended working platform. Hoberg (TR 2/19, pp.27, 128) stated that if one of the two suspended wire ropes should fail,an employee attached to a horizontal lifeline would be subjected to a pendulumeffect and a free fall the length of the platform plus the length of thebody belt lanyard. Such a fall could result in serious injury or death.From his own experience (EX. 99), and from a review of OSHA accident data(EX. 100-7), Mr. Hoberg noted that the forces resulting from such a fallhave been severe enough to cause failure of the belt lanyard attachmentand the death of the employees. It was Mr. Hoberg's (EX. 99) belief thatthe centrifugal forces resulting from the failure of one out of two suspensionropes could also cause the failure of the remaining suspension rope and/orits support. Mr. Hoberg concluded that the potential injury that an employeemight endure, if a suspension wire rope failed while using a fall arrestsystem containing a horizontal lifeline, warranted the use of a secondarysuspension system.When questioned at the hearing, a number of witnesses (TR 2/20, pp. 156,344, 496) who had objected to the use of secondary suspension systems intheir comments responded that they had not considered the pendulum effectand free fall resulting from a failure of one of two suspension wire ropes.After reviewing the comments and the hearing testimony, OSHA is retainingthe proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(M) in the Final Rule. This conclusionis based on a number of reasons. First, the primary purpose of the provisionis to provide an employee with an adequate personal fall arrest systemwhen working on a two-point suspended platform. An independent verticallifeline, as part of the fall arrest system, should be the first choicein achieving this protection. However, if a vertical lifeline is not used,then a horizontal lifeline anchored to the platform and a secondary suspensionsystem would be the other available option. The secondary suspension systemis necessary to provide fall arrest in the event one of the two suspensionropes should fail. Second, the provision would only apply to new installationswhich must all be designed by a registered professional engineer for aspecific building site. Third, secondary suspension systems have been usedin the industry for a number of years. Fourth, employers are not limitedin the type of secondary suspension systems they may employ. As noted byHoberg (TR 2/19, p. 76), an employer may use another set of suspensionropes, a nontensioned independent rope equipped with an automatic auxillaryover-speed brake, or a tensioned combination cable also used as a travelingcable. Although OSHA is retaining proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(M), itis changing some of the terms used in the paragraph to achieve consistencywith other provisions in the Final Rule.Under (f)(5)(ii)(N) in the Final Rule, OSHA is clarifying the referenceto the traveling cable system in the proposal. The phrase ``traveling cablesystem'' in the proposal is replaced with the phrase ``cable connectedto the platform'' in the Final Rule. OSHA is also clarifying several otherterms in the proposal.A number of provisions, (f)(5)(iv)(A), (f)(5)(v)(B), (f)(5)(v)(D), and(f)(5)(v)(F) which address single point and ground rigged platforms, aswell as intermittently stabilized platforms, are set out in the Final Ruleand are unchanged from the proposal.Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iii)(A) permitted employers to have the optionof providing a separate vertical life line as part of a fall arrest systemfor each employee on a single point suspended platform. A number of commentersand hearing witnesses (EX. 9-23, 9-31, 9-41; 19 B; TR 2/19, pp. 77, 132)recommended that OSHA delete this option on this type of platform. Daigel(EX. 9-31) stated that this option is deficient since a failure of theprimary suspension rope would cause the platform to fall and injure otheremployees below. Hoberg (TR 2/19, pp. 77, 132) agreed and noted that sucha failure could also cause an overhead device, used for stability on thisplatform, to strike an employee on the platform or hook the vertical lifeline.This commenter also stated that the employee should be secured to a horizontallifeline anchored to the platform, in lieu of a vertical lifeline, to arrestany fall from the platform.OSHA agrees with these commenters and is revising the proposed requirementin the Final Rule. In addition, OSHA is deleting proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iii)(B)since paragraph (f)(5)(iii)(B) in the Final Rule addresses all single pointsuspended platforms.Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that OSHA delete proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iii)(C)since this provision required that single point suspended working platformsbe either continuously engaged to a building guide or intermittently secured.Hoberg noted that these requirements are also listed in proposed paragraph(f)(5)(i)(E). OSHA agrees to this deletion in the Final Rule.Several commenters and hearing witnesses (EX. 9-25, 9-35, 9-43; TR 2/19,p. 158; TR 2/20, pp. 25, 39, 107) recommended that OSHA delete the provisionin proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iv)(B) that would have allowed a platformto be secured in a suspended position against a building face after eachday's use. Leonard Nork (EX. 9-25; TR 2/20, p. 25) stated that this currentpractice is contributing to a number of unsafe conditions and procedures.First, it is very difficult, if not impossible, to secure a suspended platformovernight against the face of many buildings built in recent years. Second,such platforms can be subjected to sudden overnight storms which can causea great amount of damage to the platform and the building. Third, employeesare subjected to fall hazards due to the difficulties of access and egressto and from such suspended platforms. OSHA had requested comment on the feasibility and adequacy of this requirementin the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (50 FR 2914). OSHA agrees with thesecommenters, and is changing proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iv)(B) in the FinalRule to disallow the practice of storing a platform overnight against thebuilding face. OSHA is deleting proposed paragraph (f)(5)(iv)(C) which addressed two stabilizationmethods to be used with ground-rigged platforms. These stabilization methodsare regulated by paragraph (f)(5)(i)(E) in the general requirements forsuspended platforms. That provision permits the use of any of four stabilizationmethods (continuous, intermittent, button guide and angulated roping) ortheir equivalent with ground-rigged platforms. Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 9-35) and Daigel (EX. 9-31) objected to allowingthe use of button guide stabilization systems with ground rigged platforms.Similar objections were raised by these commenters on proposed paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(B) which permits the use of button guide stabilization systems.These objections were addressed by OSHA in the discussion of proposed paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(B) above and which explained why button guide stabilizationwas retained in that provision of the Final Rule. For the same reasons,OSHA is retaining the use of button guide stabilization systems for groundrigged platforms. Section (f)(5)(v) regulates intermittently stabilized platforms. Severalcommenters (EX. 9-22, 9-31, 9-35; 19 B) and a hearing witness (TR 2/19,p. 113) suggested that OSHA not require in proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(A)that stabilizer ties be adjustable in length. The stabilizer ties wereproposed to be adjustable to affect the predetermined angulation of thesuspension wire rope by changing the tie length, as necessary. These commentersnoted however, that the length of the stabilizer tie is set by the designof each installation and adjustability is not required. Hoberg (TR 2/19,p. 113) noted that there are acceptable methods of tie-in, using a stabilizertie, that are not adjustable. This commenter stated that OSHA should notrequire an adjustable tie since there are other methods which can be utilized.OSHA agrees with these commenters and is revising proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(A)in the Final Rule to provide this flexibility. In addition, this paragraphis renumbered as (f)(5)(v)(E). Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(C) which addresses the hazards associatedwith storing stabilizer ties on the platform has been modified and includedin paragraph (i)(2)(vii) in the Final Rule. The modification incorporatesHoberg's (TR 2/19, p. 60, EX. 19C) suggestion that the provision addressthe hazards associated with the ties becoming entangled in the machinery.Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(D) addressed the requirement that the hoistpower supply be interrupted if the platform contacts the stabilizer tieduring its ascent. This provision is retained, clarified and renumberedas (f)(5)(v)(C). Powered Platforms Manufacturing Company (EX. 9-23) recommended that OSHAdelete proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(E) which prohibited intermittentlystabilized platforms from extending beyond the building corner. This commenterstated that if the stabilization system is designed properly to allow forproper suspension rope tie-in, continuous contact with the building faceand expected wind loading, there is no reason that a platform cannot extendbeyond the building corner. OSHA agrees that this provision is too restrictive and makes the followingobservations. First, it is expected that the registered professional engineerdesigning an intermittent stabilization system (paragraph (f)(1)(i)) fora platform that extends beyond the building corners would address specificcriteria such as proper suspension rope tie-in, continuous contact andexpected wind loading. Second, intermittent stabilization provisions underparagraph (e)(2)(iii)(A) in the Final Rule require that the platform bekept in continuous contact with the building facade. Third, employee trainingprovisions in paragraph (i)(1)(i) in the Final Rule require employees tobe proficient in the operation and safe use of the particular powered platformsto be operated. Fourth, platforms on buildings with unusual corner arrangementsmay require extensions for employees to perform maintenance beyond or aroundbuilding corners. OSHA, therefore, is deleting the prohibition against intermittently stabilizedplatforms from extending beyond building corners. Several commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-35, 9-41, 9-43) recommended that the proposedrequirement for upper and lower building face rollers in proposed paragraph(f)(5)(v)(F) be deleted. These commenters stated that experience with intermittentstabilization systems has shown that upper and lower building face rollersdo not make platforms more stable. However, they do contribute to moreweight and cost. Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested that OSHA require that rollersnot be placed at the anchor placing if exterior anchors are used on thebuilding face. Based on the information provided by the commenters, OSHA is deleting therequirement for upper and lower building face rollers in the Final Rule.OSHA believes Mr. Hoberg's suggestion has merit and is including his suggestionin the Final Rule under renumbered paragraph (f)(5)(v)(D). OSHA also notesthat the basic requirement for building face rollers for all suspendedequipment remains in paragraph (f)(5)(i)(E). OSHA had proposed a 10-foot (3.0 m) required distance between buildingface rollers in paragraph (f)(5)(v)(G). Powered Platforms ManufacturingCompany (EX. 9-23) stated that the distance was excessive and that a six-foot(1.8 m) distance is sufficient for stabilization. Daigel (EX. 9-22) supportedthe 10-foot (3.0 m) requirement, but recognized there would be a numberof building designs in which this would be unattainable. For example, thiscommenter noted that when a platform is encompassed in an interior buildingcorner, a 10-foot (3.0 m) distance may not be available to the designer.OSHA has considered the views of the commenters and has decided to deletethe provision. This has been done in recognition of the fact that the distancebetween face rollers is affected by a number of variables at each specificbuilding site. The registered professional engineer, under paragraph (f)(1)(i),is expected to design the equipment to meet the OSHA requirement at paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(A) for stabilization at each building site. The engineer, therefore,would select the appropriate distance between face rollers to ensure stabilization.Proposed paragraph (f)(5)(v)(H) is renumbered as (f)(5)(v)(A) in the FinalRule. Hoberg (EX. 19 C; 2/19, p. 61) recommended that OSHA maintain consistencywith the building section of the Final Rule at paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A)and require that the platform shall be in constant contact with the buildingface. OSHA agrees, and is adding this provision at paragraph (f)(5)(v)(F).A commenter (EX. 19C) suggested that OSHA ensure that the attachment andremoval of a stabilizer tie not require the platform to be moved horizontally.OSHA believes this suggestion has merit since these ties are not meantto be used for repositioning a platform on a building face. In addition,such a repositioning operation could expose employees to a pinch pointhazard in the attachment and removal of a stabilizer tie. OSHA is incorporatingthis provision under paragraph (f)(5)(v)(G) in the Final Rule. In his comments and hearing testimony, Hoberg (EX. 19C; TR 2/19, p. 61,100) recommended that OSHA require that the platform-mounted equipmentand suspension wire rope shall not be structurally damaged by the loadsfrom the stabilizer tie or its building anchor when the stabilizer tieis attached to the suspension wire rope. In addition, it was recommendedthat the wire rope and platform-mounted equipment shall have the capabilityof withstanding a load that is at least twice the ultimate strength ofthe stabilizer tie. It was Mr. Hoberg's belief that the stabilizer tieshould not be the cause of a wire rope or platform-mounted equipment failurewhich could endanger the personnel using the platform. OSHA agrees that this issue is a matter of concern and should be addressedin the Final Rule. The registered professional engineer, who is responsiblein paragraphs (e)(1)(i) and (f)(1)(i), for the design of the installationmust consider the possible failure of the suspension wire rope and platform-mountedequipment and the need to avoid this occurrence. OSHA addresses this issuein the Final Rule under paragraph (f)(5)(v)(H).Requirements for powered platform installations using button guide stabilizedsystems were proposed in paragraph (f)(5)(vi). Lawrence R. Stafford (EX.9-35; 15-4; TR 2/20, p. 113) objected to the inclusion of this alternatestabilization system in the standard. This commenter stated that therewere certain problems with these systems, such as button breakage and guardraildamage due to guide track hangup, and possible hand injuries from handlingthe guide tracks mounted on the platform. Mr. Stafford believed that thesesystems must be engineered to work properly. Daigel (TR 2/20, p. 357) agreedwith Mr. Stafford that these systems have to be engineered to be effectiveand also noted that New York State does not preclude the use of these systems.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 235) stated that in his experience with buttonguide systems, the guide track does not present a hazard for employees.In addition, he noted that button guide systems developed by his companyhave operated satisfactorily. Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommended that OSHA require that the platform and itsattachments in a button guide stabilization system not be structurallydamaged by the loads imposed on it by the guide track. OSHA agrees andis adding this provison at paragraph (f)(5)(vi)(F). In response to the comments received on this alternate stabilization system,OSHA observes that the Final Rule is requiring in paragraphs (e)(1)(i)and (f)(1)(i) that a registered professional engineeer be responsible forthe design of these installations. This requirement should address theproblems associated with improper design that result in button breakageand guide track hangups. In addition, any problems associated with theoperation of these systems are addressed in paragraph (i)(1)(i) which requiresemployees to be trained in the particular platform to be operated. In large part, OSHA is retaining the button guide stabilization systemas proposed. A few provisions have been renumbered and some word changeshave been made. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222), OSHA requested comments on a recommendationmade by some pre-hearing commenters that requirements for supported equipmentbe deleted, as listed in paragraphs (f)(6) (i), (ii) and (iii). LawrenceR. Stafford (EX. 15-4) and Daigel (EX. 15-14) reiterated their pre-hearingcomments that these requirements be deleted, and stated that supportedsystems have not been fully proven and should not be a part of the standard.The ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986, submitted by Douglas A. Greenaway(EX. 15-8), continued to list the requirements for supporting equipmentthat were listed in the earlier ANSI A 120 draft standard_November 1981.These requirements served as the basis for the requirements listed in theproposal. Hoberg (EXH. 19B) stated that supported platform systems do exist and havebeen in operation for some time. This commenter recommended that OSHA continueto retain these requirements in the Final Rule. In response to commenters who have objected to the placement of the supportedsystems requirements in the proposal, OSHA has not received any informationwhich has shown installation deficiencies or hazards to employees for supportedinstallations which are in use. In addition, proposed paragraphs (e)(1)(i)and (f)(1)(i) would require that all future supported installations bedesigned by a registered professional engineer experienced in such design.OSHA, therefore, has determined that there should not be any unnecessaryrestriction on the means available to employers for elevating and loweringpowered platforms, and is retaining the proposed requirements for supportedequipment in paragraphs (f)(6) (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) in the Final Rule.Paragraph (f)(6)(i) requires that supported equipment maintain a verticalposition relative to the building facade without the use of friction. Paragraph(f)(6)(ii) requires that means be employed to provide climbing tractionfor the supported equipment. Paragraph (f)(6)(iii) requires the use oflaunch guide mullions to align drive wheels. Paragraph (f)(6)(iv) requiresthat supported platforms shall comply with certain requirements of suspendedplatforms. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222) OSHA requested specific commentson proposed paragraph (f)(7)(i) which required suspension wire ropes andconnections to meet the specifications recommended by the hoisting machinemanufacturer. Pre-hearing commenters (EX. 9-17, 9-19) have suggested thatOSHA list the types of connections that can be used, and require the connectionsto have the capability of developing at least 80 percent of the rated breakingstrength of the wire rope. The wire rope connection capability is presentlya requirement in ANSI A120-1970. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) supported OSHA's proposedrequirements in paragraph (f)(7)(i), which do not list the types of connections.In addition, Mr. Hoberg recommended that combination cable should alsobe a component that must meet the specifications of a hoisting machinemanufacturer, since it is also used to suspend equipment. OSHA has considered the comments received and in the Final Rule is revisingparagraph (f)(7)(i) in the following manner. First, combination cable isadded to the provision as a component that must meet the specificationsrecommended by the hoist manufacturer. Second, in response to the prehearingcommenters, OSHA is adding a requirement that the wire rope connectionsbe capable of developing at least 80 percent of the rated breaking strengthof the wire rope. Third, OSHA has decided not to provide a listing of ropeconnections since such information is available in industrial catalogs.Also, any such listing would imply that only the listed connections areacceptable to OSHA. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222), OSHA requested specific commentson proposed paragraph (f)(7)(ii), which provided the formula to be usedin calculating the safety factor of the suspension wire rope and whichis contained in the existing standard. A pre-hearing commenter (EX. 9-17)suggested that the formula be amended to take into account the efficiencyof the termination by adding the efficiency (E) of the wire rope terminationto the numerator as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>F </H1><H1>= </H1><H1>(S)(E)(N) </H1><H2>W</H2> <ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">where, ``F'' is the factor of safety; ``S'' is the manufacturer'scatalog strength of one suspension rope; ``N'' is the number of suspensionropes under load; and ``W'' is the maximum static load at any point oftravel. Athough the commenter admitted that this change would require a reductionin the working load of the platform to maintain the required 10:1 safetyfactor, he believed this would provide a much more accurate factor of safety.In a post-hearing comment, this commenter (EX. 30) stated that introducingthe terminal efficiency factor into the formula would take into accountthe strength of the total rope system.Hoberg (EX. 19B, 88-5; TR 2/19, p. 78) stated that this formula may beincorrectly considered an ``engineering factor'' of safety, as opposedto a ``design factor,'' if the termination efficiency is included. An engineeringfactor of safety, in his view, would include terminal efficiency, bendingefficiency and any other engineering consideration. In addition, Mr. Hobergnoted that the term ``factor of safety'' in the proposed formula was usedin establishing minimum requirements for the wire rope itself and not forthe wire rope assembly which includes terminal efficiency and bending efficency.In order to eliminate confusion, Mr. Hoberg recommended that OSHA changethe term ``factor of safety'' to ``design factor,'' as the American Ironand Safety Institute had done in its <T3>Wire Rope Manual, </T3>Second Edition, 1981, page 77. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supported the use of the term ``designfactor'' in this provision. Lawrence R. Stafford (EX. 15-4) claimed that if OSHA introduced the terminalefficiency factor into the formula, this action would doom all existingplatform type hoists since larger size ropes would be needed. OSHA agrees that the term ``factor of safety'' is inappropriate for theformula in proposed paragraph (f)(7)(ii). This formula is used to calculatethe capability of the suspension wire rope to support, without failure,its working load. The formula is only a ratio of the rated strength ofthe wire rope to the rated working load, and should be more appropriatelyidentified as a ``design factor.'' The formula is not intended to provide an engineering safety factor forthe total rope system, which would necessarily include a number of otherengineering criteria. OSHA, therefore, is changing paragraph (f)(7)(ii)in the following manner. First, the term ``design factor'' replaces theterm ``factor of safety.'' Second, the term ``rated strength'' replacesthe term ``catalog strength'' since it is more generic and permits theengineer to adjust for arbitrary catalog listings. The term ``rated strength''is defined in the Final Rule. Third, the term ``rated working load'' replacesthe term ``maximum static load'' and the phrase ``on all ropes'' is addedfor clarification. ``Rated working load'' is also defined in the FinalRule. Several commenters (EX. 9-17, 9-19; 15-8; 19B; 30; 91) believed that proposedparagraph (f)(7)(iii) was too restrictive in requiring that suspensionropes shall be of improved plow steel or equivalent. The Mac Whyte Company(EX. 9-17, 9-30) stated that improved plow steel should be the minimumgrade acceptable to OSHA, since there are many equipment designs that requiredhigher strength ropes to maintain the design factor. OSHA agrees with thesecommenters that the proposed provision should be clarified to permit theuse of wire rope that is of a higher strength than improved plow steel.OSHA, therefore, is revising the proposed provision in the Final Rule byrequiring the grade of suspension wire rope to be at least improved plowsteel or equivalent rather than improved plow steel or equivalent. No comments were received on proposed paragraph (f)(7)(iv), however, OSHAis changing the term ``factor of safety'' to ``design factor'' for consistencywith paragraph (f)(7)(ii). Proposed paragraph (f)(7)(v) prohibited the use of more than two reversebends in each suspension wire rope. Daigel (EX. 9-31) suggested that reversebends in a wire rope be prohibited with respect to wire rope lay length.Hoberg (EX. 19B) agreed and suggested that, based on accepted standards,more than one reverse bend in six wire rope lays should be prohibited.OSHA understands that the reason for caution in using reverse bends inwire rope is because undue stresses are introduced into the rope if adequatewire rope lay length is not allowed for the rope to relax before reversebending. OSHA, therefore, is changing this provision in the Final Ruleto permit no more than one reverse bend in six wire rope lays. One commenter (EX. 9-19) suggested that OSHA add two other requirements:First, that the diameter of the sheave used to accomplish the change indirection of the wire rope must be the same as the diameter required forthe hoisting sheaves and drums; and second, that a reference be added asto the minimum drum and sheave diameter to be used for any application.In response, OSHA notes that paragraph (f)(4)(vii) addresses the issueof drum and sheave diameters in performance language in the hoisting sectionof the standard. OSHA believes that the drum and sheave diameters to beused for a specific application would be more properly determined by theengineer responsible for the design of the installation. Paragraph (f)(4)(vii),therefore, does not include any reference to drum and sheave diametersin the Final Rule. Two commenters (EX. 9-13, 15-8) and one hearing witness (TR 2/19, p. 193)supported OSHA's requirements in proposed paragraph (f)(7)(vi)(A) relativeto rope tags. Acme Fabricators (EX. 9-13) stated that the information onthe tag is very useful for safety reasons. For example, it is importantthat the date the wire rope was installed appear on the tag as well asthe size and manufacturer of the rope. From this information, an employerwill have knowledge of the age of the rope and can replace the rope witha rope of the same specifications from the same manufacturer, when necessary.This provision remains unchanged in the Final Rule, except the term ``ratedstrength'' replaces the term ``catalog strength'' in renumbered paragraph(f)(7)(vi)(E). The term ``rated strength'' is defined in paragraph (d).Proposed paragraphs (f)(7)(vi) (B) and (C), which address rope tag requirements,remain unchanged from the proposal, and are renumbered as paragraphs (f)(7)(vii)and (f)(7)(viii). Proposed paragraphs (f)(7)(vii) and (f)(7)(ix) are also unchanged fromthe proposal and are renumbered as paragraphs (f)(7)(ix) and (f)(7)(xi).Paragraph (f)(7)(ix) requires a sufficient wire rope length when a windingdrum hoist is used, and paragraph (f)(7)(xi) prohibits the lengtheningor repairing of suspension wire ropes. Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supportedproposed paragraph (f)(7)(viii), which requires a sufficient wire ropelength when traction and sheave type hoists are used. Becor Western Inc.(EX. 9-37) also suggested that OSHA change the phrase ``lowest point ofvertical travel'' in the paragraph to read ``lowest possible point of verticaltravel,'' and eliminate the unnecessary verbiage following the word ``feet.''This commenter believed this change was necessary to achieve consistencywith proposed paragraph (f)(7)(vii). OSHA agrees and the provision is changedin the Final Rule and renumbered as paragraph (f)(7)(x). Paragraph (f)(7)(x) prohibits the use of babbitted fastenings for suspensionwire rope. The reasons for this prohibition are contained in a discussionabove which addresses the deletion of the term ``babbitted fastenings.''Concerning paragraph (f)(8)(i), also unchanged from the proposal, Hoberg(TR 2/19, p. 79) had suggested that OSHA require that an independent groundlead be connected to the platform frame and hoist. In response, OSHA notesthat in Subpart S, electrical, there are generic grounding requirementsunder andSection; 1910.304(f)(5)(v) which would cover the platform frameand hoist. Paragraph (f)(8)(ii) covering design and location of electrical runwayconductor systems remains unchanged in the Final Rule and was supportedduring the rulemaking (EX. 15-8). Daigel (EX. 9-31) suggested that OSHA delete proposed paragraph (f)(8)(iii)which required cables to be protected from damage due to striking the building,because other provisions cover this hazard.OSHA agrees that paragraph (e)(8), which addresses cable stabilization,is meant to prevent the cable from being damaged by striking the building,and is deleting the redundant part of paragraph (f)(8)(iii) in the FinalRule. Proposed paragraph (f)(8)(iv) is deleted in the final rule because it isredundant with paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(D). Spider Staging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) and Hoberg (EX. 19B, C) noted thatthe protective devices for phase reversal and phase failure, addressedin proposed paragraph (f)(8)(v), are a polyphase phenomenon and are notrequired on single phase equipment. Accordingly, it was suggested thatthe term ``three phase reversal'' be substituted to clarify this provision.OSHA agrees and is setting this requirement in paragraph (f)(8)(iv) inthe Final Rule. Paragraph (f)(8)(v), which requires the operator to follow predeterminedprocedures established by the control system, remains unchanged from theproposal. Paragraph (f)(8)(vii)(A) in the proposal has been revised and redesignatedin the Final Rule as (f)(8)(vi)(A). Daigel (EX. 9-31) questioned the needfor requiring a tie-down (mechanical retainment) for carriages which arecounter-weighted with a four to one stability factor against overturningas proposed. Richard W. Hoffman (EX. 9-30) questioned the need for mechanicalretainment of trackless carriages at an established operating point. Thiscommenter believed that the only function of this requirement was to preventhorizontal traversing of the carriage when the platform is over the sideof the building. OSHA agrees that a carriage with the required stability factor againstoverturning does not need a tie-down anchor, and is revising the provisionaccordingly in the Final Rule. OSHA does believe, however, that all carriages,trackless or not, should be required to have a tie-down anchor if sufficientcounterweight is not provided. Daigel (EX. 9-31) suggested that OSHA delete proposed paragraph (f)(8)(vii)(B)which addressed the electrical operating device for power-operated carriages.This commenter noted that paragraph (f)(3)(i)(F) in the carriage sectionof the standard addresses a similar hazard. OSHA agrees, and paragraph(f)(8)(vii)(B) as proposed is deleted in the Final Rule. Several commenters (EX. 15-8; 9-30, 9-43) recommended that OSHA changeits overload protection requirements to permit down travel when excesssuspension wire rope tension is encountered. Richard W. Hoffman (EX. 9-30)noted that if an excess load is applied to the wire rope when a platformis on the rise, it should be possible to lower the platform to clear anyobstruction. Also, Daigel (EX. 9-30) has suggested that OSHA clarify the conditionsnow listed in the present standard under which the load limiting devicewill be utilized. This commenter suggested that OSHA require that the overloadprotection be utilized when the load is in excess of 125 percent of therated load of the platform than when the tension in a hoisting rope exceeds150 percent of its normal tension based on the rated load divided by thenumber of suspension ropes. OSHA believes these comments have merit and is revising proposed paragraph(f)(8)(vii)(C) in the Final Rule to reflect the changes suggested by thecommenters. In addition, OSHA is renumbering this paragraph to be (f)(8)(vi)(B).OSHA proposed in paragraph (f)(8)(vii)(D) that an automatic detector beprovided that will interrupt power to the hoisting motors and apply theprimary brakes if any suspension wire rope becomes slack. Hoberg (EX. 19B,19C; TR 2/19, pp. 79, 122, 123) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supportedthis provision. Hoberg noted, however, that this is the most commonly removedsafety device because it is nearly impossible to move the platform to anew station if it is necessary to ground rig or store the platform. Assoon as the platform sets down, the motors stop, and there is no wire ropeslack available. This commenter, therefore, suggested that a constant pressurebypass switch provision be made available during rigging operations.OSHA believes the suggestion proposed by Mr. Hoberg has merit and thisis included in the Final Rule. In addition OSHA is rephrasing the paragraphfor clarification and renumbering the paragraph to be (f)(8)(vi)(C). Several commenters (EX. 9-30; 15-8; 19B, 19C) recommended that OSHA applythe requirements addressing directional limit switches to self-poweredplatforms. Richard W. Hoffman (EX. 9-30) stated that these requirementsare as pertinent to self-powered equipment as they are to roof poweredequipment. In addition, Daigel (EX. 9-31) recommended that OSHA deletethe phrase ``if required by the configuration of the building'' in therequirement addressing lower directional switches. Mr. Daigel believedthat some form of lower limit protection is required for all powered platforms.OSHA accepts the recommendations presented by the commenters and is revisingthese proposed provisions in the Final Rule. In addition, the paragraphsare combined in one paragraph in (f)(8)(vii). OSHA notes that the lowerdirectional limit switch requirements are especially important when platformsare used over skylights and atriums. A commenter (EX. 9-35) suggested that OSHA require emergency stop switcheson all platforms, and not just on remote controlled, roof powered mannedplatforms, as required in proposed paragraph (f)(8)(ix). No accident dataor other justification was provided by this commenter to support this suggestion.OSHA is retaining proposed paragraph (f)(8)(ix) in the Final Rule withoutchange and is renumbering the paragraph to be (f)(8)(viii). Hoberg (EX. 19C) recommended that OSHA require that an overload devicebe provided for cables which are in constant tension. This commenter statedthat this requirement is necessary to prevent the tensioned cables fromaffecting the operation of the load limiting device required under proposedparagraph (f)(8)(vii)(C), or affecting the platform roll limiting requirementwhich affects stability under proposed paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(C). This commenteralso stated that it was important that the setting of these overload devicesbe coordinated with the overload settings of other devices so as not toaffect their proper function. In addition, the commenter noted that theoverload device should be designed to interrupt equipment travel in thedown direction when the tension limit is reached. OSHA believes this recommendation has merit and is adding a provision inthe Final Rule as paragraph (f)(8)(ix). Paragraph (g) covers inspection and testing requirements. Daigel (EX. 9-31)suggested that-OSHA add the word ``initial'' before the word ``service''in proposed paragraph (g). OSHA accepts this suggestion as an aid in clarifyingwhen field testing must be done. This commenter further suggested thatthe phrase ``no installation shall be subjected to a load in excess of125 percent of its rated load'' be added to this paragraph. The purposeof this addition is to forestall possible damage to an installation duringinitial testing and avoid exposure of employees to risks which might beincurred during subsequent operation of the installation. OSHA agrees withthis commenter and his concerns about the hoist and is adding a modifiedphrase in the Final Rule to limit testing loads for hoists to 125 percentof their rated load. Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37) recommended that OSHA add the phrase ``atintervals specified by the manufacturer/ supplier'' after the word ``person''in paragraph (g)(2)(ii). OSHA agrees with this commenter that such an addition to the requirementwould contribute to a safer working environment for employees. Manufacturersand their agents, such as suppliers, can provide useful information tothe employer/owner on inspection procedures as well as proper inspectionintervals for the equipment they have supplied. In addition, this requirementwould be consistent with the reference to manufacturer procedures requiredin proposed paragraph (g)(3). The addition to paragraph (g)(2)(ii) is madein the Final Rule. OSHA is substituting the term ``competent person'' forthe term ``qualified person'' in paragraphs (g)(2)(i) and (g)(2)(ii) forthe reasons noted earlier in the discussion on definitions of these terms.Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, pp. 26, 59) and Acme Fabricators Inc. (EXH. 9-13)recommended that OSHA require that a recordkeeping program be providedby employers for the inspection of platform installations in proposed paragraphs(g)(2)(i) and (ii). It was their belief that these records be kept forthe use of all concerned parties involved in the safety of the installation.OSHA revised many of its existing recordkeeping requirements in 29 CFRPart 1910 in a Final Rule published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 34552) on September 29, 1986. This rulemakingrevision was in response to the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C.3501 et seq.), which set goals for the phased reduction of Federal informationgathering activities. In this rulemaking, OSHA replaced provisions whichrequired more detailed written records with provisions that would requirea ``certification record'' to distinguish the new form of documentationfrom the records previously required. The certification record containsthe date the work was performed, the signature of the person who performedthe work, and an identifier for the equipment or installation which wastested or inspected. For the purpose of maintaining a consistency withthis certification record procedure used in other OSHA standards, and inresponse to the commenters, OSHA is requiring in paragraph (g)(2)(iii)that a certification record be kept by the building owner for the inspectionsand tests required in paragraphs (g)(2)(i) and (ii). OSHA believes, basedon the past use of certification records, that such records provide usefulinformation without an unnecessary recordkeeping burden. OSHA also notesthat paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) require the building owner to assurethe employer on a continuing basis that the installation meets the majordesign and structural requirements of this standard. OSHA requires, in paragraph (g)(2)(iv), that platforms be inspected forvisible defects before every use and after each occurrence that could affectthe platform's structural integrity. Several commenters (EX. 32, 87, 91)supported this requirement and it remains unchanged in the Final Rule,except the word ``powered'' is replaced with the word ``working'' since``working platform'' is defined in the Final Rule. Acme Fabricators Inc. (EX. 9-13) and Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20, p. 314)supported the maintenance inspection requirements proposed in paragraph(g)(3). Other commenters and a hearing witness (EX. 9-37, 9-45; 87; TR2/20, p. 26) recommended that OSHA include a requirement that a detailedmaintenance log be kept for each inspection. California's Department ofIndustrial Relations (EX. 9-45) stated that a formalized record of maintenancekept on the site provides a uniform means of determining the maintenancestatus of the equipment to assure safe operations. As noted previously in this document, OSHA has developed a method whichrequires building owners to provide a ``certification record'' for inspectionsand tests which are required to be performed. OSHA intends to use thiscertification requirement to ensure that maintenance inspections requiredin (g)(3)(i) are completed by the building owner. This certification requirementwill not prohibit a building owner from maintaining additional recordsfor his or her own use. The wording in proposed paragraph (g)(3) addressingcertification is changed in paragraph (g)(3)(ii) of the Final Rule to provideconsistency with other certification provisions in the standard. OSHA had intended to continue to require maintenance inspections to beperformed at least every 30 days in proposed paragraph (g)(3), at the samefrequency as required by paragraph (e)(3) of the present standard. Thediscussion on this frequency was found in the preamble to the Notice ofProposed Rulemaking in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on January 22, 1985 (50 FR 2903). However, thelanguage of proposed paragraph (g)(3), as published, appeared to allowperiods of greater than 30 days. This was not OSHA's intention. As thepreamble explained, the frequency was to remain the same as in the existingstandard. Therefore, paragraph (g)(3) should have stated that the inspectionand test of each platform shall be made every 30 days, except where thecleaning cycle is less than 30 days such inspections and tests shall bemade prior to each cleaning cycle. OSHA is changing the proposed wordingof paragraph (g)(3) in the Final Rule to correct this error in the maintenanceinspection frequency. In addition, OSHA is substituting the term ``competentperson'' for the term ``qualified person'' in paragraph (g)(3)(i) for thereasons noted in the definition section of this document. OSHA proposed in paragraph (g)(4)(i) the inspection and testing of governorsand secondary brakes at intervals not exceeding 12 months. Becor WesternInc. (EX. 9-37) suggested that OSHA require inspections ``at intervalsspecified by the manufacturer/supplier'' after the word ``tested,'' butnot to exceed 12 month intervals. OSHA agrees with this commenter that the suggested addition would improvethe working environment for employees. Manufacturers and suppliers provideemployers with important information on proper inspection intervals andprocedures for the equipment that has been provided. The addition to paragraph(g)(4)(i) is made in the Final Rule. No comments were received on proposed paragraphs (g)(4) (ii), (iii) and(iv) and these are retained in the Final Rule.OSHA is substituting the term ``competent person'' for the term ``qualifiedperson'' in paragraph (g)(4)(v) for the reasons noted in the definitionssection of this document.Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 80; EX. 19C) recommended that OSHA require a dailytest be made of the secondary brake governor and actuating device beforeeach day's use. This commenter believed it was important that this be doneto make sure that this equipment would operate properly if an emergencyshould occur. Harry Fisher (TR 2/19, p. 121) believed that this recommendationwould be too restrictive for winding drum equipment where the brake andgovernor device are enclosed within the drum and not easily accessible.This commenter noted, however, that there are provisions on the drum ofsuch equipment for inspection of the brake drum to make sure that the brakeitself is free to move.OSHA believes that the recommendation made by Mr. Hoberg has merit. Tworecent investigations (EX. 100-1, 100-7) by OSHA of powered platform accidentshave illustrated the need for this requirement. In each accident, secondarybrakes did not function in an emergency situation and this resulted inthe death of two employees. If a test of the secondary brake governor andactivating device had been performed before use and appropriate correctivemeasures taken, the deaths might have been prevented. OSHA, therefore,is requiring at paragraph (g)(4)(vi) that a daily test be conducted ofthe secondary brake governor and actuating device before use. For equipmentwhere this test is not feasible, as suggested by Harry Fisher (TR 3/20,p. 368), a visual inspection of this equipment will be required beforeuse to ensure that the brake can function when necessary.In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222) OSHA requested comments on the proposedinspection and replacement requirements for suspension wire rope locatedin paragraph (g)(5). In addition, OSHA also requested comments on the relatedissue of suspension wire rope maintenance and inspection records.Several commenters and a hearing witness (EX. 9-37, 15-8, 87; TR 2/19,p. 81) responded on the issue of wire rope maintenance and use. Hoberg(TR 2/19, p. 81) stated that in his opinion there were few properly installedand lubricated wire ropes that experienced fatigue or wear. This commenteralso observed that there were many wire ropes left on roofs with littleenvironmental protection for long periods of time before they were used.Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37) and Carl J. Thurnau (EX. 87) supported requirementsfor wire rope maintenance and use. These commenters recommended requirementsfor proper wire rope storage to prevent damage or deterioration; properinstallation to avoid crushing, nicks or sharp bends; and the followingof unreeling and lubricating provisions recommended by the wire rope manufacturer.OSHA agrees with these commenters that the subject of wire rope maintenanceand use should be addressed by OSHA. If the wire rope is not maintainedand used properly, it will have reduced capability to suspend equipmentand reduced ability to operate properly with the equipment. These factorscan immediately increase the risk for employees using powered platforms.OSHA is not assigning specific requirements for wire rope maintenance anduse because of the variety of suspension wire rope applications, and theneed for the employer to follow the wire rope manufacturer's recommendationsin these applications. In addition, OSHA notes that the New York StateDepartment of Labor Standard 101 (EX. 87) requires suspension wire ropeto be maintained in accordance with manufacturer's recommendations. OSHA,therefore, for the reasons stated, is requiring that the employer shallfollow procedures recommended by the wire rope manufacturer in the maintenanceand use of wire rope in paragraph (g)(5)(i) of the Final Rule.On the subjects of wire rope inspection and replacement, OSHA receiveda significant number of comments on the issues of inspection frequency,who should inspect wire ropes, wire rope replacement criteria and inspectionrecords.On the first issue of inspection frequency, a number of commenters (EX.87; TR 2/19, p. 81; 2/20, p. 491) supported the monthly inspection of suspensionwire rope in proposed paragraph (g)(5). A number of other commenters (EX.9-17, 9-37; 15-8; 87; TR 2/19, pp. 80, 193; TR 2/20, p. 491) suggestedthat OSHA also require a visual inspection of the wire rope before everyuse. Becor Western Inc. (TR 2/20, p. 491) believed it was essential thatemployees using the wire rope be trained to discover gross damage to thewire rope, which may be an immediate hazard, before using the platform.OSHA agrees that a visual inspection of the wire rope for defects has merit.An OSHA fatality investigation involving a powered platform (EX. 100-7)revealed that the primary cause of the fatality was the failure of thesuspension wire rope which had not been inspected on a regular basis. OSHA,therefore, is requiring in paragraph (g)(5)(ii) that a visual examinationis to be made of a suspension wire rope by a competent person before everyuse. The term ``competent person'' is substituted for the term ``qualifiedperson'' in paragraphs (g)(5)(ii) and (g)(5)(iii) for the reasons notedin the definitions section of this document.On the second issue, who should do the inspection of wire rope, Becor WesternInc. (TR 2/20, p. 491) and Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 81) stated that a wire ropeinspector should have the experience and training to judge the capabilityof the wire rope to continue to suspend equipment.OSHA agrees, since the results of the monthly inspection are used to determinethe need to replace the wire rope. This inspector would determine whetherthe wire rope has sufficient integrity to support the platform with thedesired design factor until the next inspection is performed. OSHA, therefore,is requiring in paragraph (g)(5)(iii) of the Final Rule that a competentperson conduct the monthly inspection of the suspension wire rope.On the third issue, wire rope replacement, OSHA received many comments(EX. 9-25, 9-37; 15-8; 30; 87; 88; TR 2/19, p. 81, 159, 193; TR 2/20, pp.41, 491) on whether the suspension wire rope should be replaced at a regularinterval, or be replaced based on the condition of the wire rope at thetime of inspection. This latter method was proposed in paragraph (g)(5).Leonard Nork (EX. 9-25, TR 2/20, p. 41) suggested that OSHA require wirerope to be replaced on an 18-month interval, rather than rely only on replacementcriteria used during an inspection. This commenter believed it was theonly way to ensure that deficient wire ropes would be replaced on a regularbasis.Some commenters (EX. 87; TR 2/19, p. 81; TR 2/20, p. 491) suggested thatOSHA require wire rope replacement at a specified interval, in additionto relying on the results of regular inspections of the wire rope. Hoberg(EX. 88) suggested that a wire rope might continue in use after a specifiedinterval had passed if a qualified person inspected the wire rope and foundit in good condition.Other commenters (EX. 9-37; 15-8; 30; TR 2/19, pp. 159, 193; TR 2/20, p.491) rejected the use of a specified interval and supported OSHA's provisionin proposed paragraph (g)(5) which states that the need for replacementshall be determined by regular inspection and based on the condition ofthe wire rope inspected. Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9.37) noted that it wouldbe difficult to establish a proper wire rope replacement interval becauseof the variety of factors which affect wire rope at each worksite, suchas environment, maintenance and usage. This commenter believed that a dailyinspection by the operators of the platform, a thorough monthly inspectionby a qualified person, and the use of proper replacement criteria duringthe inspection would be the best program for determining the need for wirerope replacement.In addition, Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37) recommended that OSHA transferthe wire rope replacement criteria, which were proposed for inclusion inthe non-mandatory Appendix A, to the standard itself. This commenter statedthat OSHA should list the criteria in the standard that would serve asthe minimum conditions for replacing the wire rope during an inspection.OSHA has considered all the comments on the issue of wire rope replacementand has determined that the proposed method in paragraph (g)(5) of replacingwire rope is the preferred method, and is retained in the Final Rule. Thismethod provides for daily and monthly inspections by qualified personsand the use of criteria for determining the need to replace the wire rope.This determination is based on several reasons. First, in addition to the proposed monthly inspection, OSHA is requiringin paragraph (g)(5)(ii) that the wire rope be inspected before every usefor gross deficiencies. This inspection will provide an early alert onany wire rope deterioration. Second, OSHA is requiring in paragraph (g)(5)(iii) that the monthly inspectionbe conducted by a competent person. This requirement will enhance the qualityof the inspection conducted since the replacement of the rope is a decisionbased on the replacement criteria and the judgment and experience of theinspector. Replacement of the wire rope in this method is focused on thecapability of the wire rope to suspend equipment, and not an arbitraryreplacement interval. Third, the selection of a specific rope replacement interval for all wirerope would be arbitrary and without any supporting data to justify theselected interval. The life of a wire rope on a worksite is greatly affectedby such variables as exposure to the environment, proper handling, storage,usage and maintenance. In addition, the use of a mandatory replacementinterval may cause some employers to rely more on this as a means of wirerope replacement control, and less on a regular inspection by a competentperson during the intervening period. Also, if an inspection by a competentperson shows the wire rope to be sound, it would be unnecessary and costlyto discard the wire rope because a mandatory replacement time has beenreached. OSHA is requiring in paragraph (g)(5)(i) that the employer shall followprocedures recommended by the wire rope manufacturer in the maintenanceand use of the wire rope. The adherence to these manufacturer's recommendationsby the employer would have a noticeable effect on the life of the wirerope, and would be a major factor affecting wire rope replacement. Since OSHA is requiring in paragraph (g)(iv) that the wire rope be replacedbased on the condition found during an inspection of the wire rope, itis appropriate that the minimum conditions for replacement be listed inthe standard rather than the Appendix. The listing of these minimum criteriadoes not prevent the employer from using more stringent criteria in determiningthe need for replacing wire rope during an inspection. OSHA, therefore,is transferring the wire rope replacement criteria from Appendix A to paragraph(g)(5)(iv)(A). A number of comments were received on the wire rope replacement criterialisted in proposed Appendix A. Some commenters (EX. 9-19, 15-8, 19B, 30)and a hearing witness (TR 2/20, p. 493) suggested that wire ropes shouldbe removed if four randomly distributed broken wires are found in threelays or if two broken wires are found in one strand of three lays. Hoberg(EX. 19B) recommended that Table 1 in proposed Appendix A be clarifiedto show that replacement criteria can be either three wires in one strandor six wires in one rope lay. The MacWhyte Company (EX. 30) also notedthat wire rope classification, as shown in Table 1, is not a factor inthe criteria for wire rope replacement according to the <T3>Wire Rope Users Manual,</T3> Second Edition, 1981. This criteria islisted on page 57 (Table 13) of the Manual published by the American Ironand Steel Institute. OSHA has considered all the comments and related available informationand determined that three broken wires in one strand, or six broken wiresin one rope lay, is a sufficient condition for replacement of a wire rope,regardless of its classification. Table 1 in Appendix A is being deleted,and the information from that table is renumbered as paragraph (g)(5)(iv)(A).No comments were received on two other listed conditions for wire roperemoval, which included rope distortion from crushing or kinking and evidenceof heat damage. These conditions are listed in paragraphs (g)(5)(iv) (B)and (C) of the Final Rule. The reduction of the original wire rope diameter was listed as a criterionfor wire rope removal in proposed Appendix A. Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggestedthat for the measurement to be meaningful the diameter measurement of thewire rope should be done while it is under a specified load and comparedagainst previous measurements of the original rope diameter under the sameload. However, the Manual points out that even using these criteria maynot always indicate the need for removal. The Manual lists the variousconditions which may reduce rope diameter (Manual, page 53). Each safetyrelated listed condition, such as abrasion, corrosion, loosening of ropelay and inner wire breakage has been separately identified by OSHA as anindependent reason for removing the rope (andSection; 1910.66(g)(5)(iv)).Further, some reasons for rope diameter reduction are not safety related.Therefore, as recommended by the Manual, OSHA has omitted the reductionof wire rope diameter as a criterion for determining wire rope replacement.Therefore, the listed criteria in the Final Rule and the wire rope inspector'sknowledge and experience should provide a sufficient basis for making theproper decision in replacing wire rope. No comments were received on other wire rope replacement criteria listedin the proposed Appendix A, such as rusting, corrosion and pitting. OSHAis retaining these criteria and these are listed in paragraphs (g)(5)(iv)(D) and (F). Two broken wires in the vicinity of end attachments was listed as a criterionfor wire rope replacement in proposed Appendix A. Hoberg (EX. 19B) recommendedthat wire rope be replaced if a wire break occurred within 18 inches (460.8mm) of the end attachments. From his experience, this commenter believedthat a wire break in this area of the wire rope is significant since itis an indicator of severe stress conditions existing near the termination.OSHA also notes that the present phrase ``in the vicinity of the end attachments''does not provide an inspector with a defined area of inspection for wirebreaks. OSHA, therefore, believes this comment has merit and is including the instanceof a wire break occurring within 18 inches (460.8 mm) of the end attachmentsas a condition for wire rope removal. This criterion is listed in paragraph(g)(5)(iv)(E). Proposed Appendix A lists core failure as another criterion for wire roperemoval. Hoberg (EX. 19B) suggested that protrusion of the wire rope corebe considered as evidence of core failure. This suggestion is supportedby a statement on page 55 of the Manual. OSHA accepts this suggestion and is modifying the criterion accordinglyin paragraph (g)(5)(iv)(G). Another condition for wire rope removal listed in the proposal, a valleybreak, is retained as paragraph (g)(5)(iv)(H). A ``valley break'' is abreak in a wire located in one of two adjacent strands in a wire rope.Hoberg (EX. 19B) noted that a wire rope is subjected to a significant amountof abrasion during its use, and suggested that the wire rope be replacedif the outer wire of the rope has lost one-third of the original diameter.This suggestion is supported by a statement on abrasion of wire rope onpage 52 of the Manual. OSHA recognizes the need to address severe abrasion of the wire rope asone of the criterion for replacement, and is including this in the FinalRule as a condition for wire rope removal. This condition is listed inparagraph (g)(5)(iv)(I).On the fourth issue, inspection records, the California Department of IndustrialRelations (EX. 9-45) and Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-37, TR 2/20, p. 492)suggested that OSHA require written, dated and signed reports of the wirerope conditions found during monthly inspections, and that these reportsbe kept on file. California's Department of Industrial Relations statedthat detailed records of wire rope inspections are necessary for efficientpreventive maintenance practices.OSHA agrees that a record of the wire rope monthly inspection is necessaryto ensure its completion on a regular basis. As noted previously in thisdocument, OSHA has developed a method which requires building owners toprovide a ``certification record'' for inspections which are required tobe performed. OSHA intends to use this certification requirement to ensurethat wire rope inspections required in paragraph (G)(5)(iii) are completedby the building owners. OSHA, therefore, is requiring a certification recordfor each monthly inspection in paragraph (g)(5)(v) of the Final Rule.Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supported proposed paragraph (g)(6) whichaddressed the testing of a hoist in the lifting direction prior to thelowering of personnel below the top elevation of the building. LawrenceR. Stafford (EX. 9-35) suggested that the provision be eliminated, sincehe believed this requirement would be fulfilled by the nature of the useof a platform. After consideration of the comments on this provision, OSHAis retaining it in the Final Rule under paragraph (g)(6).A number of hearing testifiers (TR 2/20, pp. 314, 370; TR 2/21, p. 18)and a commenter (EX. 87) supported proposed paragraph (h)(1) which requiredequipment that affected safe operation to be maintained in proper workingorder. Harry Fisher (TR 2/20, p. 370) noted that in his experience, thelack of maintenance and training were the major causes of accidents.OSHA is retaining this requirement in paragraph (h)(1) in the Final Rule.Paragraphs (h)(2)(i) and (h)(2)(ii) required the cleaning of parts whichare affected by dirt or other contaminants, and are basically unchangedfrom the proposal. In proposed paragraph (h)(2)(i), the phrase ``and freefrom dirt'' is redundant and OSHA has deleted this phrase in the FinalRule.Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8), supported proposed paragraphs (h)(3) (i),(ii) and (iii) which addressed periodic resocketing of wire rope fastenings.OSHA is retaining these requirements in paragraphs (h)(3) (i), (ii) and(iii) in the Final Rule. The term ``babbitted fastenings'' is replacedwith the term ``poured sockets.'' The reason for this change is given inthe explanation for deleting the definition for ``babbitted fastenings''earlier in this document.In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222), OSHA requested comments on a recommendationmade by a pre-hearing commenter that the proposed requirement for periodicreshackling of suspension wire ropes (paragraph (h)(4)) be deleted. Thiscommenter had stated that the periodic reshackling requirement would bemore appropriate to the elevator industry, since the wire ropes used forelevators were more subject to failure due to more frequent operation ofthe equipment it suspended.Leonard Nork (EX. 9-25) suggested that the interval between reshacklingbe decreased from 24 months to 18 months. No justification was given forthis suggested change in frequency.James W. Fortune (TR 2/19, p. 194) and Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 82) recommendedthat OSHA retain the proposed requirement in the Final Rule. Mr. Fortunestated that the shackles are exposed to the elements, corrosion and causticchemicals. In addition, he said that it was difficult to ascertain thecondition of the wire rope inside the shackle.OSHA agrees that reshackling of the suspension wire rope is necessary ata designated interval to maintain a reasonable level of safety for platformoccupants. OSHA, therefore, is retaining this requirement in the FinalRule at paragraph (h)(4).No comments were received on proposed paragraph (h)(5) which addressedthe maintenance of roof systems. OSHA is retaining this provision in paragraph(h)(5) in the final rule.Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) supported proposed paragraphs (h)(6) and(h)(7) which addressed the maintenance of building face guiding membersand the prohibition against making a safety device inoperative. OSHA isretaining both provisions in paragraphs (h)(6) and (h)(7) in the FinalRule.Several hearing witnesses (TR 2/19, p. 83; TR 2/20, pp. 26, 102, 314) anda commenter (EX. 87) supported proposed paragraph (i)(1)(i) which requiredthat employees be proficient in the operation, safe use and inspectionof the particular platform they are operating. Lawrence R. Stafford (TR2/20, p. 102) stated that it should be mandatory that each employer ensurethat his or her employees use the equipment as it has been designed tobe used.OSHA is retaining this requirement in paragraph (i)(1)(i) in the FinalRule. The requirement to train all employees who work on powered platformsin their safe operation and inspection does not specify frequency of training.OSHA did not specify frequency because of the varying patterns of employmentin the industry, with some employees working constantly for contractorsdoing building maintenance and others doing occasional maintenance on buildingstheir employers own. OSHA expects that employers will evaluate the needfor refresher training based on the difference in equipment and buildingsand the amount of time elapsed since the last training session. The word ``powered'' in proposed paragraphs (i)(1)(i) (i)(1)(ii), (i)(1)(ii)(B),(i)(i)(iii) and (i)(1)(iv) is changed to ``working'' in the Final Rulesince the term ``working platform'' is defined in the standard.A significant number of commenters (EX. 9-20, 15-8, 15-12; 38-3; 86-2;88-6; 89) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/20, pp. 269, 278, 322, 370, 462,494; TR 2/21, pp. 8, 17, 79) supported proposed paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(A)which required employee training in recognizing and preventing safety hazardsassociated with individual work tasks. The Window Cleaning ContractorsAssociation (EX. TR 2/20, p. 462) and Becor Western Inc. (EX. TR 2/20,p. 494) each have developed training programs for employees which are nowbeing used. Lee Herzog (TR 2/21, p. 17) stated that Canada has an employeetraining program for platform operators organized by manufacturers anddistributors, in conjunction with a trade school. The Scaffold IndustriesAssociation (EX. 86-2) was developing a training program for its membercompanies at the time of the hearing.Harry Fisher (TR 2/20, p. 370) of Spider Staging Sales Company stated thatin his experience one of the major causes of platform accidents was thelack of training of the employee prior to the accident.OSHA agrees that training of employees is as important as any other aspectof the standard for powered platforms. In Appendix A, paragraph 10 of theFinal Rule, OSHA provides guidelines for employee training programs. Specifictraining requirements for their employees are to be determined by eachemployer.OSHA is retaining paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(A), which addresses training, inthe Final Rule.Proposed paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(B) addresses the need for employee trainingin recognizing and preventing safety hazards on the particular type ofplatform being used. A large number of commenters (EX. 15-3, 15-8, 15-18,37-2, 49-1, 87) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/20, pp. 36, 469; TR 2/21, pp.12, 13, 17, 148) supported the need for this requirement. Leonard Nork(TR 2/20, p. 36) noted that employees must be trained in the use of differentequipment they will be using because of the variations in equipment, stabilizationmethods and worksite conditions. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX 15-8), emphasizedthat the equipment should be used only by persons who have been instructedand trained in its use. Carl J. Thurnau (EX. 87) submitted a copy of theNew York State Department of Labor regulations which address the standardconditions for the operation and maintenance of this equipment. One ofthe conditions requires a person who operates a powered platform to bethoroughly instructed in its use and control.In addition, OSHA notes that lack of employee training in a specific platforminstallation was one of the major causes in at least four different poweredplatform accidents (EX. 97, 98, 100-3, 100-4). These accidents resultedin the death of two employees and in serious injuries to five other employees.In response to the comments received and the pertinent accident data, OSHAis retaining proposed paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(B) in the Final Rule.Paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(C) required that employees be trained in emergencyaction plan procedures. Brian L. Gartner (EX. 37-2) and Lee B. Herzog (EX.58) strongly supported the need for this requirement. Mr. Gartner believedthat teaching an employee to be prepared for an emergency on an elevatedpowered platform is as important as teaching him his operating work procedures.Mr. Herzog provided information on the difficulty encountered by firemenin attempting to rescue untrained workers who were stranded on an elevatedpowered platform.OSHA agrees with these commenters and is retaining proposed paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(C)in the Final Rule. Several commenters and hearing witnesses (EX. 9-1, 15-8; TR 2/20, p. 463,TR 2/21, p. 8) supported proposed paragraph (i)(1)(iii) which requiresthat a qualified person shall train employees in the operation and inspectionof a platform. Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8), endorsed the need for employeesto receive instruction by a qualified person in the use and control ofa powered platform. Jacquelyn Kopp (TR 2/20, p. 463) suggested that thisqualified person could be the building engineer, the foreman or the employer.Pedus Building Services (EX. 9-1) suggested that the instructor (qualifiedperson) have no less than five years of work experience. OSHA is in agreement with these commenters that employees should receiveinstructions only from a person who has had the proper experience and training.The proper selection of instructors for this purpose is critical in thesafety training of employees and should be given due consideration by theemployer. OSHA, however, does not believe it should specify the numberof years of experience an instructor should have to be considered qualified.The term ``competent person'' is substituted for the term ``qualified person''in paragraph (i)(1)(iii) for the reasons noted in the definitions sectionof this document. In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222), OSHA requested specific commenton proposed paragraph (i)(1)(iv) which required that written work proceduresbe provided for employee training. OSHA was seeking information on whetheremployers can use other methods of employee training in lieu of writtenwork procedures as the core of the training program. A significant number of commenters (EX. 14-1, 14-13, 15-4, 15-18, 86-2,87, 88-6) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/19, pp. 83, 238, 248; TR 2/20, pp.314, 324, 463, 502) overwhelmingly supported the need to require writtenwork procedures for operator training. The Travelers Insurance Company(EX. 14-1) noted that its experience in reviewing employee training programshas shown that those programs which include written work procedures arefar superior to those that do not have such procedures. Daigel (TR 2/19, p. 238) noted that the complexity of current buildingexteriors and atriums requires designs by professional engineers, and detailedinstructions for employees who are to maintain the facades of these buildingsthrough the use of powered platforms. He claimed such detailed instructionsare necessary to properly train employees in the rigging and operationof platforms used on new buildings with complex exteriors and atriums.The Tennessee Valley Administration (EXH. 14-3) noted that written operatingprocedures, if properly prepared, provide continuity and consistency tothe training effort. Related to this comment, Thomas J. O'Shea (TR 2/20,p. 314) stated that written procedures are important in the training ofinitial and future operators of powered platforms, since this trainingmethod insures training uniformity in an industry that experiences a highturnover in instructors and building managers who are responsible for thetraining. A number of commenters (EXS. 15-18, 87) and hearing witnesses (TR 2/19,p. 248, TR 2/20, p. 463) stated that many of the manufacturers of thisequipment provide operating manuals which employers can use as a basisfor training their employees. Some manufacturers (TR 2/20, p. 502, EX.9-13) conduct free operator training programs, using written work procedures,for employers who purchase their equipment. For example, Becor Western(EX. 55), a hoist manufacturer, conducts training programs for employeeswho use their equipment. This company, which utilizes written instructionsin its training program, claimed that no one who had ever gone throughtheir training program had ever been involved in an accident involvingtheir equipment. A platform manufacturer, Spider Staging Sales Company(EX. 87), provides its customers with a written operating and maintenanceplan for the equipment. An employer can utilize such a written plan indeveloping his own work procedures for training his employees. Several employer organizations recommended the use of written work proceduresfor training. First, the Window Cleaning Contractors Association (TR 2/20p. 463) strongly. supported the need for written instructions in employeetraining. This Association stated that these instructions should be availableto employees at all times should any question arise as work progresseson the job site. The Association also noted that the manufacturer can supplymuch of the information needed to develop these instructions. Second, theScaffold Industries Association (EX. 86) is currently completing a coretraining program involving written procedures, which will be availableto all members. The training program can then be supplemented as necessaryby employers to suit their own training needs. Hoberg (EX. 88-6) and the Window Cleaning Contractors Association (TR 2/20,p. 463) suggested the use of pictorial instructions when necessary. Thesecommenters believed this type of instruction would be useful in communicatingwith employees having a language disability, and with those employees whomust be familiar with a variety of rigging, operating and inspecting proceduresfor different building installations. No objections were raised by any commenter or hearing witness to the useof written work procedures in employee training.After consideration of the many comments received supporting the requirementfor written work procedures, OSHA is in agreement with the commenters thatthis proposed provision should be retained. In addition to the reasonsgiven by the commenters, OSHA has a number of other concerns which supportthe need for this requirement. First, employees cannot be reasonably expected to remember work proceduresfor the rigging, operation and inspection of platforms with different stabilizationsystems that are used on a variety of building exteriors and interiors,each of which are only maintained two or three times a year. Second, in some areas of the United States, where the literacy rate andthe language facility for operators is low, it is absolutely necessaryto provide appropriate communication materials in a training program forsuch operators. Pictorial instructions, in lieu of written instructions,may be very useful in these areas. Third, the elevated work environment of a powered platform operator, byits very nature, can be very hazardous if the operator does not receiveand have ready access to detailed instructions in the safe operation ofthe equipment, and is prepared to handle emergencies''when the occur. Therecord indicates that a lack of proper training has directly contributedto the death of at least one platform operator. An OSHA investigation (EX.100-4) of a powered platform fatality and the injury of another employeerevealed that lack of proper training was a major factor in causing theaccident. Fourth, the potential is great for serious injury or death to other employeesand public individuals below the platform due to unsafe practices or equipmentfailure. OSHA, therefore, is retaining the requirement that the employer providewritten work procedures at paragraph (i)(1)(iv) and is adding the requirementthat employees be trained in these work procedures at paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(D).In addition, OSHA is permitting the use of pictorial methods of instruction,in lieu of written work procedures, if the training of employees is improvedthrough the use of this method. OSHA is transferring the training requirement for personal fall arrestsystems from proposed Appendix D to the training section of the standarditself, under paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(E). This was done to consolidate allthe training requirements in one section of the standard. USTAG (EX. 8-33)supported the proposed requirement for employee training in personal fallarrest systems and recommended minor clarifications to the provision. OSHAagrees with these recommendations and these have been included in paragraph(i)(1)(ii)(e). A large number of commenters (EXS. 9-13, 15-8, 15-18) and hearing witnesses(TR 2/20, pp. 26, 55, 495, 500; TR 2/21, pp. 9, 17) have suggested variousmeans by which OSHA should require written certification from the employerthat an employee has satisfactorily completed his or her training. BecorWestern (TR 2/20, p. 500) and Douglas A. Greenaway (EX. 15-8) have suggestedthat a certificate should be given to an employee by whoever performs thetraining. Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, p. 26) suggested that a record be keptof the date each employee was trained and the responsible instructor. AcmeFabricators Inc. (EX. 9-13) suggested that the employer be responsiblefor showing visible evidence that his or her employees have attended thenecessary training sessions. OSHA believes that the commenters' suggestions have merit. There is a definiteneed to insure that employees have been properly trained before workingon elevated platforms, since equipment failures and improper operatingpractices can be hazardous. A record of such training is an important partof any employee training program. The record serves as a basis for determiningthe proficiency of operators on the platforms they are using for maintenance,as required in paragraph (i)(1)(i).For consistency with other ``certification record'' requirements used inthis standard, OSHA is requiring in paragraph (i)(1)(v) that the employercertify in writing that an employee has received training in the safe operationand inspection of a particular powered platform. The certification recordwould not prohibit employers from maintaining additional training recordsfor their own use. Employers can comply with this requirement in such away which least disrupts their operation. The employer may choose any methoddeemed to demonstrate compliance with the training requirements as longas it provides the identity of the person trained, the signature of theemployer or person who conducted the training, and the date the trainingwas completed. Paragraph (i)(2)(i) addresses the loading of powered platforms. The R.D. Werner Company Inc. (EX. 9-34) noted that the phrase ``not be loadedin excess of their maximum intended load ratings'' was ambiguous and neededclarification. This commenter suggested that the load ratings be definedto include the load of the users and any material on the platform. OSHA agrees, and is changing the provision to require that platform notbe loaded in excess of the rated load, Paragraph (i)(2)(ii) in the proposalprohibited employees from working on platforms covered with''slippery materials,and it remains unchanged in the Final Rule.In the Notice of Hearing (50 FR 48222); OSHA requested specific commenton proposed paragraph (i)(2)(iii) which required that platform members,including wire and synthetic rope, be shielded when a heat producing processor a corrosive substance is used for maintenance purposes. A number of commenters (EX. 9-34, 9-43; 19B, 19C) and a hearing witness(TR 2/20, p. 263) stated that the provisions were insufficient to addressthe hazards for employees when using a heat producing process or corrosives.R. D. Werner Company, Inc. (EX. 9-34) and Richard W. Hoffman (TR 2/20,p. 263) recommended that employers should follow the recommendations ofqualified persons, such as the manufacturer of the platform and the producerof the corrosive substance, to protect the platform members and rope fromdamage. R. D. Werner Company, Inc. (EX. 9-34) also recommended that ifa wire rope is contacted by a heat producing process, it should be consideredpermanently damaged and should not be used to support platforms. SpiderStaging Sales Company (EX. 9-43) and Hoberg (EX. 19B) strongly suggestedthat the platform be washed down with a neutralizing solution if acidsor corrosives are used. OSHA is in agreement with these commenters that additional measures arerequired to address the hazards posed to platform occupants when they usecorrosives and heat producing processes. Most of the platforms built todayare made of aluminum. Acids and corrosives have a tendency to degrade theheat treatment of the aluminum. This degradation greatly weakens the aluminumand makes it subject to failure. It is necessary, therefore, to take thenecessary precautions to protect the platform members as well as the wirerope. OSHA, therefore, is revising the proposed paragraph (i)(2)(iii) in thefollowing manner: First, employers will be required to follow the recommendations of acidor corrosive substance producers and the platform manufacturers to protectthe platform members and wire rope from damage. If these recommendationsare not available, the employer may obtain equivalent information fromother available sources. In addition, the employer shall be required towash down platforms with neutralizing solutions if exposed to acids orcorrosives. Second, in addition to protecting components of a platform and the wireor synthetic ropes when using a heat producing process, the employer shallnot use ropes which have been contacted by a heat producing process tosupport a platform. Paragraphs (i)(2)(iii) and (i)(2)(iv) in the Final Rule address these points.Proposed paragraph (i)(2)(iv)(A) prohibited any work activity on a platformwhen the wind velocity at the platform level exceeded 40 miles per hour(64.3 km/hr). A number of commenters (EX. 9-31, 9-35, 9-37, 87) recommendedthat OSHA change this limitation to 25 miles per hour (40.2 km/hr). LeonardNork (TR 2/20, p. 26) stated that the 40 miles per hour (64.3 km/hr) limitationis excessive, unsafe, and unnecessary. OSHA has considered these comments in conjunction with other changes madeto the proposal on the subject of wind velocity at paragraphs (e)(2)(iii)(A)and (e)(2)(iii)(C). The proposed 40 miles per hour (64.3 km/hr) velocitylimitation was intended to serve as the design basis for the proposed 14-inchlimit (355.6 mm) on platform displacement. Since this 14-inch (355.6 mm)limitation is eliminated in the Final Rule, the associated wind velocityof 40 miles per hour (64.3 km/hr) has also been eliminated. Accordingly, OSHA is reducing and combining the verbiage in proposed paragraphs(i)(2)(iv)(A) and (B) by prohibiting work activity on all platforms, regardlessof stabilization method, if the wind velocity exceeds 25 miles per hour(40.2 km/hr). The 25 mile per hour (40.2 km/hr) prohibition was supportedby commenters (EX. 2-14, 2-22, 2-26, 2-28) who responded to questions raisedon this subject in OSHA's Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (48 FR6368). In addition, the 25 mile per hour prohibition is also supportedin the ANSI A120 draft standard_January 1986 (EX. 15-8). OSHA is permittingan exception to this limit on wind velocity of 25 miles per hour (40.2km/hr) when the occupants are returning the platform to storage. Proposedparagraphs (i)(2)(iv)(A) and (B) are eliminated and replaced with renumberedparagraph (i)(2)(v) in the Final Rule. Proposed paragraph (i)(2)(v) required that an anemometer be provided onthe building to give information of on-site wind velocities prior to usingthe platform. R. D. Werner Company, Inc. (EX. 9-34) stated that it was necessary forOSHA to define the location of the anemometer on the building, such asthe roof, mid-height or ground level. Some commenters (EX. 9-30, 19B) and hearing witnesses recommended thata portable (hand held) anemometer be used by platform occupants ratherthan relying on an anemometer located on the building. Richard W. Hoffman(EX. 9-30) stated that it was important to measure the wind velocity atthe actual worksite while on the platform, while Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 127)noted that roof-mounted anemometers cannot be relied on to give accuratewind velocity readings for each building face. Leonard Nork (TR 2/20, p. 42) stated that, in the absence of building anemometers,employees have been using portable (hand held) anemometers on platformsin New York City.OSHA has considered the comments addressing the issue of anemometers andmakes a number of other observations. First, for employees to avoid workingin winds in excess of 25 miles per hour (40.2 km/kr), it is necessary forthem to have information on wind velocities just prior to and during theirwork periods on the platform. An anemometer on the roof of a building mayhave little or no correlation to the wind conditions on any given faceof the building. It may record a much higher or much lower wind velocitythan what is occurring at a work station area on the building face. Second, due to current building designs which include irregular shapesand multi-roofs, one building face and elevation area could be virtuallywind-free while at another nearby building face the wind could be quitestrong. Third, employers cannot rely only on local wind forecasts as a true measureof the wind velocity at a specific worksite. Fourth, an anemometer mounted on a platform would provide employees withwind velocity information before and during any work activity on a buildingface. OSHA, therefore, has concluded that proposed paragraph (i)(2)(v) shouldbe changed and is requiring that an anemometer may be permanently mountedon the platform or it may be a portable (hand held) anemometer which istemporarily mounted on the platform during the working period. In addition,the phrase ``on exterior installations'' is added since an anemometer wouldnot be required for interior installations (atriums). Proposed paragraph (i)(2)(v) is replaced with renumbered paragraph (i)(2)(vi)in the Final Rule. Paragraph (i)(2)(vii), which addresses the removal of unnecessary tools,materials and debris on a platform is changed from proposed paragraph (i)(2)(vi).As noted previously, paragraph (i)(2)(vii) incorporates the provision proposedin paragraph (f)(5)(v)(c). Proposed paragraph (j) required employees to be protected by personal fallarrest systems and referenced an Appendix to the standard which coveredfall arrest systems (originally proposed as Appendix D). Comments (EX.14-1, 14-7, 15-4; TR 2/19, pp. 49, 198, 242; TR 2/20, p. 496, TR 2/21,p. 146) were received by OSHA on paragraph (j) and comments on similarissues were received on the proposed Appendix D. OSHA is addressing allof these issues in its response to comments received on the proposed AppendixD which follows. In addition, ``Appendix D'' in the proposal is redesignatedas ``Appendix C'' in the Final Rule. A new paragraph (k) is being added to establish an effective date of January24, 1990. Paragraph (b) of the standard provides for different applicationof andSection; 1910.66 to new and existing installations, depending on whetherthe installations are completed within 180 days of the effective date.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendices </ITAG>The final standard contains four appendices. Two of the appendices, A andB, provide guidelines to assist employers and employees to implement provisionsof the standard. Appendix C and D, however, set out mandatory provisions.Appendix C sets out the requirements for personal fall arrest systems,and Appendix D sets out the requirements for powered platform installationswhich exist or are completed no later than 180 days following the effectivedate of the standard, and which were installed after the effective dateof the unamended standard (August 27, 1971, 36 FR 10466). OSHA notes that none of the statements in Appendices A and B should beconstrued as imposing a mandatory requirement on employers that is nototherwise imposed by the standard. In addition, these appendices are notintended to detract from any obligation that the standard imposes.Appendix A  Some of the guideline data in proposed Appendix A have been changed ornew data have been added in the final rule. These changes and additionswere based on public comments that were received or information that hasbecome available to OSHA since the proposal was issued. Paragraph 1 describes the content of Appendix A and the options the employerhas in complying with the standard. Paragraph 2 (assurance) was added to provide additional information foremployers to comply with the requirements of paragraph (c) in the FinalRule which required the owner of the installation to provide the employerwith specific information. Paragraph 3 (design requirements) was added to list some of the designcriteria that a professional engineer would use in designing an installationas required in paragraphs (e)(1)(i) and (f)(1)(i) in the Final Rule. Hoberg (EX. 19B, 106) suggested that the guide sizes listed for both internaland external tie-in guides in the proposal are too large for standard installationsand should be changed in the Final Rule to a minimum of one inch (25 mm)deep, two inches (50 mm) wide, with a three-quarter inch (19 mm) throat.Spider Staging Sales Co. (EX. 9-43) also suggested that a reduction inguide sizes was warranted. OSHA accepts this suggestion and is changing these items in Appendix Ain the Final Rule and renumbering them as Paragraph 4. Hoberg (EX. 19B) also recommended that OSHA should point out in AppendixA that a poor design of continuous tie-in guides frequently is the causeof a hazardous situation in the use of these units. OSHA believes thissuggestion has merit and is including a reference to this design problemin Paragraph 4 of Appendix A of the Final Rule. No comments were received on paragraph 5 of Appendix A and this remainsunchanged in the Final Rule. Paragraph 6, covering stabilizer tie lengths, is added in the Final Rule.Daigel (EX. 9-31) and Hoberg (TR 2/19, p. 60) agreed that a stabilizertie should be long enough to affect the predetermined angulation of thesuspension cables, but that OSHA should not, as proposed, consider thespecific length alone to be an important factor in maintaining platformstability. OSHA accepts their recommendation that the Agency should emphasizethe need for a stabilizer tie that is easily installed, and yet short enoughnot to become entangled in parts of the platform. Based on testimony and comment, OSHA agrees that Appendix A should notlist unique or specific materials and products. Building owners and employersshould have the option of selecting any type of stabilization system whichmeets the performance criteria and suits their needs. Accordingly, OSHAis replacing specific terms for components and materials with generic termsin Paragraph 7 and other portions of Appendix A. General maintenance guidelines proposed in paragraph 8 of Appendix A areretained in the Final Rule under paragraph 9.Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-39) recommended that OSHA use mandatory languagein the training guidelines provided in proposed Appendix A. For example,this commenter recommended that OSHA require employers to use on-the-jobtraining and formal classroom training rather than have them consider theuse of these training methods in meeting the training requirement. In response, OSHA notes that in paragraph (i)(1)(ii), employers are requiredto train their employees in the safe operation of platforms. The Appendixprovides guidelines which can be used by the employer in meeting this performancerequirement. In this way, the employer has the option of selecting methodswhich are most suitable for training employees in meeting the performancerequirement in the specific workplace. Becor Western Inc. (EX. 9-39) also recommended that OSHA add a requirementthat the employer provide a certificate of training for employees completinga training program. Without this certificate, an employee would not bepermitted to operate a platform. OSHA notes, in response, that in paragraph (i)(1)(i) it is required thata platform be operated only by persons who are proficient in the operation,safe use and inpection of the particular powered platforms to be operated.The employer is then required to certify that each employee has been trained.These requirements are utilized, in lieu of a requirement for a trainingcertificate, to meet the goals of the Paperwork Reduction Act. OSHA, therefore, is retaining the proposed training guidelines under item10 in Appendix A of the Final Rule. In addition, the training guidelinesare emphasizing the need to include employee instruction in handling emergenciesat the workplace. Guidelines for determining equivalency in the suspension and securing ofpowered platforms are retained in item 11 of Appendix A.Appendix B Appropriate changes are made in the text of Figures 2 and 3 of AppendixB to ensure consistency with relevant sections of the standard.Appendix C Paragraph (j) of the powered platform standard, andSection; 1910.66(j), requiresemployees on powered platforms to be protected by personal fall arrestsystems, meeting the requirements of Appendix C, Section I of this standard.Appendix C, Section I establishes mandatory criteria and test methods forpersonal fall arrest systems. Section II sets out test methods which maybe used to show compliance with certain criteria in Section I. SectionIII of the Appendix provides non-mandatory guidelines for employers touse in complying with the proposed criteria. Appendix C is technologically feasible because it requires the use of personalfall protection systems that are already in use by many window washer andexterior building maintenance contractors. The performance criteria forpersonal fall protection components and systems are criteria that are well-establishedfor manufacturers of this equipment. OSHA has received a number of comments and testimony on the proposed Appendix.The following discussion summarizes this body of comments and testimonyrelative to Appendix C and identifies the changes to the proposal whichhave been made in this final rule and gives OSHA's reasons for the changes.It should be noted that this Appendix (Appendix C) had been proposed asAppendix D. All comments and testimony received on the fall protection Appendix supportedrequirements that would protect employees on powered platforms from fallhazards. Two commenters recommended a separate standard (EXS. 8-14, 8-21),but supported the requirements in the proposed Appendix. Although OSHAhas placed fall protection requirements in a separate appendix, this inno way indicates that the fall protection requirements are less importantthan others pertaining to powered platform workers. The reasons for placingthese requirements in an Appendix to the final rule relate to OSHA's intentionto develop a generic fall protection equipment standard for general industryin the future. These reasons are discussed further in the summary and explanationof the scope and application paragraph of Appendix C (paragraph (a)) below.One participant (EX. 9-31) questioned whether proposing to place the fallprotection rules in an Appendix would limit rulemaking participation byequipment designers and manufacturers. It should be noted, however, thatthe trade association representing manufacturers of personal fall protectionequipment, other equipment manufacturers, and the U.S. Technical AdvisoryGroup on Personal Equipment for Protection Against Falling, ISO/TC94/SC4,all participated in this rulemaking by providing comments and testimonyon proposed Appendix D. Therefore, OSHA believes that substantial publicparticipation has taken place. Further, although OSHA plans to developa separate ``generic'' standard for personal fall protection equipment(see Item 1539 (RIN: 1218-AA48) of the Semi-Annual Regulatory Agenda (52FR 40527, October 26, 1987)), the Agency has determined that it is necessaryat this time to provide requirements and performance criteria for personalfall protection equipment used on powered platforms to protect employeesfrom fall hazards while working from these platforms, because of the significantrisks of fall hazards faced by such employees. OSHA has considered alternative approaches suggested by participants. TheUnited States Technical Advisory Group, an advisory group representingGovernment and private interests on personal equipment for protection againstfalling, ISO/TC94/SC4 (USTAG) recommended a ``substitute'' appendix which,unlike the proposed appendix that only specified significant design criteriaand overall ``system'' requirements, would define components and subsystemsof personal fall arrest systems, and recommended that specific requirementsbe provided for these, as well as for the complete system (EX. 8-33). WhileOSHA does not object to this approach in theory, it cannot be accomplisheduntil requirements and standards for all such components and subsystemshave been developed and validated. The USTAG did not recommend the actualrequirements and test methods for components in their ``substitute'' appendix.There are no American National Standards, or other national consensus standardswhich include requirements for all the components and subsystems recommendedfor inclusion by the USTAG. OSHA believes that it is not necessary to establish detailed requirementsand test methods for all components and subsystems of a fall protectionsystem in order to provide employee safety. The requirements set forthin Appendix C establish the performance criteria for the overall systemas the employee would use it. OSHA believes that this will assure employeesafety without addressing the specifics of all components. It should benoted that OSHA's approach in Appendix C does not preclude the future developmentof requirements for components, which could be accomplished by voluntarystandards writing bodies. OSHA's systems approach is consistent with theapproach currently taken in existing voluntary standards for personal fallprotection equipment. Paragraph (a) of Section I, scope, states that this section includes therequirements for personal fall arrest systems required for use by all employeesusing powered platforms. OSHA has determined that the provisions in AppendixC, Section I, contain appropriate requirements for personal fall arrestsystems used by employees working on powered platforms, based on the recordof this rulemaking. As noted earlier, however, the Agency is also currentlydeveloping a ``generic'' proposed rule which will provide criteria forsuch fall arrest systems wherever they are used in general industry. Thecomments and data on fall arrest systems which were submitted to the recordof the powered platforms rulemaking are also being used in the developmentof the generic rule. OSHA anticipates that the provisions on personal fallarrest systems in Appendix C, Section I, of the powered platforms standardwill be consistent with the proposed requirements for those systems inthe proposed generic rule. Ultimately, OSHA intends to apply the generic rule to all uses of personalfall arrest systems in general industry, including powered platforms. Accordingly,the rulemaking on the generic rule will raise the issue of whether AppendixC, Section I, should be superseded by the generic requirements. One ofthe reasons for placing the fall arrest system requirements for poweredplatforms in a mandatory appendix instead of in the text of the standarditself was to facilitate its replacement in the future. Should OSHA laterdecide to apply the generic rule, the deletion of the appendix would notinvolve detailed reworking of the regulatory text in the powered platformsstandard. Paragraph (b) of Section I sets out definitions for terms used in AppendixC. OSHA is using the term ``anchorage'' rather than ``fixed anchorage''as proposed. The rulemaking considered whether requirements for anchoragesshould be included in the criteria for personal fall arrest systems. USTAGrecommended that the topic of anchorages be the subject of a separate standardfor the voluntary standards community to address and for OSHA to then reference(EX. 8-33). At this time there are no separate voluntary standards foranchorages, so OSHA cannot rely on then for a proper and safe anchorage.OSHA disagrees with USTAG's view that an anchorage is not part of the personalfall arrest system, since without an anchorage the equipment will not functionto arrest a fall. OSHA notes also that the equipment manufacturer, althoughusually not directly supplying the anchorage, can specify what anchorageis necessary to have the overall system function properly. Dr. Nigel Ellisin his written testimony (EX. 15-20) agrees with OSHA that the anchorageis part of the personal fall protection system. Several comments were received on the definition of ``body belt'' (EXS.8-14, 8-21, 8-33). All comments suggested deleting a reference to additionaloptional straps around the rib cage because it would combine two differenttypes of equipment, i.e., body belts and chest-waist harnesses, into onedefinition. OSHA agrees with these comments and has deleted the referenceto the secondary straps. One comment was received on the definition of ``buckle'' (EX. 8-33) whichsuggested that the term was superfluous, and should be addressed in a separatenational consensus standard for body support systems. OSHA disagrees sincethe term is used in the OSHA standard and there is not yet a national consensusstandard for body support systems which includes this term. This definitionhas not been changed in the final standard.One comment was received on the definition of ``competent person'' (EX.8-33) which recommended that such a person must have technical competencyon more than just components. OSHA agrees with this comment and has revisedthe definition in the final standard to require knowledge in the completesystem, its application and its use. The definition is similar to the definitionof the same term in the powered platform standard, but is more specificas it relates to fall protection. OSHA is replacing the proposed term ``hardware'' with the term ``connector.''Two comments stated that ``hardware'' was too broad and one suggested thatthe term ``connector'' be used instead (EXS. 8-21, 8-33). OSHA agrees withthese suggestions, notes that ``connector'' connotes the specific functionat issue, has deleted the term ``hardware,'' replaced it with the term``connector'' and has expanded the definition. Comments were received on the definition of ``deceleration device'' (EXS.8-33, 15-20). It was suggested that this term be eliminated and replacedwith three terms, ``fall arrester,'' ``energy absorber,'' and ``self-retractinglifeline/ lanyard'' because the examples listed by OSHA in its proposeddefinition of deceleration device serve varying combinations of the functionof these three suggested components. In particular, it was pointed outthat a rope grab may or may not serve to dissipate a substantial amountof energy in and of itself. The distinction that the commenter was makingwas that some components of the system were ``fall arresters'' (purposeto stop a fall), others were ``energy absorbers'' (purpose to brake a fallmore comfortably), and others were ``self-retracting lifeline/lanyards''(purpose to take slack out of the lifeline or lanyard to minimize freefall). OSHA notes however, that it is difficult to clearly separate allcomponents into these three suggested categories since fall arrest (stopping)and energy absorption (braking) are closely related. In addition, manyself-retracting lifeline/lanyards serve all three functions very well (acondition which the commenter labels as a ``subsystem'' or ``hybrid component'').OSHA believes that the only practical way to accomplish what is suggestedwould be to have test methods and criteria for each of the three componentfunctions. However, at this time, there are no national consensus standardsor other accepted criteria for any of the three which OSHA could proposeto adopt. In addition, OSHA's approach in the final standard is to address personalfall arrest equipment on a system basis. Therefore, OSHA does not haveseparate requirements for ``fall arrestors,'' ``energy absorbers'' and``self-retracting lifeline/lanyards'' because it is the performance ofthe complete system, as assembled, which is regulated by the OSHA standard.OSHA's final standard does not preclude the voluntary standards writingbodies from developing design standards for all of the various componentsand is supportive of this undertaking. OSHA notes that manufacturers mayadvertise specific attributes of deceleration devices, such as low arrestingforces (shock absorbing qualities) and stopping distance (arresting qualities).OSHA has, however, used the commenters' suggestions to clarify the definitionof ``deceleration device,'' as well as, further clarify the test methodsapplicable to the various assembled systems. This is discussed furtherbelow. Several comments were received on the proposed definition for ``decelerationdistance'' (EXS. 8-14, 8-33, 15-20). Concern was expressed by all commentersthat it was only possible to evaluate the stopping distance for the deviceitself once it was activated. OSHA agrees with these comments and has revisedthe definition of deceleration distance to exclude lifeline elongationand any free fall distance which occurs before the device is activated.In addition, suggestions for clarification of the definition were accepted.OSHA has added a definition for ``equivalent'' to clarify the meaning ofthis term as used in paragraph (c)(1), which provides for connectors madeof equivalent materials to those made of drop forged, pressed or formedsteel. ``Equivalent'' is defined to mean alternative designs, materialsor methods to protect against a hazard which the employer can demonstratewill provide an equal or greater degree of safety for employees than themethods, materials or designs specified in the standard. Comments received on the proposed definition of ``force factor'' (EXS.8-33, 15-20, 8-4, 8-27, 15-10) and testimony presented (2/19-258, 2/21-128,2/21-140-142, 2/21-38, 39, 44, 45, 46) all suggest that the term ``forcefactor'' is confusing, even to systems experts, and that it would not beneeded if the factor was incorporated into the test methods. OSHA agreeswith these comments and is deleting the term ``force factor'' from thefinal standard, but is incorporating the concept in the test methods inSection II. One comment was received on the proposed definition of free fall (EX. 8-33)suggesting that the phrase ``personal fall arrest system'' should be usedas well as the definition being further clarified to define when the freefall period ends. OSHA agrees with this suggestion and has revised thedefinition of free fall accordingly. A comment was received on the proposed definition of ``free fall distance''(EX. 8-33) which provided suggestions for clarification. OSHA agrees withthis suggestion and has revised the definition of free fall distance accordingly,so that it is clear which extensions of equipment are excluded.A commenter (EX. 8-33) pointed out that the proposed definition of bodyharness neglected to mention the pelvis as an important body support memberand suggested a revised definition. OSHA agrees with the suggestion andhas revised the definition of body harness accordingly.USTAG (EX. 8-33) commented that the terms ``lanyard,'' ``lifeline,'' and``tie-off'' which are used throughout the proposed standard are not definedand suggested that definitions be added for these terms. OSHA notes thatthe terms ``rope grab'' and ``self-retracting lifeline/lanyard'' whichwere used in the proposed standard were also not defined. OSHA believesthat all these terms should be defined and has added definitions for eachof the five terms in the final standard based on USTAG's comments.Two comments were received on the proposed definition of ``personal fallarrest system'' (EX. 8-21, 8-33). Both suggested revisions to clarify thedefinition, and one recommended excluding ``anchorages'' from the definition.As discussed above, OSHA has determined that inclusion of anchorages inthe system is proper. OSHA agrees with the other suggestions for clarification,and has revised the definition of personal fall arrest system accordingly.USTAG (EX. 8-33, 2/21-39) recommended that a definition for qualified personbe added since it is their belief that a qualified person is necessaryfor designing or selecting horizontal lifelines. Another commenter (EX.15-20) recommended that a definition of qualified person be added and usedin anchorage design. OSHA agrees with these comments and has added thesuggested definition, which is consistent with other OSHA definitions.Many comments (EX. 8-14, 8-21, 8-27, 8-33), and testimony (2/19-253, 259,2/21-38, 47, 128) were received on ``snap-hook.'' Suggestions were receivedto better define snap-hooks, distinguishing between locking and non-lockingsnap-hooks. OSHA agrees with the suggestions for a more comprehensive definitionand has revised the definition of snap-hook accordingly.USTAG commented (EX. 8-33) that the term ``strength factor,'' like theterm ``force factor,'' was useful in theoretical discussion but confusingwhen used in the standard. OSHA agrees with this comment and has deletedthe terms ``strength factor'' and ``force factor'' from the definitionsand final standard, but has incorporated them into paragraph (d)(1)(iv)by requiring that personal fall arrest systems withstand twice the potentialimpact load.USTAG commented (EX. 8-33) that the term ``total fall distance'' shouldbe revised to make it clear that lanyard extension is included in decelerationdistance. OSHA agrees with this comment. However, for clarity, OSHA hasdecided to use the term ``deceleration distance'' in the performance requirementsand has deleted the term ``total fall distance'' from the final standard.Paragraph (c)(1), like the proposal, requires that connectors be drop forged,pressed or formed steel, or equivalent materials. Two comments stated thatOSHA should require components to meet specific tests rather than specifydesign processing and materials (EX. 8-21, 8-33). However, tests have notbeen submitted which would assure the integrity of the hardware components.Therefore, OSHA is relying on specifications which were taken, in part,from the OSHA Construction Standards (29 CFR 1926.104(e)) on personal fallarrest equipment. OSHA's experience is that these criteria conform to industrypractice and that conforming components are reliable. OSHA has limitedthis requirement to connectors (critical load bearing hardware) and hasalso allowed these components to be made of equivalent materials. Thus,OSHA believes that the requirement now addresses the proper componentsand is not overly restrictive since equivalent materials are permitted.A commenter (EX. 8-33) suggested that paragraph (c)(2) require that hardwaremeet the ASTM Salt Spray Test Standard to evaluate whether it is corrosion-resistantas required by the provision. OSHA believes, however, that components madeof inherently corrosion-resistant materials, such as those cadmium plated,are widely acknowledged and do not need testing. Therefore, OSHA has retainedthe requirement as proposed, with the exception of changing the term ``hardware''to ``connectors'' for the reasons discussed above (see discussion of connectordefinition).Paragraphs (c) (3), (5), (6), and (10) contain, among other criteria, variouslimits expressed in pounds and kilonewtons. For example, the breaking strengthof lifelines and lanyards in tension is required to be a minimum of 5,000pounds (22.2 kN). These limits are based on the general requirement, takenfrom the ANSI A10.14-1975 Standard, that a personal fall arrest systemhave an arresting force not to exceed 10 times gravity. Assuming a workerdesign weight of 250 pounds (113 kg), the maximum permitted force wouldbe 2,500 pounds (11.1 kN) (250andmultiply;10= 2,500). Applying a safety factorof at least two for the components of the personal fall arrest system,these components must then have a minimum strength of 5,000 pounds (22.2kN), which is the basis for the strength requirements in these paragraphs.(The test methods contained in Section II of Appendix C may be used todemonstrate that the assembled personal fall arrest system also maintainsa safety factor of at least two.)In reviewing the strength and force requirements of paragraphs (c)(3),(c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(9), (c)(10), and (d)(1), the reader will note thatfour of the provisions require a strength of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN), oneprovision (paragraph (c)(9)) requires a safety factor of at least two toone, and another provision (paragraph (d)(1)) requires the system limitarresting forces to 900 pounds (4 kN) for body belts and 1,800 pounds (8kN) for body harnesses.At a glance, it may appear that there may be some inconsistencies in theserequirements. For example, applying a safety factor of two to one to thearresting force limit for harnesses yields 3,600 pounds (16 kN) (2andmultiply;1,800),which is significantly less than the 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) required forother components, such as lanyards. However, even though the arrestingforce would not exceed 1,800 pounds (8 kN), the higher strength requirementsof 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) for components of the system are necessary becauseother factors affect the strength required for these components.OSHA observes that comments and testimony presented by USTAG supportedlowering the arresting force limits from those contained in the proposal,while at the same time supporting the higher strength limits (as proposed)for components, such as lanyards and snap-hooks. OSHA agrees with USTAG'scomments that, even though the arresting force would not exceed 1,800 pounds(8 kN), the higher strength requirements of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) forcomponents of the system are necessary because other factors affect thestrength required for these components. For instance, if knots are tiedin lanyards or lifelines the strength may be reduced by one-half. Also,if lanyards or lifelines strike the edge of materials or obstructions duringfall arrest, the cutting action on these components can be sustained bythe larger diameter, stronger ropes that would be required to achieve thehigher strength requirement. Similarly, if snap-hooks and dee-rings strikeobjects during fall arrest, the higher strength will be needed to preventfailure of the components due to loading in other than simple tensile loading(such as shear loading). The rationale for the lower arresting forces inparagraph (d)(1) is discussed below.One commenter (EX. 8-33), recommended that the tensile strength of lifelinesand lanyards, proposed as 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) breaking strength, beevaluated using Federal Standard 191 Test Method 6015 or 6016. OSHA doesnot believe that a specific test procedure for breaking strength needsto be specified since all test procedures used by manufacturers and associationsfor rating breaking strength adequately evaluated these components. Therefore,OSHA has adopted the proposed wording, unchanged, for the final standardin paragraph (c)(3).Several comments were received on paragraph (c)(4) (EXS. 8-21, 8-24, 8-27,8-33, 15-20) regarding the strength and method for measuring the strengthof self-retracting lifeline/lanyard devices. The comments pointed out thatin their experience many self-retracting lifeline/lanyard devices do notsustain the proposed force of 3,000 pounds without the brake slipping.This slipping is a part of the design of the devices to reduce fall arrestforces to a safe level. Thus, OSHA has revised paragraph (c)(4) in thefinal standard to require the components of self-retracting lifeline/lanyarddevices to sustain a load of 3,000 pounds (13.3 kN) with the lifeline orlanyard in the fully extended position. The lower strength requirementof 3,000 pounds (13.3 kN) is based on permitting a very limited free falldistance while maintaining a safety factor of at least two. USTAG (8-33) recommended that energy absorbers used as separate systemcomponents be capable of sustaining a minimum tensile load of 5,000 pounds(22.2 kN) when fully extended. OSHA agrees with this comment as it appliesto rip-stitch lanyards, tearing and deforming lanyards, and self-retractinglifelines and lanyards which do not limit free fall distance to two feet(0.61 m) or less, and has added this requirement for these decelerationdevices as paragraph (c)(5) in the final standard. Comments and testimony received on proposed paragraph (c)(5) (EXS. 8-33,15-20, 36, 2/21-52, 75, 76, 91, 143) discussed whether or not 100 percentproof-testing (testing each part before use) of snap-hooks and dee-ringsis necessary to assure that the proposed requirement for a tensile strengthof 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) is met. OSHA's intent is to require that snap-hooksand dee-rings not fail to a degree that they will not sustain a load of5,000 pounds (22.2 kN). Thus, permanent deformation of the components isallowed provided the part can still support the load. Commenters were notconcerned with this strength requirement, but rather that heat treatingand other manufacturing processes be properly followed. USTAG (8-33, 2/21-39)and a manufacturer of dee-rings and snap-hooks (2/21-75, 76) recommendedthat 100 percent proof testing of these components at a reduced load, allowingno permanent deformation or loss of function, be added to the strengthrequirement to assure that the strength requirement is met, since it wastheir experience that the heat treating and other manufacturing processesused for these parts did not always result in the desired strength of theparts (which when proof tested showed some parts to be only half theirintended strength). OSHA agrees with this recommendation and has retainedthe strength requirement in paragraph (c)(6) as proposed, and added a newrequirement in paragraph (c)(7) which requires proof-testing of snap-hooksand dee-rings. Therefore, these components would need to be spotcheckedat a strength of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) allowing permanent deformation,and 100 percent checked at a strength of 3,600 pounds (16 kN) allowingno permanent deformation or loss of function. Many comments (EXS. 8-14, 8-21, 8-27, 8-33, 15-10, 15-20, 36) and muchtestimony (EXS. 2/19-253, 2/21-38, 47, 117, 129, 142) were received onsnap-hook design. USTAG, as well as other individual commenters, recommendedthat only locking snap-hooks be allowed due to the possibility of non-lockingsnap-hooks becoming accidentally disengaged during use. A number of accidentsinvolving accidental disengagement (``roll-out'') were cited in supportof this position (EX. 8-33). The Industrial Safety Equipment Association(ISEA) and several other commenters argued that locking snap-hooks wouldnot always prevent ``roll-out.'' In addition, they pointed out that non-lockingsnap-hooks can be used safely as long as they are used properly (EX. 36).In particular, it was explained that a non-locking snap-hook must be matchedwith a dimensionally compatible attachment. Several commenters expressedthe opinion that a locking snap-hook may also disengage if used with anincompatible connection. There is no evidence suggesting that locking snap-hookshave accidentally disengaged. In addition, comments and testimony received(EXS. 8-33, 36, 8-27, 2/19-259, 2/21-38, 47, 117, 129, 142) clearly supporteda position that locking snap-hooks were superior to non-locking snap-hooksin minimizing ``roll-out'' accidents. However, OSHA believes that the record shows that non-locking snap-hookscan be used safely, but only with dimensionally compatible attachments(2/19-254, 259). The use of dimensionally incompatible attachments withnon-locking hooks is not acceptable because that practice increases thelikelihood that the snap-hook will become disengaged. (A dimensionallycompatible combination is one where the diameter of the dee-ring to whicha snap-hook is attached is greater than the inside length of the snap-hookmeasured from the bottom (hinged end) of the snap-hook keeper to the insidecurve of the top of the snap-hook, so that no matter how the dee-ring ispositioned or moves (rolls) with the snap-hook attached, the dee-ring cannottouch the outside of the keeper so as to depress it open.) By contrast,OSHA believes that locking snap-hooks can be designed to prevent ``roll-out''even if connected to incompatible attachments. Therefore, OSHA has addeda provision to the final standard in paragraph (c)(8) which requires thatsnap-hooks have compatible dimensions in relation to the member to whichthey are connected so as to prevent unintentional disengagement of thesnap-hook by depression of the snap-hook keeper by the connected member,or they shall be a locking type snap-hook designed to prevent disengagementof the snap-hook by the contact of the snap-hook keeper by the connectedmember. Several comments (EXS. 8-4, 8-27, 8-33, 15-20, 2/21-39) were received onproposed paragraph (c)(6) and (c)(7) concerning horizontal lifelines, andanchorages. These comments were concerned about the difficulty in designinghorizontal lifelines which could support 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) per employeeand the lack of a margin of safety in the proposed requirement for anchoragestrength. Several of these commenters recommended that anchorages and horizontallifelines be selected or designed by a qualified person. USTAG recommendedthat the strength of anchorages be a minimum of twice the potential dynamicloading force if certified by a qualified person, 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN)strength if not certified. USTAG also recommended that horizontal lifelinesbe designed by qualified persons. OSHA agrees in principle with these commentsand has revised its provisions dealing with horizontal lifelines and anchoragesso that a qualified person is involved in the design and use of horizontallifelines. Paragraph (c)(9) in the final standard requires horizontal lifelinesto be designed, installed and used as a part of a complete personal fallarrest system which maintains a safety factor of at least two, under thesupervision of a qualified person. Paragraph (c)(10) requires anchoragesto be capable of supporting a minimum load of 5,000 pound (22.2 kN) peremployee attached, or be designed, installed and used as part of a completepersonal fall arrest system under the supervision of a qualified personand maintaining a safety factor of a least two. USTAG (EX. 8-33) recommended that ropes and straps used in lanyards, lifelines,and strength components of body belts and body harnesses be made from syntheticfibers. This recommendation was made because the strength of natural fiberrope is not reliable or predictable as it ages during use. In addition,the strength deterioration of this type of rope is not obvious nor alwaysdetectable during inspection. OSHA's information (EX. 11-2) confirms thisrecommendation and the Agency has added a new requirement in paragraph(c)(11) of the final standard to address this subject. A significant volume of testimony and comments was received on proposedparagraph (d) which contains the criteria for system performance.OSHA proposed in paragraphs  I(d)(1)(i) and I (e)(3) of Appendix D (nowAppendix C) to allow body belts to be used for up to a six foot (1.8 m)free fall distance and up to a force limit of 10 times the worker's weight(10 gn) or 1,800 pounds (8 kN) whichever is less (50 FR 2890). This wasconsistent with ANSI A10.14-1975 (EX. 11-1), and a NBS report (EX. 11-2).OSHA noted, however, that the variances and the compliance directive (STD.1-3.3) issued to allow intermittent stabilization systems for powered platformsrequired body harnesses to be used, rather than body belts. Also, the draftISO standard would restrict the use of body belts in fall arrest systems,and allow only body harnesses (EX. 11-3). At the time of the proposal, OSHA also cited a study (EX. 11-4) which concludedthat body belts should be prohibited because of their injury potential.Recommended limitations on the use of body belts were also cited. Theyincluded two concepts: (1) Imposing a force limit, expressed in pounds,on the use of body belts and (2) allowing body belts to be used only forfree falls of up to a specified distance, commonly two feet (0.6 m) (EXS.11-5, 11-6). After review of the comments and testimony relating to these issues asdiscussed further below, OSHA has decided that body belts may be used whenthe fall arrest system of which they are a part limits maximum arrestingforce on an employee to 900 pounds (4 kN) (paragraph (d)(1)(i)). Thus,the final rule has reduced the amount of arresting force permitted by half,from 1,800 to 900 pounds (8 kN-4 kN). OSHA believes that the final rulewill protect employees against significant injury stemming from the useof body belts and that a total restriction on the use of body belts isunnecessary. The reasons and evidence for these findings are as follows: OSHA believes that the proper use of body belts, by trained personnel andsubject to the restrictions in this appendix, is safe. Evidence concerninginjury potential of using body belts, OSHA believes, relates to the improperuse, or use under preventable unsafe conditions. For example, experimentsof Dr. Maurice Amphoux were characterized as showing that the use of bodybelts is damaging, because the loads are concentrated on one strap (seeEXS. 2/21-42). These studies found that prolonged suspension could resultin injury. However, since OSHA has provided for prompt rescue (paragraph(e)(8)), and in light of other testimony showing the safe use of body beltsin such conditions, OSHA believes that no inherent and inevitable damageflows merely from the use of body belts. Testimony from Dr. Nigel Ellis,also supported the proper use of body belts for fall arrest with limitationsconcerning suspension distance and rescue time (EXS. 2/21-123). Systematic evidence on the injury potential of body belt use, based onactual use analysis was not available. Since in the past, fall protectionhas been provided for the most part by the use of body belts rather thanharnesses, many participants testified generally on their knowledge ofthe performance of belts and of the inherent safety of using belts. LeonardNork, a representative of two unions whose members use powered platforms,testified that body belts are used just about exclusively in the Stateof New York on powered platforms (EXS. 3/20-46). Mr. Nork further statedthat in over 30 years he did not know of any fatality caused by the useof a body belt (EXS. 3/20-48). Other participants testified of incidentswhere body belts allegedly caused injury, but first hand knowledge waslacking (EXS. 2/21-123). Mr. Nork also noted that there was worker resistanceto the use of body harnesses because they ``find them very, very cumbersome.''The Agency agrees with Mr. Nork that the degree of comfort provided byvarious systems is not relevant if ``it can be demonstrated clearly thatone system provides a greater measure of safety for workers'' (see EXS.3/20-48). However, the evidence on this record shows that belts can provideequivalent safety to harnesses when properly used, and the standard establishesthe condition under which OSHA believes that such safety can be provided.As stated above, OSHA has determined that body belt use must not exceedcertain arrest force limitations. At the time of the proposal, OSHA believedthat body belts could be safely used up to a force limit of 10 times theworker's weight or 1,800 pounds (8 kN) whichever is less. OSHA based thisproposed limitation on the current ANSI standard (A10.14-1975, EX. 11-2),and an NBS Report (EX. 11-2). Various participants supported different limitations: The Industrial SafetyEquipment Association (ISEA) supported OSHA's proposed arresting forcelimitations. USTAG recommended that body belts be permitted only for workpositioning and climbing protection. Even with such a limitation on use,USTAG recommended that maximum arrest force for body belts not exceed 900pounds. USTAG stated that ``empirical data from impact loading of humansand animals suggests that injury threshold may be in the neighborhood of10 g's or even lower depending on (many variables)'' (EX. 8-33). USTAGcited British standards which restrict the use of body belts to 5 g's fora 180 pound (82 kg) person (the equivalent of 900 pounds (4 kN) of force).Based on the record, OSHA agrees with USTAG that a maximum arresting forceof 1,800 pounds (8 kN) is acceptable when using a body harness but notacceptable when using a body belt. OSHA, therefore, is adopting the USTAGrecommendation of a maximum force of 900 pounds (4 kN) as used in paragraphs(d)(1)(i) and (d)(1)(ii) of the final standard. OSHA notes that USTAG'srecommendation applied to the maximum permitted force for positioning systems,not to fall arrest equipment. OSHA believes, however, that there is noreason to distinguish these applications in terms of the permitted forcelimit. OSHA also proposed to limit body belt use to a six foot (1.8 m) free falldistance, and has retained this provision in paragraph (e)(3) that requiresthe rigging of personal fall arrest systems to limit free falls to sixfeet (1.8 m) or less. OSHA believes that the comments and testimony inthe record have not identified free fall distance alone as a causativeelement in injuries during fall arrest using body belts. Rather, the amountof time an employee is suspended, and the degree of force impacted on afallen employee appear to be the primary critical causative factors. Asstated above, OSHA has addressed both of these critical factors separatelyin the standard. With the general system limitation on free fall distanceset at six feet (1.8 m), an arrest force limitation of 900 pounds (4 kN),and a requirement for prompt rescue, OSHA believes that employees willbe protected from injury from the use of body belts.In addressing the method of expressing arresting force limits, nearly allcomments (EXS. 8-4, 8-27, 8-29, 8-32, 8-33) and hearing testimony (EXS.2/19-259, 2/21-39, 2/21-117, 2/21-118, 2/21-127, 2/21-128) provided theirrecommendations in terms of pounds (kN) arresting force rather than accelerationof gravity. To avoid confusion, OSHA is also expressing the limits of arrestingforce in paragraph (d)(1)(i) in terms of pounds (kN) force. The proposal would have required a personal fall arrest system to bringan employee to a complete stop, with a deceleration distance of 42 inches(1.07 m) or less (proposed (d)(1)(ii)). Comments (EXS. 8-24, 8-14) werereceived on this proposed requirement. One commenter (EX. 8-24) recommendedthat the system, ``bring an employee to a complete stop within 72 inchesplus the length of the lanyard from the original position of the rope gripbefore a fall occurs. This will allow for a shock absorber to open up toa distance of 60 inches, and for a travel of the rope grip of 12 inchesas it closes its grip onto the rope.'' Another commenter stated, ``the42 inch deceleration distance may be applicable to rope grabs and decelerationdevices, but is too restrictive when applied to an entire ``personal fallarrest system.'' This commenter pointed out that stretch of the lifelinealone could exceed 42 inches. OSHA agrees in principle with these commentsand, as previously discussed, has revised the definition of ``decelerationdistance'' so that the 42 inches (1.07 m) of deceleration distance relatesonly to the operation of the deceleration device itself (by excluding thefree fall and lifeline elongation distances). Unobstructed travel of thedevice or rope grab before it activates would be considered free fall distance.In addition, a shock absorber which opens to an overall length of 60 inches(1.52 m) would not be prohibited, provided the distance during deceleration(while the shock absorber stretches, rips, tears, elongates, etc.), doesnot exceed 42 inches (1.07 m). OSHA has retained the proposed requirementand editorially revised it as paragraph (d)(1)(iii) of the final standard.The proposal would have required a personal fall arrest system to containa ``strength factor'' of not less than two to one, based on a design weightof 250 pounds (113 kg) per employee (proposed (d)(1)(iii)). As discussedpreviously under the definition of ``strength factor;'' the term ``strengthfactor'' and its use in the proposed standard are unnecessarily confusing(EXS. 8-27, 8-33) and therefore, OSHA has eliminated this term. The intentof this requirement was to require personal fall arrest systems to havea safety factor of at least two in their design. The proposed requirementhas been replaced by a new requirement, paragraph (d)(1)(iv), in the finalstandard, which requires that personal fall arrest systems have sufficientstrength to withstand twice the potential impact energy of an employeefree falling a distance of six feet (1.8 m), or the free fall distancepermitted by the system. The strength test in section II includes the necessarytest weights and drop distances to assure a strength factor of at leasttwo. Paragraph (d)(2) states that personal fall arrest systems which meet thetests contained in section II of this appendix would be considered as complyingwith the proposed provisions (d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv). Two comments(EXS. 8-14, 8-33) were received on this proposed requirement. One commentersuggested that other tests may be substituted if they provide equal protectionwhen it is not possible (such as physical geometry of the systems) to runthe tests in section II. USTAG recommended that test procedures in voluntaryconsensus standards be utilized, or if not available, testing be performed``in accordance with written test procedures of an accredited testing laboratory.''USTAG also suggested that the test required be correlated to specific requirementsin section I and that the test methods be mandatory (EX. 2/21-38). In addressing the suggestions of USTAG and others, OSHA notes that withthe definitions added, and the test methods revised and clarified in thefinal standard (as discussed below), there is no confusion as to whichtest methods apply to different types of personal fall arrest systems.Also, as discussed earlier, there are presently no applicable finalizedconsensus standards which OSHA could reference for testing. Additionally,no submissions to this record concerning written test procedures developedby U.S. laboratories for the types of equipment covered by the OSHA standardwere made, and OSHA has no independent knowledge of such test procedures.OSHA also agrees with the commenter who stated that the reference to testmethods in section II for the provisions in paragraphs (d)(1)(i) through(d)(1)(iv) of the final standard should not be restrictive. The standarddoes not require that the performance criteria in paragraphs (d)(1) (i)through (iv) be met using the test methods in section II; it merely recognizessystems which meet those tests as being in compliance with those paragraphs.Other test methods may be used provided that they demonstrate compliancewith the standard. OSHA envisions such methods being developed by a widerange of sources, including consensus groups and testing laboratories.The standard would allow the use of appropriate voluntary standards andtest methods for personal fall arrest systems once they are completed.Accordingly, OSHA is retaining paragraph (d)(2) as paragraph (d)(2)(i)in the final standard which states only that personal fall arrest systemswhich meet the tests contained in section II of this appendix shall beconsidered as complying with the provisions of paragraphs (d)(1)(i) through(d)(1)(iv). However, the final rule also states that such compliance isassumed only when the system is used by employees having a combined personand tool weight of less than 310 pounds (140 kg). OSHA has added this maximumweight limitation so that the acceptable limits inherent in the specifiedtest methods for strength and force will not be exceeded. Dr. Nigel Ellis in his comments (EX. 15-20) and testimony (EXS. 2/21-142,143) expressed concern in relating test weights to human weights. OSHAagrees that the limitations of the test procedures should be clearly statedto eliminate any confusion as to their applicability to heavy workers andhas revised the proposal accordingly by limiting the applicability of thetest criteria and protocols to employees having a combined person and toolweight of 310 pounds (140 kg) or less. In addition, OSHA has added paragraph(d)(2)(ii) to the final standard which states that systems used for employeeshaving combined person and tool weights of 310 pounds (140 kg) or greatermay be considered as meeting paragraphs (d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv) providedthat the criteria and protocols are modified appropriately to provide properprotection for these heavier weights. The test methods in section II ofthis appendix can be used for evaluating systems for use with heavier weightsby increasing the test weights, reducing the permitted arresting forcelimits, or other appropriate modifications to account for the heavier workerweights, provided the requirements of paragraphs (d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv)are met. Proposed paragraph (e) contains requirements for the care and use of personalfall arrest systems. One comment (EX. 8-33) was received on proposed paragraphs (e)(1), (e)(2),and (e)(6). However, all of the comments and testimony received (EXS. 8-14,8-21, 8-27, 8-33, 15-10, 15-20, 36, 2/19-253, 259, 2/21-38, 47, 117, 129,142) relative to locking and non-locking snap hooks discussed previouslyis indirectly applicable to these proposed requirements which would prohibitsnap-hooks being connected to loops in webbing lanyards and to each other.USTAG suggested the following substitute provision,<ITAG tagnum="20">snap-hooks of the non-locking type shall not be engaged to webbing,rope or wire rope; to each other; to a dee-ring to which another snap-hookor other connector is attached; to a horizontal lifeline; or to any objectwhich is incompatibly shaped or dimensioned in relation to the snap-hooksuch that unintentional disengagement could occur.</ITAG>OSHA agrees in principle with this suggestion, however, other commentsand testimony expressed the viewpoint that compatibility of the dimensionsof attachments can also be important when locking snap-hooks are used.Therefore, OSHA is revising proposed paragraphs (e)(1), (e)(2) and (e)(6)to become paragraph (e)(1) in the final standard which requires that unlessof a locking-type which would prevent unintentional disengagement, snap-hooksshall not be used for these connections. Several comments (EXS. 8-2, 8-24) were received which suggested that ropegrabs used on horizontal lifelines on scaffolds which might become vertical,be of a type that would lock in either direction on the lifeline. OSHAagrees with this suggestion and has added a provision in paragraph (e)(2)of the final standard which requires that devices used to connect to ahorizontal lifeline which may become a vertical lifeline (such as a horizontallifeline on a scaffold becoming vertical if the scaffold support at oneend fails) be capable of locking in either direction on the lifeline. Two comments (EXS. 8-21, 8-33) were received on proposed paragraph (e)(3).The intent of the requirement is that the personal fall arrest system berigged so that an employee will not experience more than six feet (1.8m) of free fall and be stopped by the system before hitting the groundor other surfaces which may be under the employee. It was suggested thatthe provision prohibit contact with an ``obstruction.'' OSHA believes,however, that since many objects, such as a wall or a scaffold itself,might be considered ``obstructions,'' adding the recommended language maymake use of the personal fall arrest system impracticable because somecontact with these objects may be unavoidable. USTAG suggested that thisproposed requirement be revised to limit free fall distance to two feet(0.61 m) or less if a body belt or chest-waist harness is used. As discussedabove, OSHA does not agree that this further limitation of free fall isnecessary because the record does not show that free fall distance by itselfwill cause injury. Therefore, OSHA is adopting paragraph (e)(3) as proposedin the final standard. USTAG commented (EX. 8-33) on proposed paragraph (e)(4) suggesting thatthe provision be revised to read, ``Body support components in personalfall arrest systems shall be worn with the connecting subsystem attachedto the fall arrest attachment located dorsally, near shoulder level inthe case of harnesses, and in the center of the wearer's back in the caseof body belts.'' OSHA agrees with the intent of this suggestion and hasrevised the provision to require that personal fall arrest systems be wornwith the attachment point of the body belt located in the center of thewearer's back, and the attachment point of the body harness located inthe center of the wearer's back near shoulder level, or above the wearer'shead. This requirement is paragraph (e)(4) of the final standard.USTAG supported (EX. 8-33) proposed paragraphs (e)(5) and (e)(7) as proposed.No other specific suggestions for revision were received. OSHA is adoptingproposed paragraphs (e)(5) and (e)(7), without change because they statefundamental principles of employee safety desired for personal fall arrestsystems. They appear as paragraphs (e)(5) and (e)(6), respectively, inthe final standard.As discussed under proposed paragraph (e)(1), proposed paragraph (e)(6)has been incorporated into paragraph (e)(1) of the final standard.Two comments (EXS. 8-21, 8-33) were received on proposed paragraph (e)(8)relating to ``impact loading.'' One commenter suggested that vertical lifelinessubjected to impact loading of two feet (0.61 m) or less should not berequired to be removed from service and inspected by a competent personbefore reuse. In addition, it was suggested that personal fall arrest systemssubjected to impact loading be returned to the manufacturer for inspection,since the commenter felt that the competent person may not be able to assessthe extent of damage and suitability for reuse. USTAG supported the provisionas proposed, however, and suggested adding an additional sentence to read,``In all cases, the manufacturer's instructions shall not be relaxed.''OSHA disagrees that impact loading of vertical lifelines by impacts causedby free falls of two feet (0.61 m) or less should be exempted since thearresting forces may not be directly related to free fall distance. Dependingon the system, an arrest of a two foot (0.61 m) free fall of an employeecould result in significant impact loading. OSHA also disagrees that systemsneed to be returned to the manufacturer for proper evaluation, since, bydefinition, a competent person is ``capable of identifying hazardous ordangerous conditions in any personal fall arrest system or any componentthereof, as well as in their application and use with related equipment.''OSHA also believes that the USTAG suggestion not to relax manufacturer'sinstructions is part of the competent person's responsibilities. Accordingly,OSHA is adopting proposed paragraph (e)(8), unchanged, as paragraph (e)(7)of the final standard.Several comments (EXS. 8-33, 15-20) and testimony (EXS. 2/21-125, 2/21-42)expressed concern about the need for prompt rescue following fall arrest,especially when body belts are used, since prolonged suspension may beharmful to employees. OSHA agrees with these comments and has added paragraph(e)(8) to the final standard which will require assurance from the employerthat he/she can provide for prompt rescue of employees in the event ofa fall. If an employee is able to self-rescue after a fall, the employerwould meet this requirement. The intent of this provision is that the employerevaluate the potential for fall arrest and that rescue support be providedin a timely manner to avoid long periods of post fall suspension. Whenit is not possible to evaluate self-rescue capability in advance, prudentemployers should assume that employees will need rescue assistance andaccordingly be prepared to offer it.USTAG commented (EX. 8-33) on proposed paragraph (e)(9) of Appendix C supportingthe proposed requirement for employee training and offering suggested clarificationsto the provision. OSHA agrees with these recommendations, however, it hasrevised paragraph (e)(9) of Appendix C of the Final Rule to reference thetraining provisions of paragraph 1910.66(i)(1) and included USTAG's recommendationsin Appendix C of the standard. The final rule requires that before an employeeuses a specific system, that he/she be trained in the use of that system.If a component is changed, he/she must be instructed on the change.Proposed paragraph (f) contains a requirement for the inspection of personalfall arrest systems prior to each use. Comments received (EXS. 8-13, 8-33)were supportive of this provision. USTAG suggested that inspection forfunction, as well as strength, be a criterion for inspections. OSHA agreeswith this recommendation and has revised paragraph (f) of the final standardaccordingly.Section II of Appendix C provides test methods for manufacturer and employeruse in evaluating whether personal fall arrest systems meet the criteriaset out in paragraph (d)(1). Tests have been included for evaluating thestrength, the arrest force, and the proper operation of the systems. Thesetest methods are non-mandatory, and other tests may be used to evaluatethe system.USTAG recommended that the tests included in the proposed standard be mandatory.OSHA does not believe that specific tests need to be mandatory, since OSHAbelieves that as long as the requirements (i.e., for strength, force, maximumfall distance, etc.) in section I of the final standard are properly testedand met, the systems will provide proper protection. The test methods areincluded as one means of determining the system's ability to meet the requirements.In addition, most employers are not equipped to perform these tests orother appropriate tests. In most cases, sample testing will be performedby equipment manufacturers. OSHA anticipates that most employers will relyon manufacturers of their fall protection systems to provide the necessaryinformation to assure compliance with the standard.A number of other comments (EXS. 8-4, 8-24, 8-14, 8-21, 8-33, 15-20, 15-10)and testimony (EXS. 2/19-254, 2/21-38, 44, 118, 130) were received on thissection. One commenter expressed concern that the frequency response ofthe test equipment was not stated in the test procedures and recommendeda frequency response of 1,000 Hz. Another commenter recommended that theaverage forces be used with a frequency response of 1,000 Hz, or alternativelythat the peak force be used with a frequency response of 100 Hz. Mr. H.Crawford of the National Engineering Laboratory, East Kilbridge, Glasgow,in his February 13, 1986, letter, cited difficulties with using a frequencyresponse of 1,000 Hz because of resonant frequencies in the test rig (EX.107). OSHA has reviewed the information on frequency response and has decidedto add a frequency response requirement of 120 Hz for load measuring instrumentationto the test procedures. OSHA believes that this frequency response willeliminate difficulties with the test rig and equipment, as well as insurethat forces of durations which may be harmful to employees are measured.USTAG recommended that testing, ``* * * be in accordance with test proceduresset forth in applicable approved consensus standards written and maintainedin a view of this standard and its amendments.'' As discussed above, atpresent there are no approved consensus standards for personal fall arrestequipment which OSHA could use or adopt. USTAG also commented that theproposed terms ``force factor'' and ``strength factor'' were confusing.As discussed in definitions, above, OSHA has eliminated these terms fromthe final standard. By so doing, these factors have been incorporated intothe test methods of the final standard. In the force test, the force factorof 1.4 has been applied to the test force limits so that the force limitson the human body of 900 pounds (4 Kn) and 1,800 pounds (8 Kn) for bodybelts and body harnesses in the final standard, as recommended by USTAG,become 1,260 pounds (5.6 Kn) and 2,520 pounds (11.2 Kn) respectively, inthe test procedures (which use a rigid test weight). The force factor isessentially a conversion factor which is used to convert the human forcelimits to equivalent force limits when rigid test weights are used. Thisfactor is necessary to properly relate test forces to forces experiencedby humans during fall arrest. In the strength test, a strength factor oftwo, which is common industry practice, has been used to determine thetest weight and free fall distances the test weight is to be dropped toachieve a strength safety factor of at least two for the various personalfall arrest systems.Dr. Ellis, in his testimony, recommended replacing the proposed OSHA strengthand force tests with a single test using a 300 pound (135 kg) test weightdropped 6 feet (1.8 m) for all personal fall arrest systems except retractinglanyard/lifeline systems designed to limit free fall to two feet (.61 m)or less, where the drop distance would be four feet (1.2 m). A test forcelimit of 1,800 pounds (8 Kn) was also recommended for body harnesses (bodybelts were not considered in this suggestion). OSHA explored the possibilityof using this suggestion (or a similar approach) at the hearings duringquestioning of other hearing participants (EXS. 2/21-46, 131, 132, 140-142).Although the goal of a single test was supported, the feasibility and detailsof such a test were not supported. OSHA believes that the suggested testis not sufficient for demonstrating a strength safety factor of at leasttwo and is overly rigorous in assuring acceptable arresting forces. OSHAdoes not believe there is sufficient information and test data to use asingle test in the final standard. However, because the test limits arenow all expressed in pounds force in the final standard (as discussed inparagraph (d) above), use of the 130 pound (59 kg) test weight is not adequatefor lanyard system force testing. OSHA believes that a single test weight(220 pounds (100 Kg)) for force testing of all personal fall arrest systemswill adequately test the system's capability to protect employees frominjury due to fall arrest.Two commenters (EXS. 8-14, 8-21) suggested that the phrase ``worst case''used several places in the test methods be omitted or clarified. The testsare intended to evaluate systems in actual use conditions. Therefore, OSHAhas eliminated this phrase from the final test procedures.In summary, OSHA has been responsive to the comments received on the proposedtest methods for personal fall arrest systems by: (a) Clarifying and simplifyingthe procedures where possible, (b) eliminating the term ``force factor''and ``strength factor'' by including the effects of these factors in thetest procedures, thus clarifying the final standard and test procedures,(c) providing force test past/fail criteria for body belts and body harnesses,(d) reducing the number of test weights required for testing to two (220pounds (100 Kg) and 300 pounds (135 Kg)) and (e) adding a provision toaddress the frequency response time of the load measuring instrumentation(120 Hz) which will further refine the test procedures. OSHA believes thatSection II of Appendix C of the final standard now provides clear and definitivetest procedures which may be used by or for most employers to evaluatewhether personal fall arrest systems comply with the requirements containedin Section I of the final standard.Section III provides non-mandatory guidelines for personal fall arrestsystems which are meant to aid employers in complying with the mandatoryprovisions of Section I of this Appendix.A number of comments (EXS. 8-14, 8-21, 8-27, 8-33) were received on thenon-mandatory guidelines suggesting clarifications and additional information.USTAG recommended an extensive rewrite of the non-mandatory guidelinesto improve their clarity. In addition, USTAG suggested that the discussionof horizontal lifelines be omitted from discussion because the subjectis more properly dealt with, in a formal way, by qualified persons. OSHAagrees with the suggestion that horizontal lifelines should be designedand installed under the supervision of a qualified person and has addedthis to the requirements in Section I, as discussed above in proposed paragraphs(c)(6) and (c)(7). However, OSHA believes that information concerning horizontallifelines is desirable for inclusion in the non-mandatory guidelines sothat employers will realize that there are many factors to consider whena horizontal lifeline is used and that involvement of a qualified personis necessary before one is used. OSHA accepts the comments provided toimprove and clarify the non-mandatory guidelines and has revised SectionIII of the final standard to reflect these comments.Appendix DOSHA is republishing certain paragraphs of the unrevised powered platformsstandard as Appendix D. These paragraphs are (a), (b), (c) and (d) whichaddress, respectively: definitions; general requirements; Type F and TypeT powered platforms; and building and equipment design, construction andinstallation in the unrevised standard (andSection; 1910.66 (1987)).The purpose of Appendix D is to continue to provide coverage of buildingand equipment installations for powered platforms which exist or are completedup to six months (180 days) after these amendments are effective, and whichwere installed after the effective date of the unamended standard (August27, 1971, 36 FR 10466). The new, amended requirements governing how buildingsand equipment are to be designed, constructed and installed for safe poweredplatform operation apply only to installations completed after six months(180 days) of the effective date of this Final Rule, or January 24,1990.To preclude a gap in coverage, Appendix D requires that older installationscontinue to comply with the existing requirements covering this area. OSHAchose the 180 day lag time to give engineers and builders sufficient timeto incorporate the new requirements in their designs. No participant questionedthe adequacy of this period to incorporate these changes in installationsunderway. OSHA further noted that the public has had notice of the substanceof most unchanged provisions since January 1985, when the NPRM was published.If, however, a new powered platform installation is completed before the180 day period ends the designing engineer may choose to use the amendedstandard's requirements for building and equipment safety as his guide.OSHA will allow this option, and will not require the building owner tonotify OSHA in advance if he designs and installs powered platforms conformingto the amended standard after the revised standard is effective, but beforethe grace period has expired.OSHA believes that continuing coverage of existing building and equipmentunder relevant provisions of the unrevised standard, now Appendix D, isnecessary for employee protection and that these requirements provide adequatedesign factors for assuring continued structural integrity. OSHA proposedcontinuing the requirement that existing installations be judged by theunrevised standards, and no objections were received.As noted later, employees on all powered platforms, regardless of wheninstalled, benefit from the new requirements in the amended standard coveringtraining, inspection, maintenance and personal fall protection.OSHA notes that paragraph (a), ``Definitions'' in this Appendix, appliesonly to this Appendix. The definitions in the amended standard likewiseapply to provisions of the amended standard, not to this Appendix. Variancedecisions and field compliance directives relating to provisions of theunamended standard included in Appendix D will remain in effect until theyare withdrawn or superseded by OSHA.The format and regulatory text of Appendix D is virtually identical tothe unamended standard. The appendix also updates certain references andexcludes certain provisions of the unamended standard which are unrelatedto building and equipment requirements.For example, personal fall protection requirements in paragraphs (b)(5)(ii)and (b)(8) in the unamended standard have not been included in AppendixD since these requirements have been superseded by requirements in paragraph(j) and Appendix C of the amended standard. Further, as noted above, allemployers whose employees work on powered platforms must also comply withparagraphs (g), (h), (I), (j), and Appendix C of the amended standard regardlessof the installation date of the powered platforms. These provisions coverinspections and tests, (g); maintenance, (h); operations (training anduse), (i); personal fall protection, (j); and Appendix (c).<ITAG tagnum="85">V. Summary of the Regulatory Impact Analysis and Regulatory FlexibilityAssessment</ITAG>IntroductionIn accordance with Executive Order 12291 (46 FR 13193, February 17, 1981),OSHA assessed the potential impact of this revised standard. Based on theExecutive Order criteria, OSHA has determined that this revised standardwould not be a ``major'' action necessitating further economic impact evaluation.Accordingly, OSHA prepared a Regulatory Impact Assessment (RIA) which isavailable from the OSHA Docket Office.OSHA has determined that the revised standard will have the net effectof reducing the costs of compliance because it will permit the use of alternativemethods of powered platform stabilization. Employers will be allowed tochoose the most cost-effective methods of providing the necessary levelof employee safety.The data for this assessment are based upon a December 15, 1983, studyby Arthur Young and Co., entitled, ``Analysis of Technological and EconomicFactors of Proposed Revisions to OSHA Regulations on Powered Platforms''and upon the public comments submitted: in response to the ANPR; in responseto the NPR; during the public hearings; and during the post-hearing commentperiod.Powered Platform Terminology and TechnologyPowered platforms and suspension scaffolds are the basic types of poweredsuspended work surfaces used to perform such outside building maintenancetasks as window washing, building and window caulking, inspecting buildingexteriors, etc. A powered platform covered under 29 CFR 1910.66 (SubpartF) is a powered suspended work surface that is permanently dedicated toa specific building and is the property of the building owner. A suspensionscaffold covered under 29 CFR 1910.28 (Subpart D) is a powered suspendedwork surface that is brought to the building and is the property of thewindow washer and/or the outside building maintenance contractor. The selectionof either a powered platform or a suspension scaffold for exterior buildingmaintenance is made by the building developer when the building is initiallydesigned. Although there are approximately 10 times more suspension scaffoldsthan powered platforms used for window washing and exterior building maintenance,approximately 90 percent of the new high-rise office buildings (60 storiesor more) utilize powered platforms because it is often technologicallyinfeasible to use suspension scaffolds on very tall buildings. In addition,powered platforms are safer at very high elevations than are suspensionscaffolds because powered platforms are less susceptible to being destabilizedby wind than are suspension scaffolds.OSHA <T3>does not require</T3> that a powered platform be used on any building.OSHA does require, however, that if a powered platform is used, then theSubpart F requirements must be met.The existing Subpart F requires all powered platforms to use a continuoustrack stabilization system that consists of indented mullions or T-railsembedded in the building wall and guide rollers or shoes attached to theplatform that lock the platform to the building by remaining in continuouscontact with the indented mullions or T-rails. The continuous track stabilizationsystem is the least expensive platform stabilization system to installon buildings of straight vertical steel (aluminum) and glass curtain walls.Architectural styles that feature offsets in walls, however, make continuoustrack stabilization systems technically infeasible on many of those buildings.In 1972, the button system stabilization design was developed for poweredplatforms. In this system, a vertical line of buttons are set into a buildingwall and the platform contains two vertical bar guides at each end of theplatform. As the platform transverses the building, the bar guides engagethe buttons and lock the platform to the building.In addition, an intermittent tie-in stabilization system was developedfor powered platforms. In this system, platform stabilization is providedby lanyards that secure the suspension ropes to anchors set into the buildingwall. The building anchors are set at fixed intervals (usually from 30to 50 feet) and the adjustable lanyards are designed to produce enoughtension below the tie-in point to secure the platform against the building.These intermittent tie-in stabilization systems were the subject of severalapplications for variances from Subpart F. The variance procedures includetechnical review and public comment concerning the safety of the particularinstallation requesting the variance. Since the first variance applicationin 1977, OSHA has granted five variances and there were 23 pending varianceapplications when OSHA issued a Compliance Directive (OSHA InstructionSTD 1-3.3) on November 1, 1982, instructing compliance officers to considerall buildings with straight building faces using intermittent tie-in stabilizationsystems to be in compliance with Subpart F.Number of Buildings and Powered Platforms Although the revised standard affects every building that has a poweredplatform, not every such building is affected by every provision. In particular,although all buildings are affected by the provisions governing poweredplatform maintenance, only buildings to be constructed are affected bythe new provisions governing powered platform design and installation.OSHA estimates that there are 6,865 existing buildings with 9,600 poweredplatforms and that 265 new buildings with 370 powered platforms are constructedannually. Of these new buildings, OSHA estimates that under the revisedstandard, 140 will use the continuous track stabilization system, 115 willuse the intermittent tie-in stabilization system, and 10 will use the buttonstabilization system. Population at Risk  The population-at-risk are the employees who use powered platforms to servicehigh-rise office buildings. These employees are employed in the two industrysectors of: (1) Window cleaning contractors (a subset of SIC 7349 ``BuildingCleaning and Maintenance Services, Not Elsewhere Classified''); and (2)caulking building exteriors, sandblasting of building exteriors, and steamcleaning of building exteriors (subsets of SIC 1799, ``Special Trade Contractors,Not Elsewhere Classified'' and of other firms in SIC 7349). OSHA estimates that 8,150 employees of whom 6,900 are window washers and1,250 are exterior building maintenance workers may work on a powered platformand be at risk from the potential hazard of falling from an elevation.Benefits There is no available estimate of the total number of fatalities and injuriesassociated with falls from powered platforms because the employees whouse powered platforms are only a subset of the employees in SIC 7349 andSIC 1799. In addition, the injuries associated with falls from powered suspendedwork platforms also include falls from suspension scaffolds. Using theOSHA inspection data from July 1972 through June 1988, there have been11 reported incidents involving eight fatalities and nine hospitalizedinjuries associated with falls from powered platforms. In 10 of these 11reported incidents (six of the fatalities and all nine of the hospitalizedinjuries), the employee did not wear personal fall protection. Compliancewith the revised Subpart F, which requires both fall protection and trainingin the use of fall protection, would have prevented the six fatalitiesand nine hospitalized injuries associated with these 10 incidents. In addition, the revised standard will make it easier for building developersto install powered platforms on certain types of high-rise office buildingsand these powered platforms would substitute for suspension scaffolds orsingle-man controlled descent devices. As all of the public comment andtestimony reported that powered platforms are safer work surfaces thanare suspension scaffolds or single-man controlled descent devices, anysubstitution of powered platforms for suspension scaffolds or single-mancontrolled descent devices will increase employee safety. Finally, intermittent tie-in and button stabilization systems, if usedcorrectly, are as safe as continuous track stabilization systems. The revisedSubpart F would ensure that those employees working on powered platformswith intermittent tie-ins and button stabilization systems will receivethe same protection as received by those employees working on powered platformswith continuous track stabilization systems.Technological Feasibility The revised standard is technologically feasible because it allows theuse of platform stabilization methods that are already being used on existingbuildings. The new design and installation requirements apply only to newpowered platforms and all of the technical information and equipment necessaryto comply with the revised standard is developed and in use.Cost of Compliance OSHA used the baseline of existing Subpart F requirements to estimate thecost of compliance savings expected to result from the revised design andinstallation provisions for future powered platforms. OSHA, however, usedthe baseline of current industry practices to estimate the cost of compliancewith platform maintenance, employee powered platform training, improvingthe personal fall protection system, and employee training on personalfall protection systems provisions.As seen in Table A, OSHA estimated that, on an annual basis, compliancewith the revised Subpart F will generate net cost savings of $1,670 million.Building owners will incur savings of $2.889 million and window washersand exterior building maintenance contractors will incur additional costsof $1.219 million. Of this $1.219 million additional cost, $462,000 willbe spent to comply with Subpart F requirements and $757,000 will be spentto comply with the personal fall protection system requirements in themandatory Appendix C.Regulatory Flexibility and International Trade  In accordance with the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-353,94 Stat. 1164 (5 U.S.C. 601 et seq.)), the Assistant Secretary assessedthe potential economic impact of the revised standard on small entitiesand concluded that it will have no significant impact on small entities.OSHA similarly concluded that the revised standard will have no impacton international trade.Environmental Impact Assessment The Final Rule and its alternatives have been reviewed in accordance withthe requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969(42 U.S.C. 4321, et seq.), the regulations of the Council on EnvironmentalQuality (CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and the Department of Labor's (DOL's)NEPA Procedures (29 CFR Part 11). As a result of this review, the AssistantSecretary for OSHA has determined that the Final Rule will have no significantenvironmental impact. The procedures and applications of the proposed provisionsdo not impact on air, water or soil quality, plant or animal life, theuse of land, or other aspects of the environment and therefore will haveno significant effect on the environment.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s100,4.4 </C><T4>Table A_Cost of Compliance With the Revised Subpart F by Industry Sectorand Provision </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[In millions of 1987 dollars]  </ITAG><H1>Industry (provision)</H1><H1>Annual cost of compliance</H1> Building Owners <ITAG tagnum="2">Alternative Stabilization Systems <D>(3.111) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Maintenance <D>0.216 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Tags and Labels <D>0.006</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Subtotal Savings </ITAG><D>(2.889)  </D>Contractors Subpart F <ITAG tagnum="2">Platform Safety Training <D>0.422 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Emergency Action Plan <D>0.004 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Anemometer <D>0.036</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Subtotal Subpart F Costs </ITAG><D>0.462 </D>Appendix C <ITAG tagnum="2">New Fall Protection Systems <D>0.013 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Improve Fall Protection Systems <D>0.400 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Fall Protection System Training <D>0.344</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Subtotal Appendix C Costs </ITAG><D>0.757 </D><ITAG tagnum="2">Contractor Subtotal Costs <D>1.219</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Net Savings <D>(1.670)  </D><F>Note: Numbers in parenthesis are cost savings. </F><F>Source: U.S. Department of Labor, OSHA, Office of Regulatory Analysis,1988.</F></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. OMB Approval Under the Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>This section contains a collection of information in paragraphs 1910.66(e)(9),1910.66(f)(5)(i)(C), 1910.66(f)(5)(ii)(N), 1910.66(f)(7)(vi), 1910.66(f)(7)(vii),1910.66(f)(7)(viii) and 1910.66(i)(1)(iv) which pertain to the developmentand implementation of a written emergency action plan, platform load rating,emergency operating device, use, wire rope information and work proceduresfor training. The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) has reviewed thiscollection and approved it through May, 1991. The approval number is 1218-0121.Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 8.73 hours (or minutes) per response, including the time forreviewing instructions, searching existing data sources, gathering andmaintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewing the collectionof information. Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any otheraspect of this collection of information, including suggestions for reducingthis burden, to the Office of Information Management, Department of Labor,Room N1301, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210; and tothe Office of Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project (1218-0121),Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Federalism </ITAG>This standard has been reviewed in accordance with Executive Order 1261252 FR 41685 (October 30, 1987) regarding Federalism. This Order requiresthat agencies, to the extent possible, refrain from limiting State policyoptions, consult with States prior to taking any actions that would restrictState policy options, and take such actions only when there is clear constitutionalauthority and the presence of a problem of national scope. The Order providesfor preemption of State law only if there is a clear Congressional intentfor the Agency to do so. Any such preemption is to be limited to the extentpossible. Section 18 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act), expressesCongress' clear intent to preempt State laws relating to issues with respectto which Federal OSHA has promulgated occupational safety or health standards.Under the OSH Act a State can avoid preemption only if it submits, andobtains Federal approval of, a plan for the development of such standardsand their enforcement. Occupational safety and health standards developedby such Plan-States must, among other things, be at least as effectivein providing safe and healthful employment and places of employment asthe Federal standards.  The Federal standard for powered platforms is drafted so that employeesusing this equipment in every State would be protected by general, performance-orientedstandards. To the extent that there are State or regional peculiaritiescaused by the climate, building codes, employee diversity or other factors,States with occupational safety and health plans approved under Section18 of the OSH Act would be able to develop their own State standards todeal with any special problems. Moreover, the performance nature of thisstandard, of and by itself, allows for flexibility by States and platformoperators to provide as much safety as possible using varying methods consonantwith conditions in each State. In short, there is a clear national problem related to occupational safetyand health in the powered platform industry. While the individual States,if all acted, might be able collectively to deal with the safety problemsinvolved, most have not elected to do so in the seventeen years since theenactment of the OSH Act. Those States which have elected to participateunder Section 18 of the OSH Act would not be preempted by this regulationand would be able to deal with special, local conditions within the frameworkprovided by this performance-oriented standard while ensuring that theirstandards are at least as effective as the Federal standard. <ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. State Plan Applicability </ITAG>The 25 states with their own OSHA-approved occupational safety and healthplans must adopt a comparable standard within six months of this publicationdate. These states are: Alaska, Arizona, California, Connecticut (for stateand local government employees only), Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky,Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota, Nevada, New Mexico, New York (for stateand local government employees only), North Carolina, Oregon, Puerto Rico,South Carolina, Tennesee, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Virgin Islands, Washingtonand Wyoming. Until such time as a state standard is promulgated, FederalOSHA will provide interim enforcement assistance, as appropriate, in thesestates. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1910 </ITAG>Building maintenance; Inspections; Occupational Safety and Health; Personalfall protection systems; Powered platforms; Safety; Stabilization; Suspendedequipment; Training. <ITAG tagnum="84">Authority </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of Alan C. McMillan, ActingAssistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Ave, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4(b), 6(b), 8(c), 8(d) and 8(g) of theOccupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), Secretaryof Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), and 29 CFR Part 1911, 29 CFR Part1910 is amended as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC this 14th day of July 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Alan C. McMillan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG>Part 1910 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1910_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Subpart F continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4, 6, 8, Occupational Safety and Health Act of1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71 (36FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059) or 9-83 (48 FR 35736), as applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sections 1910.66, .67, .68 and .70 also issued under 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. By revising andSection; 1910.66 of 29 CFR Part 1910 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1910.66 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Powered platforms for building maintenance. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope. </T3>This section covers powered platform installations permanentlydedicated to interior or exterior building maintenance of a specific structureor group of structures. This section does not apply to suspended scaffolds(swinging scaffolds) used to service buildings on a temporary basis andcovered under Subpart D of this Part, nor to suspended scaffolds used forconstruction work and covered under Subpart L of 29 CFR Part 1926. Buildingmaintenance includes, but is not limited to, such tasks as window cleaning,caulking, metal polishing and reglazing. (b) <T3>Application_</T3>(1) <T3>New installations</T3>. This section applies to all permanent installationscompleted after July 23, 1990. Major modifications to existing installationscompleted after that date are also considered new installations under thissection. (2) <T3>Existing installations. </T3>(i) Permanent installations in existenceand/or completed before July 23, 1990 shall comply with paragraphs (g),(h), (i), (j) and Appendix C of this section.  (ii) In addition, permanent installations completed after August 27, 1971,and in existence and/or completed before July 23, 1990, shall comply withAppendix D of this section. (c) <T3>Assurance. </T3>(1) Building owners of new installations shall informthe employer before each use in writing that the installation meets therequirements of paragraphs (e)(1) and (f)(1) of this section and the additionaldesign criteria contained in other provisions of paragraphs (e) and (f)of this section relating to: required load sustaining capabilities of platforms,building components, hoisting and supporting equipment; stability factorsfor carriages, platforms and supporting equipment; maximum horizontal forcefor movement of carriages and davits; design of carriages, hoisting machines,wire rope and stabilization systems; and design criteria for electricalwiring and equipment. (2) Building owners shall base the information required in paragraph (c)(1)of this section on the results of a field test of the installation beforebeing placed into service and following any major alteration to an existinginstallation, as required in paragraph (g)(1) of this section. The assuranceshall also be based on all other relevant available information, including,but not limited to, test data, equipment specifications and verificationby a registered professional engineer. (3) Building owners of all installations, new and existing, shall informthe employer in writing that the installation has been inspected, testedand maintained in compliance with the requirements of paragraphs (g) and(h) of this section and that all protection anchorages meet the requirementsof paragraph (I)(c)(10) of Appendix C. (4) The employer shall not permit employees to use the installation priorto receiving assurance from the building owner that the installation meetsthe requirements contained in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(3) of this section.(d) <T3>Definitions. </T3>``Anemometer'' means an instrument for measuring wind velocity. ``Angulated roping'' means a suspension method where the upper point ofsuspension is inboard from the attachments on the suspended unit, thuscausing the suspended unit to bear against the face of the building. ``Building face roller'' means a rotating cylindrical member designed toride on the face of the building wall to prevent the platform from abradingthe face of the building and to assist in stabilizing the platform.``Building maintenance'' means operations such as window cleaning, caulking,metal polishing, reglazing, and general maintenance on building surfaces.``Cable'' means a conductor, or group of conductors, enclosed in a weatherproofsheath, that may be used to supply electrical power and/or control currentfor equipment or to provide voice communication circuits. ``Carriage'' means a wheeled vehicle used for the horizontal movement andsupport of other equipment. ``Certification'' means a written, signed and dated statement confirmingthe performance of a requirement of this section. ``Combination cable'' means a cable having both steel structural memberscapable of supporting the platform, and copper or other electrical conductorsinsulated from each other and the structural members by nonconductive barriers.``Competent person'' means a person who, because of training and experience,is capable of identifying hazardous or dangerous conditions in poweredplatform installations and of training employees to identify such conditions.``Continuous pressure'' means the need for constant manual actuation fora control to function. ``Control'' means a mechanism used to regulate or guide the operation ofthe equipment. ``Davit'' means a device, used singly or in pairs, for suspending a poweredplatform from work, storage and rigging locations on the building beingserviced. Unlike outriggers, a davit reacts its operating load into a singleroof socket or carriage attachment. ``Equivalent'' means alternative designs, materials or methods which theemployer can demonstrate will provide an equal or greater degree of safetyfor employees than the methods, materials or designs specified in the standard.``Ground rigging'' means a method of suspending a working platform startingfrom a safe surface to a point of suspension above the safe surface. ``Ground rigged davit'' means a davit which cannot be used to raise a suspendedworking platform above the building face being serviced. ``Guide button'' means a building face anchor designed to engage a guidetrack mounted on a platform. ``Guide roller'' means a rotating cylindrical member, operating separatelyor as part of a guide assembly, designed to provide continuous engagementbetween the platform and the building guides or guideways. ``Guide shoe'' means a device attached to the platform designed to providea sliding contact between the platform and the building guides. ``Hoisting machine'' means a device intended to raise and lower a suspendedor supported unit. ``Hoist rated load'' means the hoist manufacturer's maximum allowable operatingload. ``Installation'' means all the equipment and all affected parts of a buildingwhich are associated with the performance of building maintenance usingpowered platforms. ``Interlock'' means a device designed to ensure that operations or motionsoccur in proper sequence. ``Intermittent stabilization'' means a method of platform stabilizationin which the angulated suspension wire rope(s) are secured to regularlyspaced building anchors. ``Lanyard'' means a flexible line of rope, wire rope or strap which isused to secure the body belt or body harness to a deceleration device,lifeline or anchorage. ``Lifeline'' means a component consisting of a flexible line for connectionto an anchorage at one end to hang vertically (vertical lifeline), or forconnection to anchorages at both ends to stretch horizontally (horizontallifeline), and which serves as a means for connecting other componentsof a personal fall arrest system to the anchorage. ``Live load'' means the total static weight of workers, tools, parts, andsupplies that the equipment is designed to support. ``Obstruction detector'' means a control that will stop the suspended orsupported unit in the direction of travel if an obstruction is encountered,and will allow the unit to move only in a direction away from the obstruction.``Operating control'' means a mechanism regulating or guiding the operationof equipment that ensures a specific operating mode. ``Operating device'' means a device actuated manually to activate a control.``Outrigger'' means a device, used singly or in pairs, for suspending aworking platform from work, storage, and rigging locations on the buildingbeing serviced. Unlike davits, an outrigger reacts its operating momentload as at least two opposing vertical components acting into two or moredistinct roof points and/or attachments. ``Platform rated load'' means the combined weight of workers, tools, equipmentand other material which is permitted to be carried by the working platformat the installation, as stated on the load rating plate. ``Poured socket'' means the method of providing wire rope terminationsin which the ends of the rope are held in a tapered socket by means ofpoured spelter or resins. ``Primary brake'' means a brake designed to be applied automatically wheneverpower to the prime mover is interrupted or discontinued. ``Prime mover'' means the source of mechanical power for a machine. ``Rated load'' means the manufacturer's recommended maximum load. ``Rated strength'' means the strength of wire rope, as designated by itsmanufacturer or vendor, based on standard testing procedures or acceptableengineering design practices. ``Rated working load'' means the combined static weight of men, materials,and suspended or supported equipment. ``Registered professional engineer'' means a person who has been duly andcurrently registered and licensed by an authority within the United Statesor its territories to practice the profession of engineering. ``Roof powered platform'' means a working platform where the hoist(s) usedto raise or lower the platform is located on the roof. ``Roof rigged davit'' means a davit used to raise the suspended workingplatform above the building face being serviced. This type of davit canalso be used to raise a suspended working platform which has been ground-rigged.``Rope'' means the equipment used to suspend a component of an equipmentinstallation, i.e., wire rope. ``Safe surface'' means a horizontal surface intended to be occupied bypersonnel, which is so protected by a fall protection system that it canbe reasonably assured that said occupants will be protected against falls.``Secondary brake'' means a brake designed to arrest the descent of thesuspended or supported equipment in the event of an overspeed condition.``Self powered platform'' means a working platform where the hoist(s) usedto raise or lower the platform is mounted on the platform. ``Speed reducer'' means a positive type speed reducing machine. ``Stability factor'' means the ratio of the stabilizing moment to the overturningmoment. ``Stabilizer tie'' means a flexible line connecting the building anchorand the suspension wire rope supporting the platform. ``Supported equipment'' means building maintenance equipment that is heldor moved to its working position by means of attachment directly to thebuilding or extensions of the building being maintained. ``Suspended equipment'' means building maintenance equipment that is suspendedand raised or lowered to its working position by means of ropes or combinationcables attached to some anchorage above the equipment. ``Suspended scaffold (swinging scaffold)'' means a scaffold supported onwire or other ropes, used for work on, or for providing access to, verticalsides of structures on a temporary basis. Such scaffold is not designedfor use on a specific structure or group of structures. ``Tail line'' means the nonsupporting end of the wire rope used to suspendthe platform. ``Tie-in guides'' means the portion of a building that provides continuouspositive engagement between the building and a suspended or supported unitduring its vertical travel on the face of the building. ``Traction hoist'' means a type of hoisting machine that does not accumulatethe suspension wire rope on the hoisting drum or sheave, and is designedto raise and lower a suspended load by the application of friction forcesbetween the suspension wire rope and the drum or sheave. ``Transportable outriggers'' means outriggers designed to be moved fromone work location to another. ``Trolley carriage'' means a carriage suspended from an overhead trackstructure. ``Verified'' means accepted by design, evaluation, or inspection by a registeredprofessional engineer. ``Weatherproof'' means so constructed that exposure to adverse weatherconditions will not affect or interfere with the proper use or functionsof the equipment or component. ``Winding drum hoist'' means a type of hoisting machine that accumulatesthe suspension wire rope on the hoisting drum. ``Working platform'' means suspended or supported equipment intended toprovide access to the face of a building and manned by persons engagedin building maintenance. ``Wrap'' means one complete turn of the suspension wire rope around thesurface of a hoist drum. (e) <T3>Powered platform installations_Affected parts of buildings. </T3>(1)<T3>General requirements. </T3>The following requirements apply to affectedparts of buildings which utilize working platforms for building maintenance.(i) Structural supports, tie-downs, tie-in guides, anchoring devices andany affected parts of the building included in the installation shall bedesigned by or under the direction of a registered professional engineerexperienced in such design; (ii) Exterior installations shall be capable of withstanding prevailingclimatic conditions; (iii) The building installation shall provide safe access to, and egressfrom, the equipment and sufficient space to conduct necessary maintenanceof the equipment; (iv) The affected parts of the building shall have the capability of sustainingall the loads imposed by the equipment; and, (v) The affected parts of the building shall be designed so as to allowthe equipment to be used without exposing employees to a hazardous condition.(2) <T3>Tie-in guides. </T3>(i) The exterior of each building shall be providedwith tie-in guides unless the conditions in paragraph (e)(2)(ii) or (e)(2)(iii)of this section are met.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>See Figure 1 in Appendix B of this section for a descriptionof a typical continuous stabilization system utilizing tie-in guides.</ITAG>(ii) If angulated roping is employed, tie-in guides required in paragraph(e)(2)(i) of this section may be eliminated for not more than 75 feet (22.9m) of the uppermost elevation of the building, if infeasible due to exteriorbuilding design, provided an angulation force of at least 10 pounds (44.4n) is maintained under all conditions of loading.(iii) Tie-in guides required in paragraph (e)(2)(i) of this section maybe eliminated if one of the guide systems in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(A),(e)(2)(iii)(B) or (e)(2)(iii)(C) of this section is provided, or an equivalent.(A) Intermittent stabilization system. The system shall keep the equipmentin continuous contact with the building facade, and shall prevent suddenhorizontal movement of the platform. The system may be used together withcontinuous positive building guide systems using tie-in guides on the samebuilding, provided the requirements for each system are met.(<T3>1</T3>) The maximum vertical interval between building anchors shallbe three floors or 50 feet (15.3 m), whichever is less.(<T3>2</T3>) Building anchors shall be located vertically so that attachmentof the stabilizer ties will not cause the platform suspension ropes toangulate the platform horizontally across the face of the building. Theanchors shall be positioned horizontally on the building face so as tobe symmetrical about the platform suspension ropes.(<T3>3</T3>) Building anchors shall be easily visible to employees and shallallow a stabilizer tie attachment for each of the platform suspension ropesat each vertical interval. If more than two suspension ropes are used ona platform, only the two building-side suspension ropes at the platformends shall require a stabilizer attachment.(<T3>4</T3>) Building anchors which extend beyond the face of the buildingshall be free of sharp edges or points. Where cables, suspension wire ropesand lifelines may be in contact with the building face, external buildinganchors shall not interfere with their handling or operation.(<T3>5</T3>) The intermittent stabilization system building anchors andcomponents shall be capable of sustaining without failure at least fourtimes the maximum anticipated load applied or transmitted to the componentsand anchors. The minimum design wind load for each anchor shall be 300(1334 n) pounds, if two anchors share the wind load.(<T3>6</T3>) The building anchors and stabilizer ties shall be capable ofsustaining anticipated horizontal and vertical loads from winds specifiedfor roof storage design which may act on the platform and wire ropes ifthe platform is stranded on a building face. If the building anchors havedifferent spacing than the suspension wire rope or if the building requiresdifferent suspension spacings on one platform, one building anchor andstabilizer tie shall be capable of sustaining the wind loads.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> See Figure 2 in Appendix B of this section for a descriptionof a typical intermittent stabilization system.</ITAG>(B) Button guide stabilization system.(<T3>1</T3>) Guide buttons shall be coordinated with platform mounted equipmentof paragraph (f)(5)(vi) of this section.(<T3>2</T3>) Guide buttons shall be located horizontally on the buildingface so as to allow engagement of each of the guide tracks mounted on theplatform.(<T3>3</T3>) Guide buttons shall be located in vertical rows on the buildingface for proper engagement of the guide tracks mounted on the platform.(<T3>4</T3>) Two guide buttons shall engage each guide track at all timesexcept for the initial engagement.(<T3>5</T3>) Guide buttons which extend beyond the face of the buildingshall be free of sharp edges or points. Where cables, ropes and lifelinesmay be in contact with the building face, guide buttons shall not interferewith their handling or operation.(<T3>6</T3>) Guide buttons, connections and seals shall be capable of sustainingwithout damage at least the weight of the platform, or provision shallbe made in the guide tracks or guide track connectors to prevent the platformand its attachments from transmitting the weight of the platform to theguide buttons, connections and seals. In either case, the minimum designload shall be 300 pounds (1334 n) per building anchor.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> See paragraph (f)(5)(vi) of this section for relevant equipmentprovisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> See Figure 3 in Appendix B of this section for a a descriptionof a typical button guide stabilization system.</ITAG>(C) System utilizing angulated roping and building face rollers. The systemshall keep the equipment in continuous contact with the building facade,and shall prevent sudden horizontal movement of the platform. This systemis acceptable only where the suspended portion of the equipment in usedoes not exceed 130 feet (39.6 m) above a safe surface or ground level,and where the platform maintains no less than 10 pounds (44.4 n) angulationforce on the building facade.(iv) Tie-in guides for building interiors (atriums) may be eliminated whena registered professional engineer determines that an alternative stabilizationsystem, including systems in paragraphs (e)(2)(iii) (A), (B) and (C), ora platform tie-off at each work station will provide equivalent safety.(3)<T3> Roof guarding. </T3>(i) Employees working on roofs while performingbuilding maintenance shall be protected by a perimeter guarding systemwhich meets the requirements of paragraph (c)(1) of andSection; 1910.23 ofthis Part.(ii) The perimeter guard shall not be more than six inches (152 mm) inboardof the inside face of a barrier, i.e. the parapet wall, or roof edge curbof the building being serviced; however, the perimeter guard location shallnot exceed an 18 inch (457 mm) setback from the exterior building face.(4)<T3> Equipment stops.</T3> Operational areas for trackless type equipmentshall be provided with structural stops, such as curbs, to prevent equipmentfrom traveling outside its intended travel areas and to prevent a crushingor shearing hazard.(5)<T3> Maintenance access.</T3> Means shall be provided to traverse all carriagesand their suspended equipment to a safe area for maintenance and storage.(6)<T3> Elevated track.</T3> (i) An elevated track system which is locatedfour feet (1.2 m) or more above a safe surface, and traversed by carriagesupported equipment, shall be provided with a walkway and guardrail system;or(ii) The working platform shall be capable of being lowered, as part ofits normal operation, to the lower safe surface for access and egress ofthe personnel and shall be provided with a safe means of access and egressto the lower safe surface.(7)<T3> Tie-down anchors.</T3> Imbedded tie-down anchors, fasteners, and affectedstructures shall be resistant to corrosion.(8) <T3>Cable stabilization.</T3> (i) Hanging lifelines and all cables notin tension shall be stabilized at each 200 foot (61 m) interval of verticaltravel of the working platform beyond an initial 200 foot (61 m) distance.(ii) Hanging cables, other than suspended wire ropes, which are in constanttension shall be stabilized when the vertical travel exceeds an initial600 foot (183 m) distance, and at further intervals of 600 feet (183 m)or less. (9) <T3>Emergency planning.</T3> A written emergency action plan shall be developedand implemented for each kind of working platform operation. This planshall explain the emergency procedures which are to be followed in theevent of a power failure, equipment failure or other emergencies whichmay be encountered. The plan shall also explain that employees inform themselvesabout the building emergency escape routes, procedures and alarm systemsbefore operating a platform. Upon initial assignment and whenever the planis changed the employer shall review with each employee those parts ofthe plan which the employee must know to protect himself or herself inthe event of an emergency. (10) <T3>Building maintenance.</T3> Repairs or major maintenance of those buildingportions that provide primary support for the suspended equipment shallnot affect the capability of the building to meet the requirements of thisstandard. (11) <T3>Electrical requirements.</T3> The following electrical requirementsapply to buildings which utilize working platforms for building maintenance.(i) General building electrical installations shall comply with andSection;andSection;1910.302 through 1910.308 of this Part, unless otherwise specified in thissection; (ii) Building electrical wiring shall be of such capacity that when fullload is applied to the equipment power circuit not more than a five percentdrop from building service-vault voltage shall occur at any power circuitoutlet used by equipment regulated by this section; (iii) The equipment power circuit shall be an independent electrical circuitthat shall remain separate from all other equipment within or on the building,other than power circuits used for hand tools that will be used in conjunctionwith the equipment. If the building is provided with an emergency powersystem, the equipment power circuit may also be connected to this system;(iv) The power circuit shall be provided with a disconnect switch thatcan be locked in the ``OFF'' and ``ON'' positions. The switch shall beconveniently located with respect to the primary operating area of theequipment to allow the operators of the equipment access to the switch;(v) The disconnect switch for the power circuit shall be locked in the``ON'' position when the equipment is in use; and (vi) An effective two-way voice communication system shall be providedbetween the equipment operators and persons stationed within the buildingbeing serviced. The communications facility shall be operable and shallbe manned at all times by persons stationed within the building wheneverthe platform is being used. (f) <T3>Powered platform installations_Equipment</T3>_(1) <T3>General requirements.</T3> The following requirements apply to equipmentwhich are part of a powered platform installation, such as platforms, stabilizingcomponents, carriages, outriggers, davits, hoisting machines, wire ropesand electrical components. (i) Equipment installations shall be designed by or under the directionof a registered professional engineer experienced in such design; (ii) The design shall provide for a minimum live load of 250 pounds (113.6kg) for each occupant of a suspended or supported platform; (iii) Equipment that is exposed to wind when not in service shall be designedto withstand forces generated by winds of at least 100 miles per hour (44.7m/s) at 30 feet (9.2 m) above grade; and (iv) Equipment that is exposed to wind when in service shall be designedto withstand forces generated by winds of at least 50 miles per hour (22.4m/s) for all elevations. (2) <T3>Construction requirements.</T3> Bolted connections shall be self-lockingor shall otherwise be secured to prevent loss of the connections by vibration.(3) <T3>Suspension methods.</T3> Elevated building maintenance equipment shallbe suspended by a carriage, outriggers, davits or an equivalent method.(i) <T3>Carriages.</T3> Carriages used for suspension of elevated buildingmaintenance equipment shall comply with the following: (A) The horizontal movement of a carriage shall be controlled so as toensure its safe movement and allow accurate positioning of the platformfor vertical travel or storage; (B) Powered carriages shall not exceed a traversing speed of 50 feet perminute (0.3 m/s); (C) The initiation of a traversing movement for a manually propelled carriageon a smooth level surface shall not require a person to exert a horizontalforce greater than 40 pounds (444.8 n); (D) Structural stops and curbs shall be provided to prevent the traversingof the carriage beyond its designed limits of travel; (E) Traversing controls for a powered carriage shall be of a continuouspressure weatherproof type. Multiple controls when provided shall be arrangedto permit operation from only one control station at a time. An emergencystop device shall be provided on each end of a powered carriage for interruptingpower to the carriage drive motors; (F) The operating controls(s) shall be so connected that in the case ofsuspended equipment, traversing of a carriage is not possible until thesuspended portion of the equipment is located at its uppermost designedposition for traversing; and is free of contact with the face of the buildingor building guides. In addition, all protective devices and interlocksare to be in the proper position to allow traversing of the carriage; (G) Stability for underfoot supported carriages shall be obtained by gravity,by an attachment to a structural support, or by a combination of gravityand a structural support. The use of flowing counterweights to achievestability is prohibited. (<T3>1</T3>) The stability factor against overturning shall not be lessthan two for horizontal traversing of the carriage, including the effectsof impact and wind. (<T3>2</T3>) The carriages and their anchorages shall be capable of resistingaccidental over-tensioning of the wire ropes suspending the working platform,and this calculated value shall include the effect of one and one-halftimes the stall capacity of the hoist motor. All parts of the installationshall be capable of withstanding without damage to any part of the installationthe forces resulting from the stall load of the hoist and one half thewind load. (<T3>3</T3>) Roof carriages which rely on having tie-down devices securedto the building to develop the required stability against overturning shallbe provided with an interlock which will prevent vertical platform movementunless the tie-down is engaged; (H) An automatically applied braking or locking system, or equivalent,shall be provided that will prevent unintentional traversing of power traversedor power assisted carriages; (I) A manual or automatic braking or locking system or equivalent, shallbe provided that will prevent unintentional traversing of manually propelledcarriages; (J) A means to lock out the power supply for the carriage shall be provided;(K) Safe access to and egress from the carriage shall be provided froma safe surface. If the carriage traverses an elevated area, any operatingarea on the carriage shall be protected by a guardrail system in compliancewith the provisions of paragraph (f)(5)(i)(F) of this section. Any accessgate shall be self-closing and self-latching, or provided with an interlock;(L) Each carriage work station position shall be identified by locationmarkings and/or position indicators; and(M) The motors shall stall if the load on the hoist motors is at any timein excess of three times that necessary for lifting the working platformwith its rated load.(ii)<T3> Transportable outriggers.</T3> (A) Transportable outriggers may beused as a method of suspension for ground rigged working platforms wherethe point of suspension does not exceed 300 feet (91.5 m) above a safesurface. Tie-in guide system(s) shall be provided which meet the requirementsof paragraph (e)(2) of this section.(B) Transportable outriggers shall be used only with self-powered, groundrigged working platforms.(C) Each transportable outrigger shall be secured with a tie-down to averified anchorage on the building during the entire period of its use.The anchorage shall be designed to have a stability factor of not lessthan four against overturning or upsetting of the outrigger.(D) Access to and egress from the working platform shall be from and toa safe surface below the point of suspension.(E) Each transportable outrigger shall be designed for lateral stabilityto prevent roll-over in the event an accidental lateral load is appliedto the outrigger. The accidental lateral load to be considered in thisdesign shall be not less than 70 percent of the rated load of the hoist.(F) Each transportable outrigger shall be designed to support an ultimateload of not less than four times the rated load of the hoist.(G) Each transportable outrigger shall be so located that the suspensionwire ropes for two point suspended working platforms are hung parallel.(H) A transportable outrigger shall be tied-back to a verified anchorageon the building with a rope equivalent in strength to the suspension rope.(I) The tie-back rope shall be installed parallel to the centerline ofthe outrigger.(iii) Davits. (A) Every davit installation, fixed or transportable, rotatableor non-rotatable shall be designed and installed to insure that it hasa stability factor against overturning of not less than four.(B) The following requirements apply to roof rigged davit systems:(<T3>1</T3>) Access to and egress from the working platform shall be froma safe surface. Access or egress shall not require persons to climb overa building's parapet or guard railing; and(<T3>2</T3>) The working platform shall be provided with wheels, castersor a carriage for traversing horizontally.(C) The following requirements apply to ground rigged davit systems:(<T3>1</T3>) The point of suspension shall not exceed 300 feet (91.5 m)above a safe surface. Guide system(s) shall be provided which meet therequirements of paragraph (e)(2) of this section;(<T3>2</T3>) Access and egress to and from the working platform shall onlybe from a safe surface below the point of suspension.(D) A rotating davit shall not require a horizontal force in excess of40 pounds (177.9 n) per person to initiate a rotating movement.(E) The following requirements shall apply to transportable davits:(<T3>1</T3>) A davit or part of a davit weighing more than 80 pounds (36kg) shall be provided with a means for its transport, which shall keepthe center of gravity of the davit at or below 36 inches (914 mm) abovethe safe surface during transport;(<T3>2</T3>) A davit shall be provided with a pivoting socket or with abase that will allow the insertion or removal of a davit at a positionof not more than 35 degrees above the horizontal, with the complete davitinboard of the building face being serviced; and(<T3>3</T3>) Means shall be provided to lock the davit to its socket orbase before it is used to suspend the platform.(4) <T3>Hoisting machines.</T3> (i) Raising and lowering of suspended or supportedequipment shall be performed only by a hoisting machine.(ii) Each hoisting machine shall be capable of arresting any overspeeddescent of the load.(iii) Each hoisting machine shall be powered only by air, electric or hydraulicsources.(iv) Flammable liquids shall not be carried on the working platform.(v) Each hoisting machine shall be capable of raising or lowering 125 percentof the rated load of the hoist.(vi) Moving parts of a hoisting machine shall be enclosed or guarded incompliance with paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) of andSection; 1910.212 of thispart.(vii) Winding drums, traction drums and sheaves and directional sheavesused in conjunction with hoisting machines shall be compatible with, andsized for, the wire rope used.(viii) Each winding drum shall be provided with a positive means of attachingthe wire rope to the drum. The attachment shall be capable of developingat least four times the rated load of the hoist.(ix) Each hoisting machine shall be provided with a primary brake and atleast one independent secondary brake, each capable of stopping and holdingnot less than 125 percent of the lifting capacity of the hoist.(A) The primary brake shall be directly connected to the drive train ofthe hoisting machine, and shall not be connected through belts, chains,clutches, or set screw type devices. The brake shall automatically setwhen power to the prime mover is interrupted.(B)(<T3>1</T3>) The secondary brake shall be an automatic emergency type ofbrake that, if actuated during each stopping cycle, shall not engage beforethe hoist is stopped by the primary brake.(<T3>2</T3>) When a secondary brake is actuated, it shall stop and holdthe platform within a vertical distance of 24 inches (609.6 mm).(x) Any component of a hoisting machine which requires lubrication forits protection and proper functioning shall be provided with a means forthat lubrication to be applied.(5) <T3>Suspended equipment_</T3>(i)<T3> General requirements.</T3> (A) Each suspended unit component, exceptsuspension ropes and guardrail systems, shall be capable of supporting,without failure, at least four times the maximum intended live load appliedor transmitted to that component.(B) Each suspended unit component shall be constructed of materials thatwill withstand anticipated weather conditions.(C) Each suspended unit shall be provided with a load rating plate, conspicuouslylocated, stating the unit weight and rated load of the suspended unit.(D) When the suspension points on a suspended unit are not at the unitends, the unit shall be capable of remaining continuously stable underall conditions of use and position of the live load, and shall maintainat least a 1.5 to 1 stability factor against unit upset. (E) Guide rollers, guide shoes or building face rollers shall be provided,and shall compensate for variations in building dimensions and for minorhorizontal out-of-level variations of each suspended unit. (F) Each working platform of a suspended unit shall be secured to the buildingfacade by one or more of the following methods, or by an equivalent method:(<T3>1</T3>) Continuous engagement to building anchors as provided in paragraph(e)(2)(i) of this section; (<T3>2</T3>) Intermittent engagement to building anchors as provided inparagraph (e)(2)(iii)(A) of this section; (<T3>3</T3>) Button guide engagement as provided in paragraph (e)(2)(iii)(B)of this section; or (<T3>4</T3>) Angulated roping and building face rollers as provided in paragraph(e)(2)(iii)(C) of this section. (G) Each working platform of a suspended unit shall be provided with aguardrail system on all sides which shall meet the following requirements:(<T3>1</T3>) The system shall consist of a top guardrail, midrail, and atoeboard; (<T3>2</T3>) The top guardrail shall not be less than 36 inches (914 mm)high and shall be able to withstand at least a 100-pound (444 n) forcein any downward or outward direction; (<T3>3</T3>) The midrail shall be able to withstand at least a 75-pound(333 n) force in any downward or outward direction; and (<T3>4</T3>) The areas between the guardrail and toeboard on the ends andoutboard side, and the area between the midrail and toeboard on the inboardside, shall be closed with a material that is capable of withstanding aload of 100 pounds (45.4 KG.) applied horizontally over any area of onesquare foot (.09 m\2\). The material shall have all openings small enoughto reject passage of life lines and potential falling objects which maybe hazardous to persons below. (<T3>5</T3>) Toeboards shall be capable of withstanding, without failure,a force of at least 50 pounds (222 n) applied in any downward or horizontaldirection at any point along the toeboard. (<T3>6</T3>) Toeboards shall be three and one-half inches (9 cm) minimumin length from their top edge to the level of the platform floor. (<T3>7</T3>) Toeboards shall be securely fastened in place at the outermostedge of the platform and have no more than one-half inch (1.3 cm) clearanceabove the platform floor. (<T3>8</T3>) Toeboards shall be solid or with an opening not over one inch(2.5 cm) in the greatest dimension. (ii) <T3>Two and four-point suspended working platforms.</T3> (A) The workingplatform shall be not less than 24 inches (610 mm) wide and shall be providedwith a minimum of a 12 inch (305 mm) wide passage at or past any obstructionon the platform. (B) The flooring shall be of a slip-resistant type and shall contain noopening that would allow the passage of life lines, cables and other potentialfalling objects. If a larger opening is provided, it shall be protectedby placing a material under the opening which shall prevent the passageof life lines, cables and potential falling objects. (C) The working platfrom shall be provided with a means of suspension thatwill restrict the platform's inboard to outboard roll about its longitudinalaxis to a maximum of 15 degrees from a horizontal plane when moving thelive load from the inboard to the outboard side of the platform. (D) Any cable suspended from above the platform shall be provided witha means for storage to prevent accumulation of the cable on the floor ofthe platform. (E) All operating controls for the vertical travel of the platform shallbe of the continuous-pressure type, and shall be located on the platform.(F) Each operating station of every working platform shall be providedwith a means of interrupting the power supply to all hoist motors to stopany further powered ascent or descent of the platform. (G) The maximum rated speed of the platform shall not exceed 50 feet perminute (0.3 ms) with single speed hoists, nor 75 feet per minute (0.4 ms)with multi-speed hoists. (H) Provisions shall be made for securing all tools, water tanks, and otheraccessories to prevent their movement or accumulation on the floor of theplatform. (I) Portable fire extinguishers conforming to the provisions of andSection;1910.155 and andSection; 1910.157 of this part shall be provided and securelyattached on all working platforms. (J) Access to and egress from a working platfrom, except for those thatland directly on a safe surface, shall be provided by stairs, ladders,platforms and runways conforming to the provisions of Subpart D of thispart. Access gates shall be self-closing and self-latching. (K) Means of access to or egress from a working platform which is 48 inches(1.2 m) or more above a safe surface shall be provided with a guardrailsystem or ladder handrails that conform to the provisions of Subpart Dof this part.(L) The platform shall be provided with a secondary wire rope suspensionsystem if the platform contains overhead structures which restrict theemergency egress of employees. A horizontal lifeline or a direct connectionanchorage shall be provided, as part of a fall arrest system which meetsthe requirements of Appendix C, for each employee on such a platform.(M) A vertical lifeline shall be provided as part of a fall arrest systemwhich meets the requirements of Appendix C, for each employee on a workingplatform suspended by two or more wire ropes, if the failure of one wirerope or suspension attachment will cause the platform to upset. If a secondarywire rope suspension is used, vertical lifelines are not required for thefall arrest system, provided that each employee is attached to a horizontallifeline anchored to the platform.(N) An emergency electric operating device shall be provided on roof poweredplatforms near the hoisting machine for use in the event of failure ofthe normal operating device located on the working platform, or failureof the cable connected to the platform. The emergency electric operatingdevice shall be mounted in a secured compartment, and the compartment shallbe labeled with instructions for use. A means for opening the compartmentshall be mounted in a break-glass receptable located near the emergencyelectric operating device or in an equivalent secure and accessible location.(iii) <T3>Single point suspended working platforms.</T3> (A) The requirementsof paragraphs (f)(5)(ii)(A) through (K) of this section shall also applyto a single point working platform.(B) Each single point suspended working platform shall be provided witha secondary wire rope suspension system, which will prevent the workingplatform from falling should there be a failure of the primary means ofsupport, or if the platform contains overhead structures which restrictthe egress of the employees. A horizontal life line or a direct connectionanchorage shall be provided, as part of a fall arrest system which meetsthe requirements of Appendix C, for each employee on the platform.(iv) <T3>Ground-rigged working platforms.</T3> (A) Groundrigged working platformsshall comply with all the requirements of paragraphs (f)(5)(ii) (A) through(M) of this section.(B) After each day's use, the power supply within the building shall bedisconnected from a ground-rigged working platform, and the platform shallbe either disengaged from its suspension points or secured and stored atgrade.(v)<T3> Intermittently stabilized platforms.</T3> (A) The platform shall complywith paragraphs (F)(5)(ii)(A) through (M) of this section.(B) Each stabilizer tie shall be equipped with a ``quick connect-quickdisconnect'' device which cannot be accidently disengaged, for attachmentto the building anchor, and shall be resistant to adverse environmentalconditions.(C) The platform shall be provided with a stopping device that will interruptthe hoist power supply in the event the platform contacts a stabilizertie during its ascent.(D) Building face rollers shall not be placed at the anchor setting ifexterior anchors are used on the building face.(E) Stabilizer ties used on intermittently stabilized platforms shall allowfor the specific attachment length needed to effect the predetermined angulationof the suspended wire rope. The specific attachment length shall be maintainedat all building anchor locations.(F) The platform shall be in continuous contact with the face of the buildingduring ascent and descent.(G) The attachment and removal of stabilizer ties shall not require thehorizontal movement of the platform.(H) The platform-mounted equipment and its suspension wire ropes shallnot be physically damaged by the loads from the stabilizer tie or its buildinganchor. The platform, platform mounted equipment and wire ropes shall beable to withstand a load that is at least twice the ultimate strength ofthe stabilizer tie.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> See Figure II in Appendix B of this section for a descriptionof a typical intermittent stabilization system.</ITAG>(vi)<T3> Button-guide stabilized platforms. </T3>(A) The platform shall complywith paragraphs (f)(5)(ii)(A) through (M) of this section.(B) Each guide track on the platform shall engage a minimum of two guidebuttons during any vertical travel of the platform following the initialbutton engagement.(C) Each guide track on a platform that is part of a roof rigged systemshall be provided with a storage position on the platform.(D) Each guide track on the platform shall be sufficiently maneuverableby platform occupants to permit easy engagement of the guide buttons, andeasy movement into and out of its storage position on the platform.(E) Two guide tracks shall be mounted on the platform and shall providecontinuous contact with the building face.(F) The load carrying components of the button guide stabilization systemwhich transmit the load into the platform shall be capable of supportingthe weight of the platform, or provision shall be made in the guide trackconnectors or platform attachments to prevent the weight of the platformfrom being transmitted to the platform attachments.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> See Figure III in Appendix B of this section for a descriptionof a typical button guide stabilization system.</ITAG>(6) <T3>Supported equipment.</T3> (i) Supported equipment shall maintain avertical position in respect to the face of the building by means otherthan friction.(ii) Cog wheels or equivalent means shall be incorporated to provide climbingtraction between the supported equipment and the building guides. Additionalguide wheels or shoes shall be incorporated as may be necessary to ensurethat the drive wheels are continuously held in positive engagement withthe building guides.(iii) Launch guide mullions indexed to the building guides and retainedin alignment with the building guides shall be used to align drive wheelsentering the building guides.(iv) Manned platforms used on supported equipment shall comply with therequirements of paragraphs (f)(5)(ii)(A), (f)(5)(ii)(B), and (f)(5)(ii)(D)through (K) of this section covering suspended equipment.(7)<T3> Suspension wire ropes and rope connections.</T3> (i) Each specificinstallation shall use suspension wire ropes or combination cable and connectionsmeeting the specification recommended by the manufacturer of the hoistingmachine used. Connections shall be capable of developing at least 80 percentof the rated breaking strength of the wire rope.(ii) Each suspension rope shall have a ``Design Factor'' of at least 10.The ``Design Factor'' is the ratio of the rated strength of the suspensionwire rope to the rated working load, and shall be calculated using thefollowing formula:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>F</H1><H1>=</H1><H1>S(N)</H1><H2>W</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Where:<ITAG tagnum="15">F=Design factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">S=Manufacturer's rated strength of one suspension rope</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">N=Number of suspension ropes under load</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">W=Rated working load on all ropes at any point of travel</ITAG>(iii) Suspension wire rope grade shall be at least improved plow steelor equivalent.(iv) Suspension wire ropes shall be sized to conform with the requireddesign factor, but shall not be less than 5/16 inch (7.94 mm) in diameter.(v) No more than one reverse bend in six wire rope lays shall be permitted.(vi) A corrosion-resistant tag shall be securely attached to one of thewire rope fastenings when a suspension wire rope is to be used at a specificlocation and will remain in that location. This tag shall bear the followingwire rope data:(A) The diameter (inches and/or mm); (B) Construction classification; (C) Whether non-preformed or preformed; (D) The grade of material; (E) The manufacturer's rated strength; (F) The manufacturer's name; (G) The month and year the ropes were installed; and (H) The name of the person or company which installed the ropes. (vii) A new tag shall be installed at each rope renewal. (viii) The original tag shall be stamped with the date of the resocketing,or the original tag shall be retained and a supplemental tag shall be providedwhen ropes are resocketed. The supplemental tag shall show the date ofresocketing and the name of the person or company that resocketed the rope.(ix) Winding drum type hoists shall contain at least three wraps of thesuspension wire rope on the drum when the suspended unit has reached thelowest possible point of its vertical travel. (x) Traction drum and sheave type hoists shall be provided with a wirerope of sufficient length to reach the lowest possible point of verticaltravel of the suspended unit, and an additional length of the wire ropeof at least four feet (1.2 m). (xi) The lengthening or repairing of suspension wire ropes is prohibited.(xii) Babbitted fastenings for suspension wire rope are prohibited. (8) <T3>Control circuits, power circuits and their components. </T3>(i) Electricalwiring and equipment shall comply with Subpart S of this Part, except asotherwise required by this section. (ii) Electrical runway conductor systems shall be of a type designed foruse in exterior locations, and shall be located so that they do not comeinto contact with accumulated snow or water. (iii) Cables shall be protected against damage resulting from overtensioningor from other causes. (iv) Devices shall be included in the control system for the equipmentwhich will provide protection against electrical overloads, three phasereversal and phase failure. The control system shall have a separate method,independent of the direction control circuit, for breaking the power circuitin case of an emergency or malfunction. (v) Suspended or supported equipment shall have a control system whichwill require the operator of the equipment to follow predetermined procedures.(vi) The following requirements shall apply to electrical protection devices:(A) On installations where the carriage does not have a stability factorof at least four against overturning, electrical contact(s) shall be providedand so connected that the operating devices for the suspended or supportedequipment shall be operative only when the carriage is located and mechanicallyretained at an established operating point. (B) Overload protection shall be provided in the hoisting or suspensionsystem to protect against the equipment operating in the ``up'' directionwith a load in excess of 125 percent of the rated load of the platform;and (C) An automatic detector shall be provided for each suspension point thatwill interrupt power to all hoisting motors for travel in the ``down''direction, and apply the primary brakes if any suspension wire rope becomesslack. A continuous-pressure rigging-bypass switch designed for use duringrigging is permitted. This switch shall only be used during rigging. (vii) Upper and lower directional switches designed to prevent the travelof suspended units beyond safe upward and downward levels shall be provided.(viii) Emergency stop switches shall be provided on remote controlled,roof-powered manned platforms adjacent to each control station on the platform.(ix) Cables which are in constant tension shall have overload devices whichwill prevent the tension in the cable from interfering with the load limitingdevice required in paragraph (f)(8)(vi)(B) of this section, or with theplatform roll limiting device required in paragraph (f)(5)(ii)(C) of thissection. The setting of these devices shall be coordinated with other overloadsettings at the time of design of the system, and shall be clearly indicatedon or near the device. The device shall interrupt the equipment travelin the ``down'' direction. (g) <T3>Inspection and tests</T3>_(1) <T3>Installations and alterations. </T3>All completed building maintenanceequipment installations shall be inspected and tested in the field beforebeing placed in initial service to determine that all parts of the installationconform to applicable requirements of this standard, and that all safetyand operating equipment is functioning as required. A similar inspectionand test shall be made following any major alteration to an existing installation.No hoist in an installation shall be subjected to a load in excess of 125percent of its rated load. (2) <T3>Periodic inspections and tests. </T3>(i) Related building supportingstructures shall undergo periodic inspection by a competent person at intervalsnot exceeding 12 months. (ii) All parts of the equipment including control systems shall be inspected,and, where necessary, tested by a competent person at intervals specifiedby the manufacturer/supplier, but not to exceed 12 months, to determinethat they are in safe operating condition. Parts subject to wear, suchas wire ropes, bearings, gears, and governors shall be inspected and/ortested to determine that they have not worn to such an extent as to affectthe safe operation of the installation. (iii) The building owner shall keep a certification record of each inspectionand test required under paragraphs (g)(2)(i) and (ii) of this section.The certification record shall include the date of the inspection, thesignature of the person who performed the inspection, and the number, orother identifier, of the building support structure and equipment whichwas inspected. This certification record shall be kept readily availablefor review by the Assistant Secretary of Labor or the Assistant Secretary'srepresentative and by the employer. (iv) Working platforms and their components shall be inspected by the employerfor visible defects before every use and after each occurrence which couldaffect the platform's structural integrity. (3) <T3>Maintenance inspections and tests. </T3>(i) A maintenance inspectionand, where necessary, a test shall be made of each platform installationevery 30 days, or where the work cycle is less than 30 days such inspectionand/or test shall be made prior to each work cycle. This inspection andtest shall follow procedures recommended by the manufacturer, and shallbe made by a competent person. (ii) The building owner shall keep a certification record of each inspectionand test performed under paragraph (g)(3)(i) of this section. The certificationrecord shall include the date of the inspection and test, the signatureof the person who performed the inspection and/or test, and an identifierfor the platform installation which was inspected. The certification recordshall be kept readily available for review by the Assistant Secretary ofLabor or the Assistant Secretary's representative and by the employer.(4)<T3> Special inspection of governors and secondary brakes.</T3> (i) Governorsand secondary brakes shall be inspected and tested at intervals specifiedby the manufacturer/supplier but not to exceed every 12 months. (ii) The results of the inspection and test shall confirm that the initiatingdevice for the secondary braking system operates at the proper overspeed.(iii) The results of the inspection and test shall confirm that the secondarybrake is functioning properly. (iv) If any hoisting machine or initiating device for the secondary brakesystem is removed from the equipment for testing, all reinstalled and directlyrelated components shall be reinspected prior to returning the equipmentinstallation to service. (v) Inspection of governors and secondary brakes shall be performed bya competent person. (vi) The secondary brake governor and actuation device shall be testedbefore each day's use. Where testing is not feasible, a visual inspectionof the brake shall be made instead to ensure that it is free to operate.(5) <T3>Suspension wire rope maintenance, inspection and replacement. </T3>(i)Suspension wire rope shall be maintained and used in accordance with proceduresrecommended by the wire rope manufacturer. (ii) Suspension wire rope shall be inspected by a competent person forvisible defects and gross damage to the rope before every use and aftereach occurrence which might affect the wire rope's integrity. (iii) A thorough inspection of suspension wire ropes in service shall bemade once a month. Suspension wire ropes that have been inactive for 30days or longer shall have a thorough inspection before they are placedinto service. These thorough inspections of suspension wire ropes shallbe performed by a competent person. (iv) The need for replacement of a suspension wire rope shall be determinedby inspection and shall be based on the condition of the wire rope. Anyof the following conditions or combination of conditions will be causefor removal of the wire rope: (A) Broken wires exceeding three wires in one strand or six wires in onerope lay; (B) Distortion of rope structure such as would result from crushing orkinking; (C) Evidence of heat damage; (D) Evidence of rope deterioration from corrosion; (E) A broken wire within 18 inches (460.8 mm) of the end attachments; (F) Noticeable rusting and pitting; (G) Evidence of core failure (a lengthening of rope lay, protrusion ofthe rope core and a reduction in rope diameter suggests core failure);or (H) More than one valley break (broken wire). (I) Outer wire wear exceeds one-third of the original outer wire diameter.(J) Any other condition which the competent person determines has significantlyaffected the integrity of the rope. (v) The building owner shall keep a certification record of each monthlyinspection of a suspension wire rope as required in paragraph (g)(5)(iii)of this section. The record shall include the date of the inspection, thesignature of the person who performed the inspection, and a number, orother identifier, of the wire rope which was inspected. This record ofinspection shall be made available for review by the Assistant Secretaryof Labor or the Assistant Secretary's representative and by the employer.(6) <T3>Hoist inspection. </T3>Before lowering personnel below the top elevationof the building, the hoist shall be tested each day in the lifting directionwith the intended load to make certain it has sufficient capacity to raisethe personnel back to the boarding level. (h) <T3>Maintenance</T3>_(1) <T3>General maintenance. </T3>All parts of the equipment affecting safeoperation shall be maintained in proper working order so that they mayperform the functions for which they were intended. The equipment shallbe taken out of service when it is not in proper working order. (2) <T3>Cleaning. </T3>(i) Control or power contactors and relays shall bekept clean. (ii) All other parts shall be kept clean if their proper functioning wouldbe affected by the presence of dirt or other contaminants. (3) <T3>Periodic resocketing of wire rope fastenings. </T3>(i) Hoisting ropesutilizing poured socket fastenings shall be resocketed at the non-drumends at intervals not exceeding 24 months. In resocketing the ropes, asufficient length shall be cut from the end of the rope to remove damagedor fatigued portions. (ii) Resocketed ropes shall conform to the requirements of paragraph (f)(7)of this section. (iii) Limit switches affected by the resocketed ropes shall be reset, ifnecessary. (4) <T3>Periodic reshackling of suspension wire ropes. </T3>The hoisting ropesshall be reshackled at the nondrum ends at intervals not exceeding 24 months.When reshackling the ropes, a sufficient length shall be cut from the endof the rope to remove damaged or fatigued portions. (5) <T3>Roof systems. </T3>Roof track systems, tie-downs, or similar equipmentshall be maintained in proper working order so that they perform the functionfor which they were intended. (6) <T3>Building face guiding members. </T3>T-rails, indented mullions, orequivalent guides located in the face of a building shall be maintainedin proper working order so that they perform the functions for which theywere intended. Brackets for cable stabilizers shall similarly be maintainedin proper working order. (7) <T3>Inoperative safety devices. </T3>No person shall render a requiredsafety device or electrical protective device inoperative, except as necessaryfor tests, inspections, and maintenance. Immediately upon completion ofsuch tests, inspections and maintenance, the device shall be restored toits normal operating condition. (i) <T3>Operations</T3>_(1) <T3>Training. </T3>(i) Working platforms shall be operated only by personswho are proficient in the operation, safe use and inspection of the particularworking platform to be operated. (ii) All employees who operate working platforms shall be trained in thefollowing: (A) Recognition of, and preventive measures for, the safety hazards associatedwith their individual work tasks. (B) General recognition and prevention of safety hazards associated withthe use of working platforms, including the provisions in the section relatingto the particular working platform to be operated. (C) Emergency action plan procedures required in paragraph (e)(9) of thissection.(D) Work procedures required in paragraph (i)(1)(iv) of this section. (E) Personal fall arrest system inspection, care, use and system performance.(iii) Training of employees in the operation and inspection of workingplatforms shall be done by a competent person. (iv) Written work procedures for the operation, safe use and inspectionof working platforms shall be provided for employee training. Pictorialmethods of instruction, may be used, in lieu of written work procedures,if employee communication is improved using this method. The operatingmanuals supplied by manufacturers for platform system components can serveas the basis for these procedures. (v) The employer shall certify that employees have been trained in operatingand inspecting a working platform by preparing a certification record whichincludes the identity of the person trained, the signature of the employeror the person who conducted the training and the date that training wascompleted. The certification record shall be prepared at the completionof the training required in paragraph (i)(1)(ii) of this section, and shallbe maintained in a file for the duration of the employee's employment.The certification record shall be kept readily available for review bythe Assistant Secretary of Labor or the Assistant Secretary's representative.(2) <T3>Use. </T3>(i) Working platforms shall not be loaded in excess of therated load, as stated on the platform load rating plate. (ii) Employees shall be prohibited from working on snow, ice, or otherslippery material covering platforms, except for the removal of such materials.(iii) Adequate precautions shall be taken to protect the platform, wireropes and life lines from damage due to acids or other corrosive substances,in accordance with the recommendations of the corrosive substance producer,supplier, platform manufacturer or other equivalent information sources.Platform members which have been exposed to acids or other corrosive substancesshall be washed down with a neutralizing solution, at a frequency recommendedby the corrosive substance producer or supplier. (iv) Platform members, wire ropes and life lines shall be protected whenusing a heat producing process. Wire ropes and life lines which have beencontacted by the heat producing process shall be considered to be permanentlydamaged and shall not be used. (v) The platform shall not be operated in winds in excess of 25 miles perhour (40.2 km/hr) except to move it from an operating to a storage position.Wind speed shall be determined based on the best available information,which includes on-site anemometer readings and local weather forecastswhich predict wind velocities for the area. (vi) On exterior installations, an anemometer shall be mounted on the platformto provide information of on-site wind velocities prior to and during theuse of the platform. The anemometer may be a portable (hand held) unitwhich is temporarily mounted during platform use. (vii) Tools, materials and debris not related to the work in progress shallnot be allowed to accumulate on platforms. Stabilizer ties shall be locatedso as to allow unencumbered passage along the full length of the platformand shall be of such length so as not to become entangled in rollers, hoistsor other machinery. (j) <T3>Personal fall protection. </T3>Employees on working platforms shallbe protected by a personal fall arrest system meeting the requirementsof Appendix C, Section I, of this standard, and as otherwise provided bythis standard. (k) <T3>Effective date. </T3>This section is effective January 24, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="20">(The information collection requirements contained in this sectionare approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) and listed underOMB control number 1218-0121.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix A to Section 1910.66, Guidelines (Advisory) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Use of the Appendix. </T3>Appendix A provides examples of equipmentand methods to assist the employer in meeting the requirements of the indicatedprovision of the standard. Employers may use other equipment or procedureswhich conform to the requirements of the standard. This appendix neitheradds to nor detracts from the mandatory requirements set forth in andSection;1910.66. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Assurance. </T3>Paragraph (c) of the standard requires the buildingowner to inform the employer in writing that the powered platform installationcomplies with certain requirements of the standard, since the employermay not have the necessary information to make these determinations. Theemployer, however, remains responsible for meeting these requirements whichhave not been set off in paragraph (c)(1). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Design Requirements. </T3>The design requirements for each installationshould be based on the limitations (stresses, deflections, etc.), establishedby nationally recognized standards as promulgated by the following organizations,or to equivalent standards:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">AA_The Aluminum Association, 818 Connecticut Avenue, NW., Washington,DC, 20006 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Aluminum Construction Manual </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Specifications For Aluminum Structures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Aluminum Standards and Data</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">AGMA_American Gear Manufacturers Association, 101 North Fort MeyerDr., Suite 1000, Arlington, VA 22209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">AISC_American Institute of Steel Construction, 400 North MichiganAvenue, Chicago, IL 60611 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">ANSI_American National Standards Institute, Inc., 1430 Broadway, NewYork, NY 10018 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">ASCE_American Society of Civil Engineers, 345 East 47th Street, NewYork, NY 10017 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">ASME_American Society of Mechanical Engineers, 345 East 47th Street,New York, NY 10017 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">ASTM_American Society for Testing and Materials, 1916 Race Street,Philadelphia, PA 19103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">AWS_American Welding Society, Inc., Box 351040, 550 NW. LeJeunne Road,Miami, FL 33126 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">JIC_Joint Industrial Council, 2139 Wisconsin Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20007 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">NEMA_National Electric Manufacturers Association, 2101 L Street, NW.,Washington, DC 20037</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Tie-in-guides. </T3>Indented mullions, T-rails or other equivalentguides are acceptable as tie-in guides in a building face for a continuousstabilization system. Internal guides are embedded in other building memberswith only the opening exposed (see Figure 1 of Appendix B). External guides,however, are installed external to the other building members and so arefully exposed. The minimum opening for tie-in guides is three-quartersof an inch (19 mm), and the minimum inside dimensions are one-inch (25mm) deep and two inches (50 mm) wide. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Employers should be aware of the hazards associated with tie-in guidesin a continuous stabilization system which was not designed properly. Forexample, joints in these track systems may become extended or discontinuousdue to installation or building settlement. If this alignment problem isnot corrected, the system could jam when a guide roller or guide shoe strikesa joint and this would cause a hazardous situation for employees. In anotherinstance, faulty design will result in guide rollers being mounted in aline so they will jam in the track at the slightest misalignment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Building anchors (intermittent stabilization system). </T3>In the selectionof the vertical distance between building anchors, certain factors shouldbe given consideration. These factors include building height and architecturaldesign, platform length and weight, wire rope angulation, and the windvelocities in the building area. Another factor to consider is the materialof the building face, since this material may be adversely affected bythe building rollers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">External or indented type building anchors are acceptable. Receptaclesin the building facade used for the indented type should be kept clearof extraneous materials which will hinder their use. During the inspectionof the platform installation, evidence of a failure or abuse of the anchorsshould be brought to the attention of the employer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Stabilizer tie length. </T3>A stabilizer tie should be long enoughto provide for the planned angulation of the suspension cables. However,the length of the tie should not be excessive and become a problem by possiblybecoming entangled in the building face rollers or parts of the platformmachinery. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The attachment length may vary due to material elongation and thisshould be considered when selecting the material to be used. Considerationshould also be given to the use of ties which are easily installed by employees,since this will encourage their use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. <T3>Intermittent stabilization system. </T3>Intermittent stabilizationsystems may use different equipment, tie-in devices and methods to restrictthe horizontal movement of a powered platform with respect to the faceof the building. One acceptable method employs corrosion-resistant buildinganchors secured in the face of the building in vertical rows every thirdfloor or 50 feet (15.3 m), whichever is less. The anchors are spaced horizontallyto allow a stabilization attachment (stabilizer tie) for each of the twoplatform suspension wire ropes. The stabilizer tie consists of two parts.One part is a quick connect-quick disconnect device which utilizes a corrosion-resistantyoke and retainer spring that is designed to fit over the building anchors.The second part of the stabilizer tie is a lanyard which is used to maintaina fixed distance between the suspension wire rope and the face of the building.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In this method, as the suspended powered platform descends past theelevation of each anchor, the descent is halted and each of the platformoccupants secures a stabilizer tie between a suspension wire rope and abuilding anchor. The procedure is repeated as each elevation of a buildinganchor is reached during the descent of the powered platform. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As the platform ascends, the procedure is reversed; that is, the stabilizerties are removed as each elevation of a building anchor is reached. Theremoval of each stabilizer tie is assured since the platform is providedwith stopping devices which will interrupt power to its hoist(s) in theevent either stopping device contacts a stabilizer during the ascent ofthe platform. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Figure 2 of Appendix B illustrates another type of acceptable intermittentstabilization system which utilizes retaining pins as the quick connect-quickdisconnect device in the stabilizer tie.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. <T3>Wire Rope Inspection. </T3>The inspection of the suspension wire ropeis important since the rope gradually loses strength during its usefullife. The purpose of the inspection is to determine whether the wire ropehas sufficient integrity to support a platform with the required designfactor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If there is any doubt concerning the condition of a wire rope or itsability to perform the required work, the rope should be replaced. Thecost of wire rope replacement is quite small if compared to the cost interms of human injuries, equipment down time and replacement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No listing of critical inspection factors, which serve as a basisfor wire rope replacement in the standard, can be a substitute for an experiencedinspector of wire rope. The listing serves as a user's guide to the acceptedstandards by which ropes must be judged. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Rope life can be prolonged if preventive maintenance is performedregularly. Cutting off an appropriate length of rope at the end terminationbefore the core degrades and valley breaks appear minimizes degradationat these sections. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. <T3>General Maintenance. </T3>In meeting the general maintenance requirementin paragraph (h)(1) of the standard, the employer should undertake theprompt replacement of broken, worn and damaged parts, switch contacts,brushes, and short flexible conductors of electrical devices. The componentsof the electrical service system and traveling cables should be replacedwhen damaged or significantly abraded. In addition, gears, shafts, bearings,brakes and hoisting drums should be kept in proper alignment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. <T3>Training. </T3>In meeting the training requirement of paragraph (i)(1)of the standard, employers should use both on the job training and formalclassroom training. The written work procedures used for this trainingshould be obtained from the manufacturer, if possible, or prepared as necessaryfor the employee's information and use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Employees who will operate powered platforms with intermittent stabilizationsystems should receive instruction in the specific ascent and descent proceduresinvolving the assembly and disassembly of the stabilizer ties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An acceptable training program should also include employee instructionin basic inspection procedures for the purpose of determining the needfor repair and replacement of platform equipment. In addition, the programshould cover the inspection, care and use of the personal fall protectionequipment required in paragraph (j)(1) of the standard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition, the training program should also include emergency actionplan elements. OSHA brochure andplusmin;3088 (Rev.) 1985, ``How to Preparefor Workplace Emergencies,'' details the basic steps needed to prepareto handle emergencies in the workplace. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Following the completion of a training program, the employee shouldbe required to demonstrate competency in operating the equipment safely.Supplemental training of the employee should be provided by the employer,as necessary, if the equipment used or other working conditions shouldchange. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An employee who is required to work with chemical products on a platformshould receive training in proper cleaning procedures, and in the hazards,care and handling of these products. In addition, the employee should besupplied with the appropriate personal protective equipment, such as glovesand eye and face protection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. <T3>Suspension and Securing of Powered Platforms (Equivalency). </T3>Oneacceptable method of demonstrating the equivalency of a method of suspendingor securing a powered platform, as required in paragraphs (e)(2)(iii),(f)(3) and (f)(5)(i)(F), is to provide an engineering analysis by a registeredprofessional engineer. The analysis should demonstrate that the proposedmethod will provide an equal or greater degree of safety for employeesthan any one of the methods specified in the standard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix B to Section 1910.66, Exhibits (Advisory) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The three drawings in Appendix B illustrate typical platform stabilizationsystems which are addressed in the standard. The drawings are to be usedfor reference purposes only, and do not illustrate all the mandatory requirementsfor each system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 003</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 0 363-365</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-C </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">Appendix C to Section 1910.66, Personal Fall Arrest System (SectionI_Mandatory; Sections II and III_Non-Mandatory)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Use of the Appendix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section I of Appendix C sets out the mandatory criteria for personalfall arrest systems used by all employees using powered platforms, as requiredby paragraph (j)(1) of this standard. Section II sets out nonmandatorytest procedures which may be used to determine compliance with applicablerequirements contained in section I of this Appendix. Section III providesnonmandatory guidelines which are intended to assist employers in complyingwith these provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>Personal fall arrest systems_</T3>(a)<T3> Scope and application.</T3> This section establishes the applicationof and performance criteria for personal fall arrest systems which arerequired for use by all employees using powered platforms under paragraph1910.66(j).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b)<T3> Definitions.</T3> ``Anchorage'' means a secure point of attachmentfor lifelines, lanyards or deceleration devices, and which is independentof the means of supporting or suspending the employee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Body belt'' means a strap with means both for securing it aboutthe waist and for attaching it to a lanyard, lifeline, or decelerationdevice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Body harness'' means a design of straps which may be secured aboutthe employee in a manner to distribute the fall arrest forces over at leastthe thighs, pelvis, waist, chest and shoulders with means for attachingit to other components of a personal fall arrest system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Buckle'' means any device for holding the body belt or body harnessclosed around the employee's body.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Competent person'' means a person who is capable of identifyinghazardous or dangerous conditions in the personal fall arrest system orany component thereof, as well as in their application and use with relatedequipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Connector'' means a device which is used to couple (connect) partsof the system together. It may be an independent component of the system(such as a carabiner), or an integral component of part of the system (suchas a buckle or dee-ring sewn into a body belt or body harness, or a snap-hookspliced or sewn to a lanyard or self-retracting lanyard).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Deceleration device'' means any mechanism, such as a rope grab,ripstitch lanyard, specially woven lanyard, tearing or deforming lanyard,or automatic self retracting-lifeline/lanyard, which serves to dissipatea substantial amount of energy during a fall arrest, or otherwise limitsthe energy imposed on an employee during fall arrest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Deceleration distance'' means the additional vertical distance afalling employee travels, excluding lifeline elongation and free fall distance,before stopping, from the point at which the deceleration device beginsto operate. It is measured as the distance between the location of an employee'sbody belt or body harness attachment point at the moment of activation(at the onset of fall arrest forces) of the deceleration device duringa fall, and the location of that attachment point after the employee comesto a full stop.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Equivalent'' means alternative designs, materials or methods whichthe employer can demonstrate will provide an equal or greater degree ofsafety for employees than the methods, materials or designs specified inthe standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Free fall'' means the act of falling before the personal fall arrestsystem begins to apply force to arrest the fall.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Free fall distance'' means the vertical displacement of the fallarrest attachment point on the employee's body belt or body harness betweenonset of the fall and just before the system begins to apply force to arrestthe fall. This distance excludes deceleration distance, lifeline and lanyardelongation but includes any deceleration device slide distance or self-retractinglifeline/lanyard extension before they operate and fall arrest forces occur.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Lanyard'' means a flexible line of rope, wire rope, or strap whichis used to secure the body belt or body harness to a deceleration device,lifeline, or anchorage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Lifeline'' means a component consisting of a flexible line for connectionto an anchorage at one end to hang vertically (vertical lifeline), or forconnection to anchorages at both ends to stretch horizontally (horizontallifeline), and which serves as a means for connecting other componentsof a personal fall arrest system to the anchorage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Personal fall arrest system'' means a system used to arrest an employeein a fall from a working level. It consists of an anchorage, connectors,a body belt or body harness and may include a lanyard, deceleration device,lifeline, or suitable combinations of these. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Qualified person'' means one with a recognized degree or professionalcertificate and extensive knowledge and experience in the subject fieldwho is capable of design, analysis, evaluation and specifications in thesubject work, project, or product. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Rope grab'' means a deceleration device which travels on a lifelineand automatically frictionally engages the lifeline and locks so as toarrest the fall of an employee. A rope grab usually employs the principleof inertial locking, cam/lever locking, or both. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Self-retracting lifeline/lanyard'' means a deceleration device whichcontains a drum-wound line which may be slowly extracted from, or retractedonto, the drum under slight tension during normal employee movement, andwhich, after onset of a fall, automatically locks the drum and arreststhe fall. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Snap-hook'' means a connector comprised of a hookshaped member witha normally closed keeper, or similar arrangement, which may be opened topermit the hook to receive an object and, when released, automaticallycloses to retain the object. Snap-hooks are generally one of two types:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The locking type with a self-closing, self-locking keeper whichremains closed and locked until unlocked and pressed open for connectionor disconnection, or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The non-locking type with a self-closing keeper which remains closeduntil pressed open for connection or disconnection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``Tie-off'' means the act of an employee, wearing personal fall protectionequipment, connecting directly or indirectly to an anchorage. It also meansthe condition of an employee being connected to an anchorage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Design for system components.</T3> (1) Connectors shall be drop forged,pressed or formed steel, or made of equivalent materials. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Connectors shall have a corrosion-resistant finish, and all surfacesand edges shall be smooth to prevent damage to interfacing parts of thesystem. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Lanyards and vertical lifelines which tie-off one employee shallhave a minimum breaking strength of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Self-retracting lifelines and lanyards which automatically limitfree fall distance to two feet (0.61 m) or less shall have components capableof sustaining a minimum static tensile load of 3,000 pounds (13.3 kN) appliedto the device with the lifeline or lanyard in the fully extended position.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Self-retracting lifelines and lanyards which do not limit freefall distance to two feet (0.61 m) or less, ripstitch lanyards, and tearingand deforming lanyards shall be capable of sustaining a minimum tensileload of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) applied to the device with the lifelineor lanyard in the fully extended position. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Dee-rings and snap-hooks shall be capable of sustaining a minimumtensile load of 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Dee-rings and snap-hooks shall be 100 percent proof-tested toa minimum tensile load of 3,600 pounds (16 kN) without cracking, breaking,or taking permanent deformation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Snap-hooks shall be sized to be compatible with the member towhich they are connected so as to prevent unintentional disengagement ofthe snap-hook by depression of the snap-hook keeper by the connected member,or shall be a locking type snap-hook designed and used to prevent disengagementof the snap-hook by the contact of the snaphook keeper by the connectedmember. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Horizontal lifelines, where used, shall be designed, and installedas part of a complete personal fall arrest system, which maintains a safetyfactor of at least two, under the supervision of a qualified person. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Anchorages to which personal fall arrest equipment is attachedshall be capable of supporting at least 5,000 pounds (22.2 kN) per employeeattached, or shall be designed, installed, and used as part of a completepersonal fall arrest system which maintains a safety factor of at leasttwo, under the supervision of a qualified person. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Ropes and straps (webbing) used in lanyards, lifelines, and strengthcomponents of body belts and body harnesses, shall be made from syntheticfibers or wire rope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>System performance criteria.</T3> (1) Personal fall arrest systemsshall, when stopping a fall:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Limit maximum arresting force on an employee to 900 pounds (4kN) when used with a body belt; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Limit maximum arresting force on an employee to 1,800 pounds(8 kN) when used with a body harness; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Bring an employee to a complete stop and limit maximum decelerationdistance an employee travels to 3.5 feet (1.07 m); and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Shall have sufficient strength to withstand twice the potentialimpact energy of an employee free falling a distance of six feet (1.8 m),or the free fall distance permitted by the system, whichever is less. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2)(i) When used by employees having a combined person and tool weightof less than 310 pounds (140 kg), personal fall arrest systems which meetthe criteria and protocols contained in paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) inSection II of this Appendix shall be considered as complying with the provisionsof paragraphs (d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv) above. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) When used by employees having a combined tool and body weightof 310 pounds (140 kg) or more, personal fall arrest systems which meetthe criteria and protocols contained in paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) inSection II may be considered as complying with the provisions of paragraphs(d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv) provided that the criteria and protocols aremodified appropriately to provide proper protection for such heavier weights.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) <T3>Care and use.</T3> (1) Snap-hooks, unless of a locking type designedand used to prevent disengagement from the following connections, shallnot be engaged: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Directly to webbing, rope or wire rope; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) To each other; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) To a dee-ring to which another snap-hook or other connectoris attached;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) To a horizontal lifeline; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) To any object which is incompatibly shaped or dimensioned in relationto the snap-hook such that the connected object could depress the snap-hookkeeper a sufficient amount to release itself.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Devices used to connect to a horizontal lifeline which may becomea vertical lifeline shall be capable of locking in either direction onthe lifeline.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Personal fall arrest systems shall be rigged such that an employeecan neither free fall more than six feet (1.8 m), nor contact any lowerlevel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The attachment point of the body belt shall be located in thecenter of the wearer's back. The attachment point of the body harness shallbe located in the center of the wearer's back near shoulder level, or abovethe wearer's head.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) When vertical lifelines are used, each employee shall be providedwith a separate lifeline.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Personal fall arrest systems or components shall be used onlyfor employee fall protection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Personal fall arrest systems or components subjected to impactloading shall be immediately removed from service and shall not be usedagain for employee protection unless inspected and determined by a competentperson to be undamaged and suitable for reuse.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) The employer shall provide for prompt rescue of employees in theevent of a fall or shall assure the self-rescue capability of employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Before using a personal fall arrest system, and after any componentor system is changed, employees shall be trained in accordance with therequirements of paragraph 1910.66(i)(1), in the safe use of the system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) <T3>Inspections.</T3> Personal fall arrest systems shall be inspected priorto each use for mildew, wear, damage and other deterioration, and defectivecomponents shall be removed from service if their strength or functionmay be adversely affected.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Test methods for personal fall arrest systems (non-mandatory)_</T3>(a)<T3> General.</T3> Paragraphs (b), (c), (d) and (e), of this Section IIset forth test procedures which may be used to determine compliance withthe requirements in paragraph (d)(1)(i) through (d)(1)(iv) of Section Iof this Appendix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b)<T3> General conditions for all tests in Section II.</T3> (1) Lifelines,lanyards and deceleration devices should be attached to an anchorage andconnected to the body-belt or body harness in the same manner as they wouldbe when used to protect employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The anchorage should be rigid, and should not have a deflectiongreater than .04 inches (1 mm) when a force of 2,250 pounds (10 kN) isapplied.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The frequency response of the load measuring instrumentation shouldbe 120 Hz.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The test weight used in the strength and force tests should bea rigid, metal, cylindrical or torso-shaped object with a girth of 38 inchesplus or minus four inches (96 cm plus or minus 10 cm).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The lanyard or lifeline used to create the free fall distanceshould be supplied with the system, or in its absence, the least elasticlanyard or lifeline available to be used with the system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) The test weight for each test should be hoisted to the requiredlevel and should be quickly released without having any appreciable motionimparted to it.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) The system's performance should be evaluated taking into accountthe range of environmental conditions for which it is designed to be used.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Following the test, the system need not be capable of furtheroperation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Strength test.</T3> (1) During the testing of all systems, a test weightof 300 pounds plus or minus five pounds (135 kg plus or minus 2.5 kg) shouldbe used. (See paragraph (b)(4), above.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The test consists of dropping the test weight once. A new unusedsystem should be used for each test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) For lanyard systems, the lanyard length should be six feet plusor minus two inches (1.83 m plus or minus 5 cm) as measured from the fixedanchorage to the attachment on the body belt or body harness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) For rope-grab-type deceleration systems, the length of the lifelineabove the centerline of the grabbing mechanism to the lifeline's anchoragepoint should not exceed two feet (0.61 m).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) For lanyard systems, for systems with deceleration devices whichdo not automatically limit free fall distance to two feet (0.61 m) or less,and for systems with deceleration devices which have a connection distancein excess of one foot (0.3 m) (measured between the centerline of the lifelineand the attachment point to the body belt or harness), the test weightshould be rigged to free fall a distance of 7.5 feet (2.3 m) from a pointthat is 1.5 feet (46 cm) above the anchorage point, to its hanging location(six feet below the anchorage). The test weight should fall without interference,obstruction, or hitting the floor or ground during the test. In some casesa non-elastic wire lanyard of sufficient length may need to be added tothe system (for test purposes) to create the necessary free fall distance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) For deceleration device systems with integral lifelines or lanyardswhich automatically limit free fall distance to two feet (0.61 m) or less,the test weight should be rigged to free fall a distance of four feet (1.22m).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Any weight which detaches from the belt or harness should constitutefailure for the strength test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Force test_</T3>(1)<T3> General.</T3> The test consists of dropping the respective test weightspecified in (d)(2)(i) or (d)(3)(i) once. A new, unused system should beused for each test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2)<T3> For lanyard systems.</T3> (i) A test weight of 220 pounds plus orminus three pounds (100 kg plus or minus 1.6 kg) should be used. (See paragraph(b)(4), above.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Lanyard length should be six feet plus or minus two inches (1.83m plus or minus 5 cm) as measured from the fixed anchorage to the attachmenton the body belt or body harness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The test weight should fall free from the anchorage level toits hanging location (a total of six feet (1.83 m) free fall distance)without interference, obstruction, or hitting the floor or ground duringthe test.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3)<T3> For all other systems.</T3> (i) A test weight of 220 pounds plus orminus three pounds (100 kg plus or minus 1.6 kg) should be used. (See paragraph(b)(4), above.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The free fall distance to be used in the test should be the maximumfall distance physically permitted by the system during normal use conditions,up to a maximum free fall distance for the test weight of six feet (1.83m), except as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) For deceleration systems which have a connection link or lanyard,the test weight should free fall a distance equal to the connection distance(measured between the centerline of the lifeline and the attachment pointto the body belt or harness). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) For deceleration device systems with integral lifelines or lanyardswhich automatically limit free fall distance to two feet (0.61 m) or less,the test weight should free fall a distance equal to that permitted bythe system in normal use. (For example, to test a system with a self-retractinglifeline or lanyard, the test weight should be supported and the systemallowed to retract the lifeline or lanyard as it would in normal use. Thetest weight would then be released and the force and deceleration distancemeasured). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) A system fails the force test if the recorded maximum arrestingforce exceeds 1,260 pounds (15.6 kN) when using a body belt, and/or exceeds2,520 pounds (11.2 kN) when using a body harness. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The maximum elongation and deceleration distance should be recordedduring the force test. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) <T3>Deceleration device tests_</T3>(1) <T3>General. </T3>The device should be evaluated or tested under the environmentalconditions, (such as rain, ice, grease, dirt, type of lifeline, etc.),for which the device is designed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Rope-grab-type deceleration devices. </T3>(i) Devices should be movedon a lifeline 1,000 times over the same length of line a distance of notless than one foot (30.5 cm), and the mechanism should lock each time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Unless the device is permanently marked to indicate the type(s)of lifeline which must be used, several types (different diameters anddifferent materials), of lifelines should be used to test the device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Other self-activatinq-type deceleration devices. </T3>The locking mechanismsof other self-activating-type deceleration devices designed for more thanone arrest should lock each of 1,000 times as they would in normal service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. <T3>Additional non-mandatory guidelines for personal fall arrest systems.</T3>The following information constitutes additional guidelines for usein complying with requirements for a personal fall arrest system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Selection and use considerations. </T3>The kind of personal fall arrestsystem selected should match the particular work situation, and any possiblefree fall distance should be kept to a minimum. Consideration should begiven to the particular work environment. For example, the presence ofacids, dirt, moisture, oil, grease, etc., and their effect on the system,should be evaluated. Hot or cold environments may also have an adverseaffect on the system. Wire rope should not be used where an electricalhazard is anticipated. As required by the standard, the employer must planto have means available to promptly rescue an employee should a fall occur,since the suspended employee may not be able to reach a work level independently.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Where lanyards, connectors, and lifelines are subject to damage bywork operations such as welding, chemical cleaning, and sandblasting, thecomponent should be protected, or other securing systems should be used.The employer should fully evaluate the work conditions and environment(including seasonal weather changes) before selecting the appropriate personalfall protection system. Once in use, the system's effectiveness shouldbe monitored. In some cases, a program for cleaning and maintenance ofthe system may be necessary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>Testing considerations. </T3>Before purchasing or putting into usea personal fall arrest system, an employer should obtain from the supplierinformation about the system based on its performance during testing sothat the employer can know if the system meets this standard. Testing shouldbe done using recognized test methods. Section II of this Appendix C containstest methods recognized for evaluating the performance of fall arrest systems.Not all systems may need to be individually tested; the performance ofsome systems may be based on data and calculations derived from testingof similar systems, provided that enough information is available to demonstratesimilarity of function and design. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Component compatibility considerations. </T3>Ideally, a personal fallarrest system is designed, tested, and supplied as a complete system. However,it is common practice for lanyards, connectors, lifelines, decelerationdevices, body belts and body harnesses to be interchanged since some componentswear out before others. The employer and employee should realize that notall components are interchangeable. For instance, a lanyard should notbe connected between a body belt (or harness) and a deceleration deviceof the self-retracting type since this can result in additional free fallfor which the system was not designed. Any substitution or change to apersonal fall arrest system should be fully evaluated or tested by a competentperson to determine that it meets the standard, before the modified systemis put in use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Employee training considerations. </T3>Thorough employee training inthe selection and use of personal fall arrest systems is imperative. Asstated in the standard, before the equipment is used, employees must betrained in the safe use of the system. This should include the following:Application limits; proper anchoring and tie-off techniques; estimationof free fall distance, including determination of deceleration distance,and total fall distance to prevent striking a lower level; methods of use;and inspection and storage of the system. Careless or improper use of theequipment can result in serious injury or death. Employers and employeesshould become familiar with the material in this Appendix, as well as manufacturer'srecommendations, before a system is used. Of uppermost importance is thereduction in strength caused by certain tie-offs (such as using knots,tying around sharp edges, etc.) and maximum permitted free fall distance.Also, to be stressed are the importance of inspections prior to use, thelimitations of the equipment, and unique conditions at the worksite whichmay be important in determining the type of system to use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) <T3>Instruction considerations. </T3>Employers should obtain comprehensiveinstructions from the supplier as to the system's proper use and application,including, where applicable: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The force measured during the sample force test; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The maximum elongation measured for lanyards during the forcetest; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The deceleration distance measured for deceleration devices duringthe force test;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Caution statements on critical use limitations; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Application limits; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Proper hook-up, anchoring and tie-off techniques, including theproper dee-ring or other attachment point to use on the body belt and harnessfor fall arrest; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Proper climbing techniques; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Methods of inspection, use, cleaning, and storage; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Specific lifelines which may be used. This information shouldbe provided to employees during training. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) <T3>Inspection considerations.</T3> As stated in the standard (SectionI, Paragraph (f)), personal fall arrest systems must be regularly inspected.Any component with any significant defect, such as cuts, tears, abrasions,mold, or undue stretching; alterations or additions which might affectits efficiency; damage due to deterioration; contact with fire, acids,or other corrosives; distorted hooks or faulty hook springs; tongues unfittedto the shoulder of buckles; loose or damaged mountings; non-functioningparts; or wearing or internal deterioration in the ropes must be withdrawnfrom service immediately, and should be tagged or marked as unusable, ordestroyed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) <T3>Rescue considerations.</T3> As required by the standard (Section I,Paragraph (e)(8)), when personal fall arrest systems are used, the employermust assure that employees can be promptly rescued or can rescue themselvesshould a fall occur. The availability of rescue personnel, ladders or otherrescue equipment should be evaluated. In some situations, equipment whichallows employees to rescue themselves after the fall has been arrestedmay be desirable, such as devices which have descent capability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) <T3>Tie-off considerations.</T3> (1) One of the most important aspectsof personal fall protection systems is fully planning the system <T3>before</T3> it is put into use. Probably the most overlooked componentis planning for suitable anchorage points. Such planning should ideallybe done before the structure or building is constructed so that anchoragepoints can be incorporated during construction for use later for windowcleaning or other building maintenance. If properly planned, these anchoragepoints may be used <T3>during</T3> construction, as well as afterwards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Employers and employees should at all times be aware that thestrength of a personal fall arrest system is based on its being attachedto an anchoring system which does not significantly reduce the strengthof the system (such as a properly dimensioned eye-bolt/snap-hook anchorage).Therefore, if a means of attachment is used that will reduce the strengthof the system, that component should be replaced by a stronger one, butone that will also maintain the appropriate maximum arrest force characteristics.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Tie-off using a knot in a rope lanyard or lifeline (at any location)can reduce the lifeline or lanyard strength by 50 percent or more. Therefore,a stronger lanyard or lifeline should be used to compensate for the weakeningeffect of the knot, or the lanyard length should be reduced (or the tie-offlocation raised) to minimize free fall distance, or the lanyard or lifelineshould be replaced by one which has an appropriately incorporated connectorto eliminate the need for a knot. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Tie-off of a rope lanyard or lifeline around an ``H'' or ``I''beam or similar support can reduce its strength as much as 70 percent dueto the cutting action of the beam edges. Therefore, use should be madeof a webbing lanyard or wire core lifeline around the beam; or the lanyardor lifeline should be protected from the edge; or free fall distance shouldbe greatly minimized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Tie-off where the line passes over or around rough or sharp surfacesreduces strength drastically. Such a tie-off should be avoided or an alternativetie-off rigging should be used. Such alternatives may include use of asnap-hook/dee ring connection, wire rope tie-off, an effective paddingof the surfaces, or an abrasion-resistance strap around or over the problemsurface.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Horizontal lifelines may, depending on their geometry and angleof sag, be subjected to greater loads than the impact load imposed by anattached component. When the angle of horizontal lifeline sag is less than30 degrees, the impact force imparted to the lifeline by an attached lanyardis greatly amplified. For example, with a sag angle of 15 degrees, theforce amplification is about 2:1 and at 5 degrees sag, it is about 6:1.Depending on the angle of sag, and the line's elasticity, the strengthof the horizontal lifeline and the anchorages to which it is attached shouldbe increased a number of times over that of the lanyard. Extreme care shouldbe taken in considering a horizontal lifeline for multiple tie-offs. Thereason for this is that in multiple tie-offs to a horizontal lifeline,if one employee falls, the movement of the falling employee and the horizontallifeline during arrest of the fall may cause other employees to also fall.Horizontal lifeline and anchorage strength should be increased for eachadditional employee to be tied-off. For these and other reasons, the designof systems using horizontal lifelines must only be done by qualified persons.Testing of installed lifelines and anchors prior to use is recommended.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) The strength of an eye-bolt is rated along the axis of the boltand its strength is greatly reduced if the force is applied at an angleto this axis (in the direction of shear). Also, care should be exercisedin selecting the proper diameter of the eye to avoid accidental disengagementof snap-hooks not designed to be compatible for the connection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Due to the significant reduction in the strength of the lifeline/lanyard(in some cases, as much as a 70 percent reduction), the sliding hitch knotshould not be used for lifeline/lanyard connections except in emergencysituations where no other available system is practical. The ``one-and-one''sliding hitch knot should never be used because it is unreliable in stoppinga fall. The ``two-and-two,'' or ``three-and-three'' knot (preferable),may be used in emergency situa-tions; however, care should be taken tolimit free fall distance to a minimum because of reduced lifeline/lanyardstrength. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) <T3>Vertical lifeline considerations. </T3>As required by the standard,each employee must have a separate lifeline when the lifeline is vertical.The reason for this is that in multiple tie-offs to a single lifeline,if one employee falls, the movement of the lifeline during the arrest ofthe fall may pull other employees' lanyards, causing them to fall as well.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) <T3>Snap-hook considerations. </T3>Although not required by this standardfor all connections, locking snap-hooks designed for connection to suitableobjects (of sufficient strength) are highly recommended in lieu of thenon-locking type. Locking snap-hooks incorporate a positive locking mechanismin addition to the spring loaded keeper, which will not allow the keeperto open under moderate pressure without someone first releasing the mechanism.Such a feature, properly designed, effectively prevents roll-out from occurring.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As required by the standard (Section I, paragraph (e)(1)) the followingconnections must be avoided (unless properly designed locking snap-hooksare used) because they are conditions which can result in roll-out whena nonlocking snap-hook is used: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Direct connection of a snap-hook to a horizontal lifeline.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Two (or more) snap-hooks connected to one dee-ring. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Two snap-hooks connected to each other. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; A snap-hook connected back on its integral lanyard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; A snap-hook connected to a webbing loop or webbing lanyard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">andbullet; Improper dimensions of the dee-ring, rebar, or other connectionpoint in relation to the snap-hook dimensions which would allow the snap-hookkeeper to be depressed by a turning motion of the snap-hook. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(k) <T3>Free fall considerations. </T3>The employer and employee should atall times be aware that a system's maximum arresting force is evaluatedunder normal use conditions established by the manufacturer, and in nocase using a free fall distance in excess of six feet (1.8 m). A few extrafeet of free fall can significantly increase the arresting force on theemployee, possibly to the point of causing injury. Because of this, thefree fall distance should be kept at a minimum, and, as required by thestandard, in no case greater than six feet (1.8 m). To help assure this,the tie-off attachment point to the lifeline or anchor should be locatedat or above the connection point of the fall arrest equipment to belt orharness. (Since otherwise additional free fall distance is added to thelength of the connecting means (i.e. lanyard)). Attaching to the workingsurface will often result in a free fall greater than six feet (1.8 m).For instance, if a six foot (1.8 m) lanyard is used, the total free falldistance will be the distance from the working level to the body belt (orharness) attachment point plus the six feet (1.8 m) of lanyard length.Another important consideration is that the arresting force which the fallsystem must withstand also goes up with greater distances of free fall,possibly exceeding the strength of the system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(l) <T3>Elongation and deceleration distance considerations. </T3>Other factorsinvolved in a proper tie-off are elongation and deceleration distance.During the arresting of a fall, a lanyard will experience a length of stretchingor elongation, whereas activation of a deceleration device will resultin a certain stopping distance. These distances should be available withthe lanyard or device's instructions and must be added to the free falldistance to arrive at the total fall distance before an employee is fullystopped. The additional stopping distance may be very significant if thelanyard or deceleration device is attached near or at the end of a longlifeline, which may itself add considerable distance due to its own elongation.As required by the standard, sufficient distance to allow for all of thesefactors must also be maintained between the employee and obstructions below,to prevent an injury due to impact before the system fully arrests thefall. In addition, a minimum of 12 feet (3.7 m) of lifeline should be allowedbelow the securing point of a rope grab type deceleration device, and theend terminated to prevent the device from sliding off the lifeline. Alternatively,the lifeline should extend to the ground or the next working level below.These measures are suggested to prevent the worker from inadvertently movingpast the end of the lifeline and having the rope grab become disengagedfrom the lifeline. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(m) <T3>Obstruction considerations. </T3>The location of the tie-off shouldalso consider the hazard of obstructions in the potential fall path ofthe employee. Tie-offs which minimize the possibilities of exaggeratedswinging should be considered. In addition, when a body belt is used, theemployee's body will go through a horizontal position to a jack-knifedposition during the arrest of all falls. Thus, obstructions which mightinterfere with this motion should be avoided or a severe injury could occur.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(n) <T3>Other considerations. </T3>Because of the design of some personal fallarrest systems, additional considerations may be required for proper tie-off.For example, heavy deceleration devices of the self-retracting type shouldbe secured overhead in order to avoid the weight of the device having tobe supported by the employee. Also, if selfretracting equipment is connectedto a horizontal lifeline, the sag in the lifeline should be minimized toprevent the device from sliding down the lifeline to a position which createsa swing hazard during fall arrest. In all cases, manufacturer's instructionsshould be followed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix D to Section 1910.66, Existing Installations (Mandatory)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Use of the Appendix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix D sets out the mandatory building and equipment requirementsfor applicable permanent installations completed after August 27, 1971,and no later than July 23, 1990 which are exempt from the paragraphs (a),(b)(1), (b)(2), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this standard. The requirementsin Appendix D are essentially the same as unrevised building and equipmentprovisions which previously were designated as 29 CFR 1910.66 (a), (b),(c) and (d) and which were effective on August 27, 1971.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> All existing installations subject to this Appendix shallalso comply with paragraphs (g), (h), (i), (j) and Appendix C of the standard29 CFR 1910.66.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) <T3>Definitions applicable to this appendix_</T3>(1)<T3> Angulated roping.</T3> A system of platform suspension in which theupper wire rope sheaves or suspension points are closer to the plane ofthe building face than the corresponding attachment points on the platform,thus causing the platform to press against the face of the building duringits vertical travel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2)<T3> ANSI.</T3> American National Standards Institute.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3)<T3> Babbitted fastenings.</T3> The method of providing wire rope attachmentsin which the ends of the wire strands are bent back and are held in a taperedsocket by means of poured molten babbitt metal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4)<T3> Brake_disc type.</T3> A brake in which the holding effect is obtainedby frictional resistance between one or more faces of discs keyed to therotating member to be held and fixed discs keyed to the stationary or housingmember (pressure between the discs being applied axially).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5)<T3> Brake_self-energizing band type.</T3> An essentially undirectionalbrake in which the holding effect is obtained by the snubbing action ofa flexible band wrapped about a cylindrical wheel or drum affixed to therotating member to be held, the connections and linkages being so arrangedthat the motion of the brake wheel or drum will act to increase the tensionor holding force of the band.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6)<T3> Brake_shoe type.</T3> A brake in which the holding effect is obtainedby applying the direct pressure of two or more segmental friction elementsheld to a stationary member against a cylindrical wheel or drum affixedto the rotating member to be held.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7)<T3> Building face rollers.</T3> A specialized form of guide roller designedto contact a portion of the outer face or wall structure of the building,and to assist in stabilizing the operators' platform during vertical travel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8)<T3> Continuous pressure.</T3> Operation by means of buttons or switches,any one of which may be used to control the movement of the working platformor roof car, only as long as the button or switch is manually maintainedin the actuating position.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9)<T3> Control.</T3> A system governing starting, stopping, direction, acceleration,speed, and retardation of moving members.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10)<T3> Controller.</T3> A device or group of devices, usually contained ina single enclosure, which serves to control in some predetermined mannerthe apparatus to which it is connected.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11)<T3> Electrical ground.</T3> A conducting connection between an electricalcircuit or equipment and the earth, or some conducting body which servesin place of the earth.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12)<T3> Guide roller.</T3> A rotating, bearing-mounted, generally cylindricalmember, operating separately or as part of a guide shoe assembly, attachedto the platform, and providing rolling contact with building guideways,or other building contact members.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13)<T3> Guide shoe.</T3> An assembly of rollers, slide members, or the equivalent,attached as a unit to the operators' platform, and designed to engage withthe building members provided for the vertical guidance of the operators'platform.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) <T3>Interlock.</T3> A device actuated by the operation of some other devicewith which it is directly associated, to govern succeeding operations ofthe same or allied devices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) <T3>Operating device.</T3> A pushbutton, lever, or other manual deviceused to actuate a control. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) <T3>Powered platform.</T3> Equipment to provide access to the exteriorof a building for maintenance, consisting of a suspended power-operatedworking platform, a roof car, or other suspension means, and the requisiteoperating and control devices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) <T3>Rated load.</T3> The combined weight of employees, tools, equipment,and other material which the working platform is designed and installedto lift. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(18) <T3>Relay, direction.</T3> An electrically energized contactor responsiveto an initiating control circuit, which in turn causes a moving memberto travel in a particular direction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(19) <T3>Relay, potential for vertical travel.</T3> An electrically energizedcontactor responsive to initiating control circuit, which in turn controlsthe operation of a moving member in both directions. This relay usuallyoperates in conjunction with direction relays, as covered under the definition,``relay, direction.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(20) <T3>Roof car.</T3> A structure for the suspension of a working platform,providing for its horizontal movement to working positions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(21) <T3>Roof-powered platform.</T3> A powered platform having the raising andlowering mechanism located on a roof car. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(22) <T3>Self-powered platform.</T3> A powered platform having the raising andlowering mechanism located on the working platform. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(23) <T3>Traveling cable.</T3> A cable made up of electrical or communicationconductors or both, and providing electrical connection between the workingplatform and the roof car or other fixed point. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(24) <T3>Weatherproof.</T3> Equipment so constructed or protected that exposureto the weather will not interfere with its proper operation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(25) <T3>Working platform.</T3> The suspended structure arranged for verticaltravel which provides access to the exterior of the building or structure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(26) <T3>Yield point.</T3> The stress at which the material exhibits a permanentset of 0.2 percent. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(27) <T3>Zinced fastenings.</T3> The method of providing wire rope attachmentsin which the splayed or fanned wire ends are held in a tapered socket bymeans of poured molten zinc. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) <T3>General requirements.</T3> (1) Design requirements. All powered platforminstallations for exterior building maintenance completed as of August27, 1971, but no later than [insert date, 180 days after the effectivedate], shall meet all of the design, construction and installation requirementsof Part II and III of the ``American National Standard Safety Requirementsfor Powered Platforms for Exterior Building Maintenance ANSI A120.1-1970''and of this appendix. References shall be made to appropriate parts ofANSI A120.1-1970 for detail specifications for equipment and special installations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Limitation.</T3> The requirements of this appendix apply only to electricpowered platforms. It is not the intent of this appendix to prohibit theuse of other types of power. Installation of powered platforms using othertypes of power is permitted, provided such platforms have adequate protectivedevices for the type of power used, and otherwise provide for reasonablesafety of life and limb to users of equipment and to others who may beexposed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Types of powered platforms.</T3> (i) For the purpose of applying thisappendix, powered platforms are divided into two basic types, Type F andType T. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Powered platforms designated as Type F shall meet all the requirementsin Part II of ANSI A 120.1-1970, American National Standard Safety Requirementsfor Powered Platforms for Exterior Building Maintenance. A basic requirementof Type F equipment is that the work platform is suspended by at leastfour wire ropes and designed so that failure of any one wire rope willnot substantially alter the normal position of the working platform. Anotherbasic requirement of Type F equipment is that only one layer of hoistingrope is permitted on winding drums. Type F powered platforms may be eitherroof-powered or self-powered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Powered platforms designated as Type T shall meet all the requirementsin Part III of ANSI A120.1-1970 American National Standard Safety Requirementsfor Powered Platforms for Exterior Building Maintenance, except for section28, Safety Belts and Life Lines. A basic requirement of Type T equipmentis that the working platform is suspended by at least two wire ropes. Failureof one wire rope would not permit the working platform to fall to the ground,but would upset its normal position. Type T powered platforms may be eitherroof-powered or self-powered. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The requirements of this section apply to powered platforms withwinding drum type hoisting machines. It is not the intent of this sectionto prohibit powered platforms using other types of hoisting machines suchas, but not limited to, traction drum hoisting machines, air powered machines,hydraulic powered machines, and internal combustion machines. Installationof powered platforms with other types of hoisting machines is permitted,provided adequate protective devices are used, and provided reasonablesafety of life and limb to users of the equipment and to others who maybe exposed is assured. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Both Type F and Type T powered platforms shall comply with therequirements of Appendix C of this standard. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) <T3>Type F powered platforms</T3>_(1) <T3>Roof car, general.</T3> (i) A roof car shall be provided whenever itis necessary to move the working platform horizontally to working or storagepositions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The maximum rated speed at which a power traversed roof car maybe moved in a horizontal direction shall be 50 feet per minute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Movement and positioning of roof car.</T3> (i) Provision shall be madeto protect against having the roof car leave the roof or enter roof areasnot designed for travel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The horizontal motion of the roof cars shall be positively controlledso as to insure proper movement and positioning of the roof car. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Roof car positioning devices shall be provided to insure thatthe working platform is placed and retained in proper position for verticaltravel and during storage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Mechanical stops shall be provided to prevent the traversingof the roof car beyond its normal limits of travel. Such stops shall becapable of withstanding a force equal to 100 percent of the inertial effectof the roof car in motion with traversing power applied.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v)(a) The operating device of a power-operated roof car for traversingshall be located on the roof car, the working platform, or both, and shallbe of the continuous pressure weather-proof electric type. If more thanone operating device is provided, they shall be so arranged that traversingis possible only from one operating device at a time. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The operating device shall be so connected that it is not operableuntil: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>1</T3>) The working platform is located at its uppermost position oftravel and is not in contact with the building face or fixed vertical guidesin the face of the building; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>2</T3>) All protective devices and interlocks are in a position fortraversing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Roof car stability. </T3>Roof car stability shall be determined byeither paragraph (c)(3) (i) or (ii) of this Appendix, whichever is greater.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The roof car shall be continuously stable, considering overturningmoment as determined by 125 percent rated load, plus maximum dead loadand the prescribed wind loading. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The roof car and its anchorages shall be capable of resistingaccidental over-tensioning of the wire ropes suspending the working platformand this calculated value shall include the effect of one and one-halftimes the value. For this calculation, the simultaneous effect of one-halfwind load shall be included, and the design stresses shall not exceed thosereferred to in paragraph (b)(1) of this Appendix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) If the load on the motors is at any time in excess of threetimes that required for lifting the working platform with its rated loadthe motor shall stall. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Access to the roof car. </T3>Safe access to the roof car and from theroof car to the working platform shall be provided. If the access to theroof car at any point of its travel is not over the roof area or whereotherwise necessary for safety, self-closing, self-locking gates shallbe provided. Applicable provisions of the American National Standard SafetyRequirements for Floor and Wall Openings, Railings and Toeboard, A12.1-1967,shall apply. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Means for maintenance, repair, and storage. </T3>Means shall be providedto run the roof car away from the roof perimeter, where necessary, andto provide a safe area for maintenance, repairs, and storage. Provisionsshall be made to secure the machine in the stored position. For storedmachines subject to wind forces, see special design and anchorage requirementsfor ``wind forces'' in Part II, section 10.5.1.1 of ANSI A120.1-1970 AmericanNational Standard Safety Requirements for Powered Platforms for ExteriorBuilding Maintenance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) <T3>General requirements for working platforms. </T3>The working platformshall be of girder or truss construction and shall be adequate to supportits rated load under any position of loading, and comply with the provisionsset forth in section 10 of ANSI A120.1-1970, American National StandardSafety Requirements for Powered Platforms for Exterior Building Maintenance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) <T3>Load rating plate. </T3>Each working platform shall bear a manufacturer'sload rating plate, conspicuously posted; stating the maximum permissiblerated load. Load rating plates shall be made of noncorrosive material andshall have letters and figures stamped, etched, or cast on the surface.The minimum height of the letters and figures shall be one-fourth inch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) <T3>Minimum size. </T3>The working platform shall have a minimum net widthof 24 inches. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) <T3>Guardrails. </T3>Working platforms shall be furnished with permanentguard rails not less than 36 inches high, and not more than 42 inches highat the front (building side). At the rear, and on the sides, the rail shallnot be less than 42 inches high. An intermediate guardrail shall be providedaround the entire platform between the top guardrail and the toeboard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) <T3>Toeboards. </T3>A four-inch toeboard shall be provided along all sidesof the working platform. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) <T3>Open spaces between guardrails and toeboards. </T3>The spaces betweenthe intermediate guardrail and platform toeboard on the building side ofthe working platform, and between the top guardrail and the toeboard onother sides of the platform, shall be filled with metalic mesh or similarmaterial that will reject a ball one inch in diameter. The installed meshshall be capable of withstanding a load of 100 pounds applied horizontallyover any area of 144 square inches. If the space between the platform andthe building face does not exceed eight inches, and the platform is restrainedby guides, the mesh may be omitted on the front side. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) <T3>Flooring. </T3>The platform flooring shall be of the nonskid type,and if of open construction, shall reject a \9/16\-inch diameter ball,or be provided with a screen below the floor to reject a \9/16\-inch diameterball. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) <T3>Access gates. </T3>Where access gates are provided, they shall be self-closingand self-locking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) <T3>Operating device for vertical movement of the working platform. </T3>(i)The normal operating device for the working platform shall be located onthe working platform and shall be of the continuous pressure weatherproofelectric type. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The operating device shall be operable only when all electricalprotective devices and interlocks on the working platform are in positionfor normal service and, the roof car, if provided, is at an establishedoperating point. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) <T3>Emergency electric operative device. </T3>(i) In addition, on roof-poweredplatforms, an emergency electric operating device shall be provided nearthe hoisting machine for use in the event of failure of the normal operatingdevice for the working platform, or failure of the traveling cable system.The emergency operating device shall be mounted in a locked compartmentand shall have a legend mounted thereon reading: ``For Emergency OperationOnly. Establish Communication With Personnel on Working Platform BeforeUse.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) A key for unlocking the compartment housing the emergency operatingdevice shall be mounted in a break-glass receptacle located near the emergencyoperating device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) <T3>Manual cranking for emergency operation. </T3>Emergency operation ofthe main drive machine may be provided to allow manual cranking. This provisionfor manual operation shall be designed so that not more than two personswill be required to perform this operation. The access to this provisionshall include a means to automatically make the machine inoperative electricallywhile under the emergency manual operation. The design shall be such thatthe emergency brake is operative at or below governor tripping speed duringmanual operation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) <T3>Arrangement and guarding of hoisting equipment.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Hoisting equipment shall consist of a power-driven drum or drumcontained in the roof car (roof-powered platforms) or contained on theworking platform (self-powered platform).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The hoisting equipment shall be power-operated in both up anddown directions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Guard or other protective devices shall be installed whereverrotating shafts or other mechanisms or gears may expose personnel to ahazard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Friction devices or clutches shall not be used for connectingthe main driving mechanism to the drum or drums. Belt or chain-driven machinesare prohibited.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(18) <T3>Hoisting motors.</T3> (i) Hoisting motors shall be electric and ofweather-proof construction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Hoisting motors shall be in conformance with applicable provisionsof paragraph (c)(22) of this appendix, Electric Wiring and Equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Hoisting motors shall be directly connected to the hoistingmachinery. Motor couplings, if used, shall be of steel construction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(19)<T3> Brakes.</T3> The hoisting machine(s) shall have two independent brakingmeans, each designed to stop and hold the working platform with 125 percentof rated load.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(20)<T3> Hoisting ropes and rope connections.</T3> (i) Working platforms shallbe suspended by wire ropes of either 6andmultiply;19 or 6andmultiply;37 classification,preformed or nonpreformed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The minimum factor of safety shall be 10, and shall be calculatedby the following formula:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">F=Sandmultiply;N/W</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Where</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">S=Manufacturer's rated breaking strength of one rope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">N=Number of ropes under load.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">W=Maximum static load on all ropes with the platform and its ratedload at any point of its travel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Hoisting ropes shall be sized to conform with the required factorof safety, but in no case shall the size be less than \5/16\ inch diameter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Winding drums shall have at least three turns of rope remainingwhen the platform has landed at the lowest possible point of its travel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) The lengthening or repairing of wire rope by the joining of twoor more lengths is prohibited.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) The nondrum ends of the hoisting ropes shall be provided withindividual shackle rods which will permit individual adjustment of ropelengths, if required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(viii) More than two reverse bends in each rope is prohibited.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(21)<T3> Rope tag data.</T3> (i) A metal data tag shall be securely attachedto one of the wire rope fastenings. This data tag shall bear the followingwire rope data:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The diameter in inches.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Construction classification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Whether nonpreformed or preformed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) The grade of material used.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The manufacturer's rated breaking strength.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Name of the manufacturer of the rope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) The month and year the ropes were installed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(22)<T3> Electrical wiring and equipment.</T3> (i) All electrical equipmentand wiring shall conform to the requirements of the National ElectricalCode, NFPA 70-1971; ANSI C1-1971 (Rev. of C1-1968), except as modifiedby ANSI A120.1-1970 ``American National Standard Safety Requirements forPowered Platforms for Exterior Building Maintenance.'' For detail designspecifications for electrical equipment, see Part 2, ANSI A120.1-1970.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) All motors and operation and control equipment shall be suppliedfrom a single power source.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The power supply for the powered platform shall be an independentcircuit supplied through a fused disconnect switch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Electrical conductor parts of the power supply system shall beprotected against accidental contact.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Electrical grounding shall be provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Provisions for electrical grounding shall be included with thepower-supply system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Controller cabinets, motor frames, hoisting machines, the workingplatform, roof car and roof car track system, and noncurrent carrying partsof electrical equipment, where provided, shall be grounded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The controller, where used, shall be so designed and installedthat a single ground or short circuit will not prevent both the normaland final stopping device from stopping the working platform.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Means shall be provided on the roof car and working platform forgrounding portable electric tools.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The working platform shall be grounded through a grounding connectionin a traveling cable. Electrically powered tools utilized on the workingplatform shall be grounded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Electrical receptacles located on the roof or other exteriorlocation shall be of a weatherproof type and shall be located so as notto be subject to contact with water or accumulated snow. The receptaclesshall be grounded and the electric cable shall include a grounding conductor.The receptacle and plug shall be a type designed to avoid hazard to personsinserting or withdrawing the plug. Provision shall be made to prevent applicationof cable strain directly to the plug and receptacle.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Electric runway conductor systems shall be of the type designedfor use in exterior locations and shall be located so as not to be subjectto contact with water or accumulated snow. The conductors, collectors,and disconnecting means shall conform to the same requirements as thosefor cranes and hoists in Article 610 of the National Electrical Code, NFPA70-1971; ANSI C1-1971 (Rev. of C1-1968). A grounded conductor shall parallelthe power conductors and be so connected that it cannot be opened by thedisconnecting means. The system shall be designed to avoid hazard to personsin the area.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(viii) Electrical protective devices and interlocks of the weatherprooftype shall be provided.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ix) Where the installation includes a roof car, electric contact(s)shall be provided and so connected that the operating devices for the workingplatform shall be operative only when the roof car is located and mechanicallyretained at an established operating point.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(x) Where the powered platform includes a powered-operated roof car,the operating device for the roof car shall be inoperative when the roofcar is mechanically retained at an established operating point.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xi) An electric contact shall be provided and so connected that itwill cause the down direction relay for vertical travel to open if thetension in the traveling cable exceeds safe limits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xii) An automatic overload device shall be provided to cut off theelectrical power to the circuit in all hoisting motors for travel in theup direction, should the load applied to the hoisting ropes at either endof the working platform exceed 125 percent of its normal tension with ratedload, as shown on the manufacturer's data plate on the working platform.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xiii) An automatic device shall be provided for each hoisting ropewhich will cut off the electrical power to the hoisting motor or motorsin the down direction and apply the brakes if any hoisting rope becomesslack. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xiv) Upper and lower directional limit devices shall be providedto prevent the travel of the working platform beyond the normal upper andlower limits of travel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xv) Operation of a directional limit device shall prevent furthermotion in the appropriate direction, if the normal limit of travel hasbeen reached. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xvi) Directional limit devices, if driven from the hoisting machineby chains, tapes, or cables, shall incorporate a device to disconnect theelectric power from the hoisting machine and apply both the primary andsecondary brakes in the event of failure of the driving means. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xvii) Final terminal stopping devices of the working platform: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Final terminal stopping devices for the working platform shallbe provided as a secondary means of preventing the working platform fromover-traveling at the terminals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The device shall be set to function as close to each terminallanding as practical, but in such a way that under normal operating conditionsit will not function when the working platform is stopped by the normalterminal stopping device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Operation of the final terminal stopping device shall open thepotential relay for vertical travel, thereby disconnecting the electricpower from the hoisting machine, and applying both the primary and secondarybrakes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) The final terminal stopping device for the upper limit of travelshall be mounted so that it is operated directly by the motion of the workingplatform itself. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xviii) Emergency stop switches shall be provided in or adjacent toeach operating device. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xix) Emergency stop switches shall: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Have red operating buttons or handles. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Be conspicuously and permanently marked ``Stop.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Be the manually opened and manually closed type. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Be positively opened with the opening not solely dependent onsprings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xx) The manual operation of an emergency stop switch associated withan operating device for the working platform shall open the potential relayfor vertical travel, thereby disconnecting the electric power from thehoisting machine and applying both the primary and secondary brakes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(xxi) The manual operation of the emergency stop switch associatedwith the operating device for a power-driven roof car shall cause the electricalpower to the traverse machine to be interrupted, and the traverse machinebrake to apply. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(23) <T3>Requirements for emergency communications.</T3> (i) Communication equipmentshall be provided for each powered platform for use in an emergency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Two-way communication shall be established between personnelon the roof and personnel on the stalled working platform before any emergencyoperation of the working platform is undertaken by personnel on the roof.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The equipment shall permit two-way voice communication betweenthe working platform and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Designated personnel continuously available while the poweredplatform is in use; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Designated personnel on roof-powered platforms, undertaking emergencyoperation of the working platform by means of the emergency operating devicelocated near the hoisting machine. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The emergency communication equipment shall be one of the followingtypes: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Telephone connected to the central telephone exchange system;or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Telephones on a limited system or an approved two-way radio system,provided designated personnel are available to receive a message duringthe time the powered platform is in use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) <T3>Type T powered platforms</T3>_(1) <T3>Roof car.</T3> The requirements of paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(5)of this Appendix shall apply to Type T powered platforms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Working platform.</T3> The requirements of paragraphs (c)(6) through(c)(16) of this Appendix apply to Type T powered platforms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The working platform shall be suspended by at least two wire ropes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The maximum rated speed at which the working platform of self-poweredplatforms may be moved in a vertical direction shall not exceed 35 feetper minute. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Hoisting equipment.</T3> The requirements of paragraphs (c) (17) and(18) of this Appendix shall apply to Type T powered platforms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Brakes.</T3> Brakes requirements of paragraph (c)(19) of this Appendixshall apply. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Hoisting ropes and rope connections.</T3> (i) Paragraphs (c)(20) (i)through (vi) and (viii) of this Appendix shall apply to Type T poweredplatforms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Adjustable shackle rods in subparagraph (c)(20)(vii) of thisAppendix shall apply to Type T powered platforms, if the working platformis suspended by more than two wire ropes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) <T3>Electrical wiring and equipment.</T3> (i) The requirements of paragraphs(c)(22) (i) through (vi) of this Appendix shall apply to Type T poweredplatforms. ``Circuit protection limitation,'' ``powered platform electricalservice system,'' all operating services and control equipment shall complywith the specifications contained in Part 2, section 26, ANSI A120.1-1970.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) For electrical protective devices the requirements of paragraphs(c)(22) (i) through (viii) of this Appendix shall apply to Type T poweredplatforms. Requirements for the ``circuit potential limitation'' shallbe in accordance with specifications contained in Part 2, section 26, ofANSI A120.1-1970. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) <T3>Emergency communications.</T3> All the requirements of paragraph (c)(23)of this Appendix shall apply to Type T powered platforms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-17053 Filed 7-27-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>